Part 2. Chapter 61 to 120. 

Liv’s eyes widened. The explicit mention of “our affair” somehow tickled her ears. She licked her lips and coughed awkwardly before adding, “Cardinal Calliope and his pilgrimage group will be visiting soon, so it would be troublesome if strange rumors start to spread.”

Did her words, which seemed to miss the point, annoy him? The Marquis furrowed his brow.

“Speak clearly so I can understand.”

“I heard you might be hosting some guests soon, Marquis.”

At Liv’s words, the Marquis’s lips twisted in annoyance. He seemed thoroughly displeased now.

“Who said that? Who’s investigating me?”

“It’s not that— I overheard it while teaching at the Pendence estate.”

“Ah, Pendence.”

The Marquis spat out the name “Pendence” irritably and clicked his tongue. His frowning brow was filled with irritation. In the suddenly tense atmosphere, Liv could only lower her gaze, cautiously watching the Marquis’s reaction. Judging from his response, it didn’t seem like the Marquis had any plans to host the Cardinal or the pilgrimage group.

But according to Million, they were acquaintances. Could it be just another exaggerated rumor, like the others about the Marquis? If it were false, they probably wouldn’t have told Baron Pendence not to prepare lodging.

Million’s words, which she had tried so hard to ignore, came back to her. Lady Malte, who had broken off her engagement, and the unmarried Marquis with exceptional looks.

Curiosity suddenly swelled up inside her.

“I heard someone from the pilgrimage group knows you, Marquis.”

The Marquis immediately reacted to Liv’s casual statement.

“Who is it?”

From his response, Liv instinctively knew that Million’s words were true. If it weren’t true, the Marquis would have denied knowing anyone outright instead of asking who it was.

Ah, so he really does know someone.

“I don’t know exactly who…”

There were more than a few nobles in the pilgrimage group, and Million’s imagination still seemed close to speculation. Yet just discovering a tiny possibility made Liv’s heart sink. Her own reaction felt so strange that she bit her lip.

She wanted to pretend to be indifferent, but she could feel her facial muscles stiffening. It was true that she was curious about the nature of the Marquis’s relationship with Lady Luzia Malte, if they really were acquainted.

Feeling unsettled, as if food she hadn’t eaten was lodged in her throat, Liv reached for her wine glass. Just then, the Marquis asked her a question in a cold voice.

“Who do you think it is?”

“Maybe… Lady Luzia Malte or…”

Half-distracted, Liv answered thoughtlessly, but a sudden noise made her look up in surprise. The Marquis had set down his cutlery loudly.

“I thought I’d feed you since your stamina isn’t great.”

After taking a sip of wine, the Marquis wiped his mouth, muttering to himself. Tossing his napkin beside the table, he rose gracefully and approached Liv.

Liv, bewildered, parted her lips to say something, but she couldn’t speak.

“Mm…!”

A hot tongue slipped between her parted lips. The rich scent of wine mixed with his saliva. His tongue thrust deeply from the start, roughly stirring inside her mouth.

There was no escaping it. The backrest of her chair prevented her from moving away, and his firm grip on the nape of her neck kept her head in place.

The sticky kiss continued for a long time. It wasn’t until her breath was caught at her throat that the Marquis finally let go of her.

As soon as their lips parted, Liv gasped for breath, her eyelashes trembling. She could see the Marquis’s blue eyes right in front of her, wrapped in a faint excitement.

“Why… so suddenly…?”

They had been in the middle of a conversation, and now they were suddenly kissing at the table. There was no context.

Seeing Liv’s flustered expression, the Marquis pressed his thumb firmly against her lower lip.

“Because you said something cute first.”

What on earth did he mean?

Even hearing his explanation, she couldn’t understand. The Marquis, seeing Liv’s bewildered expression, smiled faintly, his eyes narrowing.

“Don’t worry. I have no intention of letting other guests into the place where I roll around with you.”

Liv’s face paled at those words, then quickly flushed bright red.

“I-I didn’t mean it like that…!”

“I understand why the rumor spread, but they won’t be staying at my estate.”

Liv, her lips parted, frowned and looked away. She tried to turn her head completely, but the Marquis’s firm grip on her neck allowed her only to avert her eyes.

“Is that answer satisfactory?”

“…Whether or not you receive guests at your estate is none of my business. It’s entirely up to you, Marquis.”

“I was merely asking if my answer provided you with personal satisfaction.”

His voice was gentle but insistent. His thumb, which had been pressing her lower lip, slowly moved down to stroke her chin and neck.

“Hmm?”

Liv swallowed dryly. Every time she took a shaky breath through her slightly parted lips, the Marquis’s thumb pressed firmly against her throat. Was this what it looked like to a victor holding his most beautiful trophy after a successful hunt?

Liv, trembling, eventually admitted honestly, “It is… satisfactory.”

Liv, her cheeks flushed, panted softly, looking very much like a deer caught by a hunter. Perhaps she looked rather amusing. Even though she knew this, she couldn’t quickly calm her ragged breathing. And most likely… the Marquis seemed to quite enjoy her disheveled state.

“Then it’s my turn to gain satisfaction now.”

The Marquis lowered his head again. Unlike the forceful first kiss, this one was slow and sweet.

“Shall we see if you’ve learned well from last time?”

The soft tablecloth crumpled beneath her back, sliding around haphazardly.

The sturdy table didn’t creak at all, despite the intense movements. Only the dishes, displaced by the shifting tablecloth, were nudged around until, eventually, some fell noisily to the floor.

Crash!

Despite the sharp clattering, neither of them looked that way. To be precise, the Marquis wasn’t interested, and Liv had no room to care.

“Ah…!”

Even though it wasn’t her first time, it felt like she was experiencing it all over again. The sensation of something being thrust deep inside was overwhelming, as if facing a trial for the first time. Each time it rammed into her, electric tingles ran down her spine.

Had their first time been like this too? She didn’t understand why it felt so unfamiliar.

Maybe it was because of the change in location. At least back then, they had been on a proper bed.

“Ah, ah…!”

“You haven’t improved at all.”

Amidst the creaking friction, she heard the Marquis murmur. Today, as always, he had only taken off his gloves. Compared to that, what about Liv?

Even though it was just the two of them, they were in a large dining room, and she was lying naked on the table. Liv had never imagined she would one day find herself sprawled out on a dining table, moaning so loudly it echoed in the room.

But it was far too late for shame. Her mind was hazy from the relentless stimulation, and she was too busy crying from the strange pleasure that mingled with the pain.

“Haa…”

“Ahh…”

The Marquis thrust his hips between her spread legs. Her body curled instinctively, but her protruding spine was pressed painfully against the hard table.

The embarrassment of doing something so obscene in a dining room was secondary; first and foremost, it was simply uncomfortable. The Marquis’s unyielding manhood showed no mercy, and the scorching heat gradually numbed her lower body. Her legs dangled in the air like sheets of paper, and the panties hanging from her calves fluttered with each movement, only adding to her sense of shame and depravity.

“Ah!”

The firm pressure deep inside made Liv arch her back. The Marquis hadn’t climaxed even once, but Liv had already lost count of how many times she had succumbed to pleasure. Desperate to escape even a little, she reached out and clung to his clothes.

It was futile.

“We need to keep practicing,” the Marquis whispered, almost teasing her. Liv wanted to retort, but all she could do was gasp for breath.

The slick sounds of friction grew faster. As his hips moved quicker, the fabric of his pants rubbed roughly against her wet skin. The rigid shaft repeatedly pushed into her, pressing against the deepest part of her walls until it finally stilled.

“Ngh.”

She felt a rush inside her lower abdomen. Goosebumps formed on her sweat-slicked skin. The Marquis’s manhood twitched and convulsed several times as it released, his arms supporting his body while he caught his breath. She could see beads of sweat on his disheveled platinum hair.

His furrowed brow and flushed eyes gave a glimpse of raw excitement. Liv, lying beneath him, stared at his face, entranced. Just as before, the Marquis maintained his composure during the act, only revealing unrestrained passion at the peak.

Liv instinctively tightened her lower muscles. The moment her contracting walls squeezed the base of his still-buried length, the Marquis’s hazy eyes sharpened.

 Even after climaxing, his member remained inside her. Despite reaching orgasm, it hadn’t softened in the slightest, maintaining its hardness and completely filling her inner walls. Liv, who had been staring at the Marquis’s face, traced her own abdomen. Beneath her sticky skin, there was something solid.

Noticing her movement, the Marquis narrowed his eyes. He lifted the hand that had been resting on the table and began caressing Liv’s chin and lips, speaking slowly, “Why did Lady Malte’s name suddenly come out of this mouth?”

His voice was husky, still carrying remnants of the recent climax. The slightly lowered tone, the unwithdrawn member, and the faint blush in his eyes—all of it only heightened Liv’s excitement. She couldn’t help it; her inner muscles kept clenching involuntarily.

Each time that happened, his erection seemed to grow even harder. It wasn’t an illusion.

“Answer.”

The Marquis inserted his thumb between her lips, quietly demanding an answer. Liv shivered slightly as his skin touched her tongue, hurriedly finding her voice.

“M-Million mentioned it offhand… Ngh.”

Liv couldn’t finish her sentence and let out a groan. His still fully engorged member had started to pull back slowly.

Just as she thought it was going to withdraw completely, the tip lingered briefly before plunging back inside to the base.

Thud!

“Hng!”

“Aren’t you too easily believing the unverified words of a student?”

Despite the cynical tone of his voice, the Marquis’s lower body was hot as it pressed deeply into her.

“I-I didn’t believe it!”

“And on top of that, associating with someone investigating people behind their backs. You’re not exactly at an age where you need to be told to keep better company.”

“No, that’s not… Ah! Ah!”

As if to punish her, his thrusts pounded her inner walls forcefully. Sweat, heated without any time to cool, trickled down from her forehead to her eyes.

Liv let out a whimper that sounded almost like a sob, frowning slightly at the stinging sensation. The Marquis gently wiped away her sweat, stroking her temples tenderly.

His thrusts were slow and deliberate, as heavy as his hand.

“By the way, Teacher, you seem to have taken quite an active interest for someone who was just planning to take what was given.”

The Marquis’s strong arm slipped behind Liv’s arched back. Supporting her waist, he lifted Liv’s upper body in one swift motion.

Her previously limp body was hoisted up, and she found herself sitting on the edge of the table, clinging to the Marquis. Of course, his member was still inside her.

“…It seems you’ve been picking up all sorts of things lately,” muttered the Marquis, sounding almost amused, as he gripped Liv’s hips.

Liv, who had been weakly leaning against him, gasped and clung to his neck in surprise. The Marquis, as if expecting it, lifted her again. Her body floated, and she hurriedly tightened her grip around him.

“Ngh!”

In her precarious position, she tensed up completely. Naturally, her lower abdomen clenched, making the presence of his member even more pronounced. It was an unbelievably deep penetration.

“W-wait, I might fall!”

“I never let go of what I catch.”

The Marquis consoled her with a surprisingly gentle voice, almost amused by how desperately Liv clung to him.

“If I ever do let go, it would probably be because I’ve grown tired of it.”

Sweat trickled down Liv’s spine. The Marquis tightened his grip on her slippery body, muttering with a long sigh.

“But this is only our second time, isn’t it?”

The Marquis’s breath touched the nape of Liv’s neck, where her sweat-soaked hair clung.

“It’s too early to grow tired of it.”

The Marquis’s hips began moving slowly, thrusting upward. Liv’s mind blurred into a haze.

 



 

Being the second time didn’t mean anything had improved.

If anything, her entire body ached more intensely than it had after their first time. It seemed doing it on the dining table had been a mistake. On top of that, being in such an unstable, suspended position…

For Liv, who had only vaguely imagined that sex was something done lying down on a bed, this experience was utterly shocking. The changing sensations with each position also startled her.

Later, she had to balance on one leg while he held the other, struggling to keep her footing due to the difference in their height. Her body had trembled so much as she stood on tiptoe, trying to bear it.

Her calves and thighs had become so sore that Liv had to sit and massage herself whenever she could while doing housework. It was a muscle ache that would naturally improve with time, but the Marquis’s words from before echoed in her mind.

 

“I’m not sure I can always give you as much time to recover as I did this time.”

 

That was what he had said.

Of course, he might have forgotten it by now, since it had been said in passing. Or he might not call her for a while, having satisfied his desire…

‘But you never know.’

That was just the feeling she had.

And whether it was good or bad luck, Liv’s premonition proved accurate. Two days later, she was faced with the carriage that came to pick her up. Still sore from her previous muscle pain, she endured the Marquis again, resulting in even more intense aftereffects than after their second encounter.

The problem was that the carriage came again three days later. After that, the frequency of her extra duties increased significantly.

The Marquis did not hold back. When he wanted something, he reached out and took it without hesitation. Since Liv did not refuse him, it didn’t take long for her extra work to turn into something different. In just a few weeks, Liv naturally anticipated intimacy with the Marquis every time she was summoned to his mansion.

But that didn’t make it any less exhausting.

“You don’t look well, Miss Rodaise.”

Liv, moving her limp body mechanically, suddenly looked up. She met Philip’s concerned gaze and felt her face flush for no reason. It wasn’t as if he could see inside her mind.

Today, she was at the Berryworth mansion again.

But today, it wasn’t for extra work; it was because of Corida’s treatment. Corida’s recovery was progressing smoothly, and her medication was adjusted accordingly. Thierry had said that Corida’s progress was thanks to her consistent physical care.

Perhaps encouraged by Thierry’s praise, Corida devoted herself even more diligently to her recovery. Today, she actively underwent her treatment before heading to the study with Adolf. It seemed they had pre-arranged something, as she announced she’d be in the study for at least three hours.

According to Adolf, he planned to introduce her to a suitable reading companion. Liv had no reason to object. Thus, she found herself once again waiting idly for Corida. And as if he knew of her situation, the Marquis summoned her through Philip.

“Dr. Gertrude hasn’t left the mansion yet. Would you like a check-up?”

“No, I’m fine.”

Liv blushed and quickly waved her hands.

“You don’t have to force yourself to answer the master’s call. I can tell him you’re not feeling well.”

“Really, I’m alright. I just… haven’t had enough sleep.”

She couldn’t possibly admit that she was exhausted from rolling around with the master of the house.

“Oh, I see.”

“I’m truly fine. It’s nothing serious.”

Seeing Liv adamantly refuse the check-up, Philip didn’t press her further. Instead, he brightened his voice and changed the subject.

“The area near the hunting grounds is ideal for horseback riding. The flowers are in full bloom, making it a lovely sight.”

“I see.”

Hearing about riding horses naturally reminded her of the hunting grounds she had once visited.

Was he planning to go hunting again today? It didn’t matter to her, but getting on a horse seemed worrying. Her waist hurt, her thighs were sore, and most of all, her groin was uncomfortable.

Her riding skills weren’t great to begin with, and getting on a horse in her current condition would likely lead to her falling off. Liv decided she should convey her situation to the Marquis when she got the chance.

But she didn’t need to do that. Philip discreetly informed the Marquis that Liv wasn’t feeling well. Though his explanation was vague, the Marquis immediately ordered the riding preparations to be canceled. Then he suggested they visit the glass greenhouse instead, taking the lead.

“Are you alright not to go horseback riding?”

Watching the Marquis walking ahead of her, Liv spoke up first. At her question, the Marquis turned his head halfway, glancing at her.

“You aren’t feeling well.”

“It’s not that I’m unwell…”

Liv hesitated, glancing down.

“Were you planning to go hunting?”

“I was actually considering helping improve your dreadful stamina, even just a little. There are plenty of places around the estate suitable for horseback riding, even if it’s not for hunting.”

The Marquis seemed to have a sense of why Liv wasn’t feeling well. Although it wasn’t her fault, she couldn’t help but feel a bit embarrassed and cleared her throat unnecessarily. Whether he was aware of her feelings or not, the Marquis turned his gaze forward again.

“Of course, most of the time, I do go hunting.”

 Liv thought of the hunting grounds she had visited for the first time with the Marquis.

She had never accompanied nobles on a hunt before, but she had heard about it, thanks to her noble classmates at Clemence, who had grown up riding horses through hunting grounds since childhood.

Some of them not only owned private hunting grounds but also hosted hunting competitions regularly. As far as Liv knew, hunting competitions were one of the main social events for nobles.

“What happens to the animals that are hunted?”

“They’re sometimes butchered, sometimes made into trophies, and sometimes just killed pointlessly.”

The two soon arrived at the glass greenhouse. It seemed it had been recently reorganized, as the types of flowers decorating the interior had changed slightly.

More green foliage was visible than flowers. Large-leaved trees had been newly planted here and there, making it impossible to see who was inside from the entrance.

Liv’s wandering eyes caught sight of the golden kingfisher. The taxidermy was still in the same spot as before. It still didn’t look as if it was being well-treated.

He probably didn’t make trophies of all the animals he hunted. The Marquis was a man who wanted to own what he found valuable.

But it didn’t seem like he had a particular hobby of hunting rare animals either. On the contrary, according to Camille, the Marquis had a penchant for collecting nude artworks.

“Is it only art that you collect? …Statues or paintings, for instance.”

The Marquis checked where Liv’s gaze had fallen and gave a cold smile.

“One can’t taxidermy a human.”

It was a somewhat chilling answer. To say he collected statues or paintings because humans couldn’t be made into taxidermy.

She didn’t know the reason, but one thing was clear: the Marquis did not favor things brimming with life. Liv imagined a gallery filled with the expensive statues and paintings he had collected.

If it were just one or two, it might be different, but she felt that a room filled with such things wouldn’t look impressive at all.

But for the Marquis…

“You seem to be familiar with death.”

The Marquis, who was casually passing by the kingfisher, paused. He looked back at Liv with an expression that suggested her words were unexpected. Then, with an indifferent attitude, he nodded.

Encouraged by the Marquis’s lack of evasiveness, Liv cautiously continued her question.

“Have you been to war?”

“Do I look like it?”

“You seem familiar with weapons and killing.”

At the innermost part of the glass greenhouse, there was an outdoor bench covered with soft cushions and a table. On the table, there were a few books left open, suggesting that this was a place the Marquis often frequented.

The Marquis sat down on the bench, leaning back comfortably, and looked at Liv.

“You’re not afraid of that, it seems.”

“Unless you’re going to use those things against me, there’s no reason for me to be afraid.”

There were no other chairs besides the long outdoor bench. Instead of sitting beside the Marquis, Liv approached the table.

She saw a bookmark sticking out of the top of one of the books. Judging by the title on the cover, it seemed to be a humanities book.

The title was written in delicate cursive. It wasn’t hard to imagine the Marquis holding this book. Even a trivial book seemed to enhance the Marquis’s presence.

Without realizing it, Liv traced the title with her fingertip. The embossed texture tickled her fingers.

“Then, what are you afraid of, Teacher?”

Liv paused, her fingertip tracing the cursive script. Slowly blinking, she lifted her gaze.

What was she afraid of? There were too many things. Even the handsome man in front of her was a kind of fear for Liv.

Corida’s health, the constant pressure of money, the occasional difficult situations…

All of these fears were encapsulated in the words that escaped Liv’s lips.

“Survival.”

“You sound like a soldier who has survived a battlefield.”

“A battlefield doesn’t have to be covered in gunpowder and bullets.”

Liv gave a bitter smile. The Marquis rested one arm across the backrest of the bench, crossed his legs, and tilted his head slightly.

“If you graduated from Clemence, your circumstances couldn’t have been bad enough to complain about.”

“Clemence is… a good school. Since the admission fee is high, it has a variety of scholarships that even commoners can dream of. There are certain conditions, but I was fortunate enough to meet those conditions.”

Clemence Boarding School was the only achievement in Liv’s life that she could boast about. When she was admitted, she firmly believed that graduating from Clemence would improve her life.

So she endured. To not let down her parents, who supported her boarding life. And to be at least somewhat like her diverse and glamorous classmates.

“Conditions?”

“Not being a noble, having no pride, being moderately attractive, and having good grades.”

Liv listed the conditions matter-of-factly and gave a faint smile.

“The school needs a pitiable yet diligent commoner student to present each year.”

“I didn’t know looks and pride were part of the conditions.”

“You have to look decent since you’re supposed to go around school events thanking people for their pity. And you need to have no pride, enough to endure the implicit scorn of your peers.”

The hardest time was right after she was admitted. Children’s malice was pure and unrefined.

In the small society of a school, it didn’t take long for students’ backgrounds and statuses to become known. That determined each student’s starting line.

And that wasn’t the end. At that starting line, commoner students were filtered again. The school needed a voice to praise its name—a voice that would come from the recipient of the prestigious scholarship.

For several years of rehearsed gratitude speeches, a substantial portion of the high tuition was waived. Liv had no reason to refuse.

Because of that, as soon as she entered, she became the target of envy and mockery from both her commoner and noble classmates… But after enduring for a few years, she became accustomed to school life and made good friends, regardless of their status.

“The scholarships given to commoner students come from donations made by noble students when they enter. Donors want to see proof of their generosity.”

“So you were discriminated against because you couldn’t make donations.”

“I don’t see it as discrimination. At that time, I received a far better education than my peers in the neighborhood, all thanks to Clemence’s scholarship. That’s why I’m able to earn money now. How could I say I was discriminated against? I was just fulfilling the role I had in my position.”

The boarding school life was long, and within it, Liv saw a small class society. She learned where those with power and those without it stood, and what roles they played.

Knowing one’s place was the first rule of survival for the weak.

“You have an uncanny ability to know your place, Teacher.”

“If I didn’t, I wouldn’t survive.”

“Do you know anyone who didn’t survive because they didn’t know their place?”

Liv’s light expression subtly hardened. The Marquis saw this change but continued speaking without hesitation.

“Your parents?”

“I don’t know what you mean.”

She had already guessed that he had investigated her. Perhaps he knew more details than she imagined. However, she doubted that the report included anything about her “parents who dreamed of social ascension.”

Liv forced down the nauseous feeling in her stomach and gave an awkward smile.

“You probably already know from your investigation, but my parents died in an unfortunate accident.”

“I heard they were well-known artisans. No matter how suddenly they died, it’s surprising that the two sisters left behind ended up struggling financially like this.”

“The financial hardship… was due to several factors overlapping.”

After Liv barely managed to graduate from Clemence and had to care for the ailing Corida, the family’s situation became strained. On top of that, around that time, the demand for their crafts decreased, which eroded their remaining funds. Before they could recover, her parents passed away, sealing their fate.

But all of it was in the past, a story that held no meaning now. Liv wanted to move away from this uncomfortable topic as soon as possible.

However, it seemed the Marquis had a different view.

“I heard there were many rumors about you during your school days. And your reputation wasn’t good when you worked as a live-in tutor.”

Liv averted her eyes, her face betraying a flinch. The Marquis continued speaking regardless.

“My aide suspects that you’re aiming to become a nobleman’s mistress.”

“If I were aiming for such a position…!”

“I told him you’d already have achieved it if you were.”

The words Liv had been about to say came out of the Marquis’s mouth instead.

He continued to look at her, lounging comfortably. Once he closed his mouth, silence filled the glass greenhouse. Even the usual sound of insects was absent.

It felt as if everything had disappeared, leaving only the Marquis and herself.

The beautiful and vast glass greenhouse felt like an otherworldly space belonging solely to the two of them.

 Liv, who had been staring blankly at the Marquis, withdrew her hand from the book she had been fidgeting with. Slowly, she walked over to sit beside the Marquis, folding her hands neatly in her lap.

“There was a senior who thought I wouldn’t have been able to enroll if not for their family’s donation.”

The phrase “expensive boarding school” only applied to Liv’s perspective. The only reason she could even enroll was because the school’s main revenue came from a small number of large donors.

“Clemence was a boarding school, and I couldn’t avoid that senior entirely. Thanks to that, we clashed a little, but I also had a lot of good noble friends around me. Thanks to their goodwill, things never escalated into a huge problem. There were some rumors, but nothing serious enough to stop me from graduating.”

It was a story from her school days that she had never told anyone. After graduation, she thought it was all meaningless farce and never dwelled on it.

“Half-hearted goodwill can be worse than none at all.”

“But it’s still goodwill.”

Within the school, that goodwill held great power.

Outside the school, however, that goodwill was meaningless and powerless.

“But you’re right, Marquis. Yes, that goodwill only ensured momentary safety and did not provide lasting protection. Around the time I graduated, that senior’s parents deliberately found fault with my parents’ handcrafted goods. It severely impacted their orders.”

Liv only found out about it long after graduation. She had assumed the changing market trends were the cause, but it wasn’t.

Who would have thought that a bad connection from her school days would return in such a way?

“Still… my parents’ deaths were just an unfortunate accident.”

Immediately after her parents passed, she had hoped for help from the “friends from good families” she had made or from the “upper-class boys” who had liked her. However, outside the school, their world and her world were different.

Even if her parents worked tirelessly on commissions from nobles, they couldn’t escape being craftsmen who lived off orders.

“When I worked as a live-in tutor, it was just a common scuffle.”

The trouble at the first house she worked for, Viscount Karin’s family, was relatively simple. The eldest son kept flirting with her. The viscount and his wife blamed everything on the young tutor.

Then there was Count Lucette’s family… They blamed Liv for their child’s poor academic performance, claiming it was due to her incompetence.

These were surprisingly common occurrences. Not all parents were the same. Liv never thought her experiences were unique.

As Liv spoke calmly, the Marquis muttered to himself, “It seems you were more popular than I thought.”

“Coming from you, Marquis, it sounds like pure sarcasm.”

Popular? She never imagined she would hear such a thing from the famous Marquis Daaemon Dietrion. Being praised for her popularity by someone like him, with his looks, felt more like being teased.

“If you were exceptionally dazzling, they wouldn’t have dared to touch you.”

Liv, who had been smiling faintly, looked up at his words. The Marquis’s long arm, which was resting on the back of the bench, easily reached Liv.

“But you are… just attractive enough to be approachable.”

The fingers in white gloves gently brushed against Liv’s cheek.

“In most cases, that means one finds oneself in a rather tough situation.”

It was a playful yet ticklish touch, like one petting an adorable animal.

Allowing that hand to caress her cheek, Liv responded calmly, “Do you know someone like that? Someone who was just attractive enough to be approachable?”

“Yes.”

The Marquis answered in a barely audible voice, “And that person died. In an unfortunate accident.”

Was it because of his unusually low voice? Or because of the silence surrounding them? It sounded almost like a confession.

“Thanks to that, I learned that one must be dazzling enough that no one dares to approach.”

Who could he be talking about?

Curiosity surged, but Liv dared not ask. She sensed that even if she asked, she wouldn’t receive an answer.

The Marquis gave a faint sneer at Liv’s silence. His arrogant face carried the certainty that his judgment was absolutely right.

Seeing that confidence, Liv suddenly spoke, “I don’t know if you’re someone no one would dare to touch.”

Liv turned her head slightly. The fingertips that had been playfully tapping her cheek paused in the air. Liv’s gaze fixed on that hand.

Thanks to the Marquis removing his gloves during their time together, Liv now knew what his bare hands looked like. The real appearance hidden under the gloves.

“Beautiful roses have thorns, but there is always someone willing to reach out and risk getting pricked.”

The Marquis narrowed his eyes at Liv’s response.

“Then I would commend them for their courage.”

His relaxed tone urged Liv forward.

“Would you try it, Teacher?”

“Would it be alright?”

“Why wouldn’t it be? After all, it won’t be me who bleeds from the thorns, but you.”

His arrogant assurance made Liv chuckle involuntarily.

“Even roses feel pain when their branches are broken.”

Being armed with thorns means one is more fearful than most.

Perhaps the Marquis was the same.

“A broken rose branch eventually withers, Marquis.”

The leisurely expression on the Marquis’s face gradually disappeared. Finally, his usual cold, expressionless face emerged.

“So are you just going to watch?”

He seemed ready to rise from his seat. At that moment, Liv reached out and grabbed his hand, which was moving away.

Compared to the indifferent way he had touched her cheek, Liv’s contact was cautious. The Marquis’s lips curled as if to mock her, but Liv tugged at the end of his white glove.

Slip.

The glove came off smoothly.

Seeing his bare hand with a clear mind felt different from seeing it clouded by pleasure. Since the Marquis didn’t pull his hand away, Liv had the opportunity to closely observe and touch his hand.

His fingers were thick and knobby, the veins on the back of his hand protruding as they ran up his forearm. His palm was rough, with calluses that made it far from smooth.

It was the hand that had rubbed her inner thighs, reaching deep inside her to scramble her thoughts. She knew how powerfully this hand could grasp her flesh.

Liv, touching the veins on the back of his hand in fascination, pressed her thumb between his fingers. There was a scar between them that one wouldn’t notice unless looking closely.

“Were you curious about that?”

The Marquis, quietly allowing Liv to hold his hand, twisted his lips slightly.

“I remember nearly losing my finger when I caught a blade barehanded.”

Liv, who had been touching the scar between his fingers, looked up and met the Marquis’s eyes.

“Did you win?”

The Marquis raised his eyebrows as if surprised by the question. After a brief pause, he answered in a slightly lowered voice, “Yes.”

Upon hearing his answer, Liv smiled brightly. “Then this scar is a medal of victory.”

The hand that bore an unerasable victory mark instantly grabbed Liv by the back of her neck, pulling her into his embrace. Losing her balance, Liv fell forward into his arms.

His breathing, suddenly urgent, invaded her tender lips. It was a more forceful, aggressive kiss than usual, poured onto her without restraint.

In the once-quiet glass greenhouse, the faint sounds of their heavy breathing echoed softly.

 



 

The first scar on Daaemon’s  body came from his time at the military academy.

Academies were generally closed-off institutions, but military academies, in particular, operated under their own rules.

What might be overlooked elsewhere held no flexibility there—a world of its own.

In groups of boys, strength typically established hierarchy, and at the military academy, power coexisted with status.

Students who had both naturally became predators, those with one aligned with the powerful, and those with neither were prey, supporting the hierarchy from the lowest place.

When Daaemon first enrolled, he was among the prey.

He had talent, but compared to noble children who had been groomed since childhood, he was like a raw gem still covered in mud. He faced considerable hardships to wash off that mud and reveal the brilliance of a polished gem.

Officially, live blade duels were forbidden by the academy rules, but naturally, predators were not bound by such trivialities.

Young boys full of energy sought out stimulating events, often wielding real swords for excitement. And at the end of those swords stood the prey—boys like Daaemon.

Facing an opponent armed with a live blade, Daaemon had no weapons.

That day, when he caught the blade with his bare hand, he nearly lost his finger. The school nurse recognized the wound on Daaemon’s  hand and reported him to the disciplinary committee for evidence of a rule violation. Naturally, the one who had wielded the sword escaped unscathed.

Luckily, he avoided expulsion. He received punishment for violating school regulations, but that was all.

‘It was an incident like that.’

 Grabbing a blade with one’s bare hand—a display that the predators at the academy seemed to find quite fascinating. They didn’t know that Daaemon had calculated that the improperly maintained blade wouldn’t sever his fingers.

As a result, Daaemon drew their attention, and over time, his position within the academy solidified. His rapidly improving skills further bolstered his standing.

There was no point in reflecting on the hardships of those days with self-pity. He knew well how worthless such emotions were.

But…

“Did you win?”

The “yes” he had given was literal. He had won a match that had clearly been to his disadvantage—an objective fact.

“Then this scar is a medal of victory.”

Daaemon had never thought of himself as having “won” back then.

It was a humiliating, insignificant part of his past. He had used trickery, and attaching a grand word like “victory” to it seemed almost laughable.

The idea that barely scraping by, with such a shameful scar, was a victory? A true victory should be brighter, more magnificent.

Daaemon gazed at the scar between his fingers, releasing a long breath.

 

“Did you win?”

 

It was an unexpected question.

Before he had started obsessively concealing his scars, the first thing people would say upon seeing them was usually something like, “It must have hurt a lot,” with pity, or “How did it happen?” They were questions that made Daaemon profoundly uncomfortable.

He had no desire for sympathy about his pain, nor any wish to revisit his past.

“Ha…”

The image of Liv’s innocent smile after he had said he had won came to his mind. She seemed genuine.

Did she really see this scar as a testament to his victory?

I wonder if she’d say the same after seeing all the other scars covering my body.

Victorious? All those ugly marks?

How foolish.

 

“Beautiful roses have thorns, but there is always someone willing to reach out and risk getting pricked.”

 

How bold, indeed. To say something like that about me. If one were to analyze their relationship, he was the predator wielding a blade, while she stood before him, defenseless.

Daaemon rubbed the scar near his thumb, then stood up. He didn’t feel like smoking or drinking. Instead, a different kind of thirst overtook him. Though, of course, whenever he gave the order, she would appear before him…

 

“Even roses feel pain when their branches are broken.”

 

For some reason, he didn’t want to quench the dryness he felt at that moment.

Instead, he just stared blankly out the darkened window. The outside world was obscured from view.

It looked as if he stood there alone, in the dark.

Perhaps, that was true.

 

“A broken rose branch eventually withers, Marquis.”

 



 

The atmosphere in Buerno grew more vibrant by the day.

The Cardinal’s visit was approaching, and many events were planned throughout the city, as if preparing for a festival. Naturally, under such festive conditions, classes could hardly proceed smoothly.

Moreover, when news spread that Marquis Dietrion would not be hosting the Cardinal and his pilgrimage group, the Pendence family began preparations for receiving guests.

Baroness Pendence wanted to continue lessons despite the disarray in the manor, but when she saw Million’s excitement at the prospect of meeting the pilgrims, she soon gave up.

In the end, the Baroness apologized to Liv. In the past, the disruption to her income would have caused Liv great stress, but her situation had improved significantly, and she was more than happy to accept the special circumstances.

With her originally scheduled lesson postponed, Liv decided to head straight home. She had no desire to linger and deal with the bustle at the Pendence estate.

So she had planned to leave quickly, but…

“Why do I need to take a carriage with Teacher Marcel?”

“Because Baroness Pendence insisted on it.”

Liv understood that the Pendence estate was busy due to the sudden change of plans regarding the Cardinal’s visit. It made sense that Camille had been roped in to help; he did have acquaintances among the pilgrims, after all.

He had been tasked by the Baroness with escorting her in a carriage, and their destination happened to be Liv’s home in the Femon district.

 

“I ordered a cake for you, Teacher Rodaise, from a shop near Femon. Why not stop by and pick it up? I was planning to send it with a servant this evening, but wouldn’t it be better to have it fresh? A servant will guide you.”

 

Baroness Pendence seemed genuinely apologetic for changing the schedule. Given the busy state of the estate, sending a servant specifically to deliver a cake seemed needlessly troublesome. So Liv offered to collect the cake herself on the way home.

It wasn’t far, and she had intended to walk at her own pace. However, the Baroness had insisted, apologizing for not preparing in advance and all but pushing her into the carriage.

“It’s a short walk.”

Camille replied to Liv’s mumbled complaint with a light laugh.

“Maybe she wanted to support me a little too.”

“Support? No, please don’t explain.”

Come to think of it, wasn’t it Camille who had said something strange to Baron Pendence? Liv hadn’t realized that Baroness Pendence was as interested in romantic affairs as her husband.

She’d have to speak to them about this awkward situation later. If she didn’t, this sort of meddling might happen repeatedly.

Feeling a headache coming on, Liv pressed her fingers to her temple. Camille, noticing her discomfort, gave her an awkward smile.

“My honest confession didn’t earn me any trust, did it?”

Did he truly think that revealing his identity and intentions would make everything better between them? Such naivety.

Or perhaps Camille’s life had always gone smoothly, in just that way.

Liv, biting her lip, stared directly at Camille, who sat across from her.

“I have no romantic interest in you, Teacher Marcel.”

“…Oh.”

“And this kind of forced meeting makes me uncomfortable.”

Camille blinked at Liv’s blunt rejection. He frowned slightly, scratching his cheek awkwardly, then gave a resigned smile.

“You’re even more indifferent now that you know I’m from Eleonore.”

“Were you trying to intimidate me?”

“Of course not.”

Camille waved his hand in denial as if the notion was absurd. Liv, watching him, softened her tone slightly.

“You were honest with me, so I’m being honest with you. Otherwise, you’d just keep pretending not to know.”

“Understood… for now.”

Understood, for now? What did he mean by “for now”?

Camille’s answer, dripping with lingering hope, made Liv frown. But Camille seemed lost in thought, rubbing his chin. After a moment, he spoke up.

“I have to ask, though—I’m genuinely curious.”

“Go ahead.”

“Am I really that unattractive?”

He looked genuinely puzzled, as if he couldn’t comprehend her lack of interest. Seeing his unshakeable confidence, Liv hesitated, opening her mouth but failing to answer right away.

Finally, she managed to reply.

“Attraction isn’t something that can be measured objectively.”

“I know, but… I’m not exactly someone who gets rejected everywhere I go. I’ve never been this insistent before.”

“Well, maybe being insistent for the first time is the problem.”

“Ah.”

Camille let out a small sound of realization, as if Liv’s comment had given him new insight. Though Liv had said it offhandedly, it seemed Camille had taken it to heart.

To be honest, Liv didn’t think Camille was someone who would be rejected often. Under different circumstances, she might have found him appealing.

But regardless of whether she was in a position to engage in carefree romance, Liv simply couldn’t find Camille attractive in that way.

She was already deeply entangled with the Marquis.

“Oh, they’re building an outdoor theater over there. I heard they’ll be putting on a play to welcome the pilgrims…”

Camille, who had been gazing out the window, leaned closer to get a better look. His recovery was remarkably quick, especially for someone who had just been rejected.

“If you have time, you should see it. The play they’re putting on is supposed to be quite good.”

“Do you usually watch outdoor plays?”

“Of course.”

Camille seemed to understand what Liv was implying with her question. He shrugged, his explanation flowing smoothly, as if he’d said it many times before.

“If I don’t introduce myself as being from Eleonore, no one associates me with that family. I enjoy street culture quite a bit.”

Indeed, from his appearance to his demeanor, nothing about Camille screamed the son of a prominent noble family.

“That reminds me—they’re planning an outdoor exhibition near the museum too. It seems it was organized on short notice, so they haven’t gathered many pieces yet, but they should have everything ready before the Cardinal arrives.”

Camille’s words prompted Liv to look out the window as well. She had thought the passing scenery looked the same as always, but now she noticed changes she hadn’t seen before—preparations for the Cardinal’s visit.

How much of this would actually affect her life?

“It looks like the streets will be bustling. Maybe you should take a day to enjoy yourself, Teacher Rodaise…”

As Camille excitedly continued, Liv caught his gaze and he immediately raised his hands in surrender.

“Alright, alright. I’ll stop trying to flirt.”

 Camille, looking disappointed, glanced at Liv’s reaction before slowly speaking up, “But you are interested in the blessing prayer led by the Cardinal, aren’t you?”

One of the reasons people were excited about the Cardinal’s visit was because he would offer a blessing prayer for peace in the city. Naturally, everyone wanted to see the prayer in person.

However, just because they wanted to see it didn’t mean they could. It wasn’t just anyone conducting the prayer—it was the Cardinal himself.

“I heard the chapel’s seating is limited, and those allowed to enter have already been decided.”

“I’m one of those people.”

Liv didn’t know if it was because of Baroness Pendence’s favor or the influence of his family name, Eleonore. It was probably one of the two.

It wasn’t surprising, so Liv just nodded calmly. Then Camille lowered his voice and whispered, “I can bring a companion, but as I’ve said before, I haven’t formed any ties in this city. My seat will be empty.”

“Then sell the seat.”

There were plenty of people who would be willing to pay extra just to get into the chapel and witness the Cardinal’s prayer.

Camille burst out laughing at Liv’s sharp reply, teasing her playfully.

“Would you like to buy it, Teacher?”

“No, I’m fine.”

“But they say seeing the Cardinal’s blessing prayer brings good fortune.”

Good fortune from the Cardinal’s prayer.

A few months ago, she might have been swayed by such an uncertain superstition, even going as far as asking to be taken along without shame. But surprisingly, now Liv wasn’t tempted at all.

“That kind of fortune seems a bit too much for me. I…”

Because she had already met someone who gave her all the luck she needed.

“I’m already perfectly satisfied.”

 



 

It was difficult to shake off Camille, who offered to escort her home, but the cake had been worth the trouble.

Since starting her treatment, Corida had been on a controlled diet, so she couldn’t eat much, but she seemed disappointed not to have more. She even promised to buy it again once she recovered.

In the end, it seemed like a good motivator for her treatment, which was a positive outcome.

The cake was delicious to Liv as well—so good that she even considered ordering another to bring to the Berryworth mansion. However, she decided against it.

‘There’s a resident chef in the mansion, and they might find it offensive.’

Though the cake was delicious, she thought the Berryworth mansion’s chef might not appreciate outside food.

Still, she found herself wanting to express her gratitude in some small way if an opportunity presented itself. She felt the need to show some token of appreciation to those who consistently looked after her and Corida, such as Philip and Adolf.

Of course, their kindness wouldn’t have existed without the Marquis’s orders, but they were always kind and friendly regardless.

Most of all, Liv was grateful for how they took care of Corida. Since starting to visit Berryworth Mansion, Liv had noticed a visible improvement in Corida’s mood.

‘Isn’t there something I could give as a gift?’

As Liv entered the now familiar entrance of Berryworth Mansion, she found herself watching Philip’s back with curiosity.

Perhaps sensing her gaze, Philip turned around and gave her a kind smile.

“Is there something you wish to say?”

“Oh, no, nothing in particular.”

If she asked him directly, he would likely refuse politely. Liv decided to think more about a suitable gift and settled on expressing her gratitude for now.

“I heard you lent Corida a book. Thank you so much.”

These days, Corida was enthusiastic about everything. The time she spent in the library with Adolf must have motivated her in some way. Philip seemed to find Corida’s enthusiasm very endearing—so much so that a stranger might mistake his care for that of a grandfather doting on his granddaughter.

“Miss Corida treats the books with care, so I have no problem lending them. By the way, Miss Cyril seems interested in spending more time with Corida. Is it still difficult for her to go out? I’m not well-informed about Miss Corida’s health.”

“Ah… That might be a bit difficult for now. But it’s very kind of you to mention it.”

Cyril Avilio was a reading companion Adolf had introduced to Corida. She was a girl the same age as Corida and a student from Mazurkan, studying abroad for a short time in Beren.

Originally studying in a major city, Cyril had decided to travel in Beren before returning to Mazurkan after her exchange program ended.

During her travels, Adolf—who knew Cyril’s relatives—had suggested introducing her to Corida, and Cyril had eagerly accepted the chance to meet a new friend.

From Liv’s perspective, Corida and Cyril seemed to get along very well. In fact, they had become friends within a day and started exchanging letters almost daily. Liv couldn’t understand what they could possibly talk about so much, but each letter was several pages long.

“Haha, it’s wonderful that Miss Cyril has made such a good friend. It’s enjoyable for both of them.”

“I’m so grateful for all your consideration. I don’t know how to thank you.”

“There’s no need. It’s all things I do because I enjoy them.”

“Please let me know if there’s anything I can help with.”

At Liv’s sincere offer, Philip burst out laughing. “Haha, just having you visit the mansion is enough. Without you visiting, Miss Rodaise, it would be hard to know if anyone even lives here.”

Despite his words, Liv knew that plenty of staff worked at the mansion.

Of course, even if many people lived there, it wasn’t as if life in such a remote estate would be dynamic. Perhaps entertaining guests could indeed be enjoyable work for them.

Liv, smiling at Philip’s response, asked lightly, “Does Mr. Philemond stay here at Berryworth Mansion?”

“Technically, he comes and goes, depending on the Marquis’s needs.”

“Comes and goes?”

Liv looked puzzled. Philip nodded, just about to explain when a nonchalant voice interrupted them.

“He also manages the main residence.”

Both Philip and Liv turned their attention toward the sound. At the top of the staircase, with one hand resting lightly on the banister, stood the Marquis, looking down at them.

Liv looked up at the Marquis, surprised, having assumed he would be waiting for her in his room.

Unlike his usual casual attire, today the Marquis wore formal outerwear, buttoned up to his neck.

He spoke slowly as he descended the stairs, adding casually, “He travels back and forth between Langess Mansion and Berryworth Mansion.”

“Langess—the mansion rumored to house taxidermy, right…?” Liv muttered without thinking, then suddenly closed her lips. Philip, who had overheard her, chuckled softly. “The Langess Mansion used to be known as the haunted mansion in Buerno. Because of that, there have been spooky rumors circulating about it for ages. But after the Master purchased and completely renovated it, it’s now just an elegant old mansion.”

The Langess Mansion belonged to the Marquis of Dietrion.

Whether it was truly his main residence or just a place he conveniently called his main residence remained unclear.

“It’s a shame you came here today, as I need to return to Langess.”

“Oh…”

“Philip, prepare for departure.”

The Marquis, now at the bottom of the stairs, gave Philip a curt command. Philip nodded immediately, turning to tell Liv he would prepare a carriage for her and asking her to wait just a moment.

Liv, who had barely made it down the few steps back to the lobby, stood awkwardly, glancing at the Marquis. Though his face appeared expressionless as usual, upon closer inspection, his slightly furrowed brows hinted at his annoyance.

“…Is something wrong?” Liv asked in a low voice, causing the Marquis to glance sideways at her.

“Nothing serious, just that my personal time was interrupted. That’s reason enough to be displeased.”

“I see.”

It wasn’t something that needed to be asked. Liv nodded a bit awkwardly, lowering her gaze. The Marquis’s eyes lingered on her face for a long time.

Then, as if changing the subject out of nowhere, he asked, “Aren’t you curious?”

“Pardon?”

“Whether the rumors are true.”

Curiosity filled Liv’s eyes. The Marquis remained indifferent, but the faint irritation had now vanished.

“About the taxidermy.”

“Ah, well…!”

“Aren’t you curious if there’s really a collection of taxidermy in the basement?”

Liv wasn’t sure if she fully understood his intention. But it almost sounded like he was inviting her to Langess Mansion.

“It’s not taxidermy, but there’s something else.”

“Something else?”

The Marquis offered no further explanation, only staring at her intently.

“Miss Rodaise, the carriage is ready!”

Right then, Philip returned. He bid Liv a careful farewell, and then assisted the Marquis with his coat and hat.

The Marquis turned away from Liv, seemingly having forgotten the previous conversation entirely, and accepted Philip’s help without a word. Donning his coat and hat, he was about to leave the lobby when he suddenly paused.

The Marquis looked down, his gaze fixed on Liv’s hand, which had grabbed his sleeve.

Philip stared at Liv in surprise. Realizing her action had been somewhat childish, Liv hesitated before letting go of his sleeve.

The Marquis, who had been gazing at his now-freed sleeve, raised his head. His gloved hand extended toward Liv. Swallowing dryly, Liv carefully placed her hand in his. The firm fingers gripped her, leading her.

The black carriage Philip had prepared was no longer needed. Instead, Liv sat beside the Marquis, heading to Langess Mansion.

 As they passed through the front gate of Langess Mansion, the sky was tinged with the colors of sunset.

The mansion, set against the red-hued sky, was so grand that it was hard to believe it was the source of all those ominous rumors. Of course, neither Daaemon nor Philip showed any sign of being moved by the scenery, having grown accustomed to it.

More eye-catching than the impressive view outside was Liv Rodaise, who could not hide her astonishment.

“What do you think?”

Philip, who had played a major role in transforming the dusty old Langess mansion into what it was now, spoke to Liv with a proud expression. Liv replied, still unable to take her eyes off the approaching mansion, speaking almost to herself.

“…It’s more like a castle than a mansion, isn’t it?”

“Haha, it’s a mansion. At least for now.”

“No one would ever imagine such a splendid castle exists near Buerno.”

“It’s not a castle, but… it is impressive, isn’t it? There’s no one to boast to, so I’ve felt quite disappointed. I worked hard to make it look good, yet all it did was generate strange rumors.”

“It must be tough to maintain, Mr. Philemond.”

“Finally, someone appreciates my efforts!”

Philip kept the conversation going in his usual easygoing manner, prompting Daaemon to click his tongue softly. Liv, completely absorbed by the scenery outside, did not notice Daaemon’s  gaze at all.

He usually disliked seeing her attention diverted elsewhere, but for some reason, seeing her like this didn’t bother him.

In fact, he found it somewhat amusing. Her flushed cheeks and sparkling green eyes were rather endearing.

For someone who always tried to act so mature and composed, seeing her like this showed a more childlike side.

Liv’s behavior became more expressive as she opened her heart. Judging by her sparse personal connections, she likely showed this side of herself to only a select few.

Daaemon felt satisfied every time he confirmed that he was among that “select few.”

“Ah, there’s a visitor…”

Liv, who had been looking out with an excited expression, suddenly widened her eyes at the sight of someone.

Noticing her reaction, Daaemon also glanced out the window. There was someone standing near the mansion’s entrance, holding a horse.

It was the very person responsible for calling him here.

It seemed the person had noticed the carriage returning to the estate. His casual demeanor quickly turned formal.

As the carriage stopped, the man immediately approached. He opened the door skillfully, and upon noticing Liv sitting by the window, their eyes widened in surprise. Equally taken aback, Liv stared out with a bewildered expression.

After a moment, her gaze shifted, carefully observing Daaemon’s  expression.

“You’ll need a step to get out. I’ll go first.”

It was Philip who intervened between the two awkward individuals. He was the first to get out of the carriage and unfolded the retractable step.

“Alright, you can get out now, Miss Rodaise.”

With Philip’s escort, Liv clumsily descended from the carriage and kept her distance from the stranger. The stranger also regarded Liv with wary eyes.

Seeing the awkward tension between them, Philip tried to mediate by asking Daaemon a question.

“Shall I escort Miss Rodaise elsewhere?”

Liv’s face instantly brightened. Noticing her reaction, Daaemon twisted his lips slightly in a mischievous manner.

“No need. Just prepare a room.”

“Understood.”

Liv, who had been hoping to follow Philip, looked visibly disappointed. Her eyes followed Philip longingly as he went inside the mansion, making Daaemon feel a sudden urge to tease her even more.

Daaemon stepped out of the carriage. The stranger, who had been eyeing Liv warily, quickly saluted Daaemon.

“I had urgent news, so I contacted you without delay. I apologize, sir…”

“Sir Roman.”

Daaemon cut him off coldly.

“How many times must I correct you?”

“I will rectify it, sir.”

Roman swiftly lowered his hand, though his squared shoulders and rigid stance gave away his origins without him needing to say it. Daaemon frowned, averting his gaze indifferently.

“I’ll hear the report inside.”

“Yes, sir.”

Just as Daaemon was about to continue walking, he reached out to the side. He grabbed Liv’s arm, pulling her to his side as she was slowly attempting to retreat.

“Marquis?”

Liv’s eyes went wide in surprise as she was pulled to his side.

“What?”

Daaemon released her arm and instead placed his hand on her waist. As his fingers brushed along her slender waist, Liv’s body stiffened.

Liv glanced at Roman nervously.

“Um, well…”

“Is there a problem, Teacher?”

“N-no, my lord.”

The back of her neck and her ears flushed bright red. It wasn’t just embarrassment—it was a mix of unease and shame visible on her partially turned face.

Ignoring the emotions he noticed in her expression, Daaemon firmly pulled her close. Liv ended up nearly pressed against him as they walked.

It was an impulsive decision, but having her body close felt satisfying. Roman glanced at them curiously, but fortunately, after having been reprimanded earlier, he remained silent.

“Welcome back, Master.”

The massive front door of Langess swung open, and the household staff bowed deeply to greet their returning master. When they noticed Liv standing beside Daaemon, they looked visibly surprised.

Philip must have informed them, but they couldn’t seem to hide their reactions, likely due to their astonishment at the scene before them.

After all, Daaemon usually kept human interaction to a minimum, so seeing Liv beside him like this must have been quite the shock.

Liv seemed to feel their stares as well. Her face, already flushed from earlier, only grew redder.

She twisted her body, trying to put some distance between herself and Daaemon, but he instead pulled her closer, making her cling to him right in front of the staff.

Liv glanced at Daaemon uneasily, speaking softly, “Marquis, perhaps I should wait elsewhere.”

Her constant attempts to distance herself had initially seemed cute, but they were becoming irritating. Daaemon glanced down at the top of Liv’s bowed head.

“Come when called, go when dismissed…”

He didn’t bother finishing the sentence. But Liv likely understood the implication: “Undress when commanded.”

“Isn’t that right?”

Liv didn’t reply, but he could feel the tension drain from her rigid body. Daaemon’s  previously sinking mood lifted slightly.

The body in his grasp was soft.

 



 

I have no idea what the Marquis is thinking.

Liv sighed quietly, raising her head as she sat alone in a corner of the Marquis’s office. She had ended up being dragged along and was now left sitting there.

The Marquis was standing some distance away, listening to the report from the man named Roman. At first, Roman seemed conscious of Liv, but he couldn’t disobey the Marquis’s orders and continued his report.

Thus, Liv was forced to listen to their conversation, albeit unwillingly. Thanks to Roman’s clever omission of subjects, she couldn’t understand everything, but she was able to infer a few things.

“Considering that they managed to evade their people in the first place, they might actually be quite skilled.”

“Or maybe it’s just the influence of Eleonore.”

Not only was the Marquis well aware of Camille’s existence, but he was also keeping an eye on him. It even seemed as though he had recently tried something with Camille but had failed.

Liv lowered her gaze, trying to hide her troubled expression.

Why was the Marquis letting her hear this?

“Shall we respond more aggressively?”

“Aggressively?”

The Marquis let out a faint sneer at Roman’s suggestion.

“He hasn’t given up on hovering around Baron Pendence.”

“Are you sure it’s ‘Baron Pendence’ he’s hovering around?”

With a nonchalant expression, the Marquis pulled out a cigar case and glanced at Liv. She had been sitting as quietly as possible, but when their eyes suddenly met, she blinked in surprise.

The Marquis kept his gaze on Liv as he held a cigar between his lips. She could see the tip of his tongue flick out between his slightly parted, red lips.

“Really?”

His platinum hair fell across his tilted head.

“What do you think, Teacher?”

The Marquis’s sudden inclusion of Liv in the conversation made Roman look bewildered.

“…Marquis?”

“Sometimes it’s good to get an outside, objective opinion, don’t you think?”

The Marquis answered dismissively, lighting his cigar before addressing Liv again.

“You seem to be quite close with him, so give me your answer.”

 “We are not close.”

“Really? I don’t imagine you have many people with whom you’d ‘make time to have tea alone.'”

The Marquis, with a red-lit cigar between his lips, perched himself against a bookshelf. His long legs bent casually, the posture might have seemed relaxed, but his buttoned-up collar gave him a restrained air.

It appeared that the Marquis knew more details about her meetings with Camille than she had anticipated. It was surprising, but upon reflection, it was also understandable.

If the Marquis had been observing Camille, it would not have been difficult for him to find out.

“It’s true that we had reasons to talk, but it wasn’t the kind of closeness you think.”

It was Roman who reacted to Liv’s words, his expression hardening.

“If he intended to use this lady…”

However, Roman didn’t finish his sentence.

“Sir Roman.”

“Yes!”

Roman stopped mid-sentence at the Marquis’s call and quickly answered. The Marquis, exhaling smoke with the cigar between his fingers, asked in a bored voice.

“Have you finished your report?”

“Pardon? No, not yet…”

“I’ll hear the rest later.”

“…Pardon?”

Roman’s awkward question, spoken a beat too late, made the Marquis frown. A deep crease formed in his smooth brow.

“Are you going deaf already?”

The tone was calm and low, but there was a menace behind it. Roman, his face turning pale, quickly took a step back and answered energetically.

“Understood! I will wait!”

After confirming the Marquis’s dismissive wave, Roman bowed his head and hurriedly left the office. It was practically as if he had been chased out. What exactly was going on here?

Liv looked at the Marquis with a vague expression.

“Wasn’t there an urgent matter you came for?”

“Yes.”

“But if you put it off like this…”

The Marquis flicked the ash of his cigar into the ashtray.

“It feels like bringing you here was pointless, but I’ve already done it, so there’s no helping it.”



Liv easily understood that she was the one the Marquis referred to as having been “brought here for no reason.”

“Perhaps skipping once would be more efficient. Wouldn’t you agree?”

Liv parted her lips thoughtlessly. She stared blankly at the Marquis, who was staring back as if demanding a response, then slowly looked around the office.

It really was a well-decorated office.

An office.

In other words, a room intended for work.

“Here?”

“The desk is spacious. Plenty of room for you to lie down.”

She had already experienced something similar in the dining room, and once had been more than enough for such shameful and shocking incidents.

She might be willing to compromise up to a lounge, but she had no desire to undress in a room clearly meant for official business. And now the Marquis had postponed an urgent report.

She could guarantee that if she ended up having sex with the Marquis here, Roman would be left waiting aimlessly for at least three hours. It would certainly not end after just once, and lately, both foreplay and aftercare had been growing longer.

It was obvious what Roman would be thinking while waiting. Liv, who had already been on the receiving end of countless stares just coming here, desperately wanted to avoid such a situation.

“Since the report hasn’t been completed, perhaps we should find another way.”

Liv forced a smile, trying to persuade the Marquis. She didn’t actually expect her words to work, but surprisingly, the Marquis’s expression changed.

“Another way, you say.”

The Marquis rolled the cigar between his fingers, pausing briefly before a faint smile appeared at the corner of his mouth. His blue eyes shone with interest.

“There is a simple way.”

A way that didn’t require undressing or lengthy foreplay.

The Marquis was right. It was very simple—she just had to use her mouth. Kneeling between his legs like this.

…Of course, simplicity did not mean ease.

“Haa…”

Just a few licks with her tongue, and the head of his member had already swollen taut. Each time his thick, veined member twitched, the tip became wetter.

A low growl escaped the man above her. It was quite deep, as if he was suppressing his arousal. The sound, rumbling from deep in his throat, almost seemed animalistic.

When she wrapped both hands around his member, she could feel the weight. It was fascinating how she could sense the pulse so clearly. The Marquis let out a sigh as he watched Liv, who was simply staring at the hot rod while holding it.

The Marquis’s hand gripped the back of Liv’s head, pulling her closer. His scent filled her nostrils.

It was overwhelming to think of actually putting it in her mouth.

The Marquis’s member was thick, big, and long—so much so that it was hard to believe such a thing had entered her body.

How had she not torn apart?

“Open up.”

The Marquis’s voice was deep as he gently stroked the back of her head. Liv, mesmerized by his words, parted her lips as if hypnotized. The hot rod pressed against her tongue, pushing in.

“Open your mouth wider, use your tongue.”

The Marquis, leaning forward, whispered while lightly pulling the back of her head. Her head, which had been hesitating at the tip, suddenly plunged forward, taking in his member.

“Mmph.”

“Don’t use your teeth.”

Having never done anything like this before, Liv had no idea what she was doing. She grimaced, opening her mouth as wide as possible.

She thought she had opened wide, but the member still filled every inch of her mouth. There was certainly no room to breathe.

Unable to breathe, her mind went hazy, and her heart raced. Lack of air made every sensation sharper. She could even feel the friction on her untouched nipples, pressing against her clothes.

“Breathe through your nose.”

The Marquis used his thumb to smooth Liv’s furrowed brow, muttering irritably, “Too shallow.”

Though her mouth was already full, there was still much of the rod left untouched. The Marquis’s hand slowly moved from her forehead down along her face. He smeared her saliva around the head of his member, then held her under her chin.

“You’ve barely taken half of it, Teacher. How disappointing.”

“Guh…”

His other hand supported the back of Liv’s head. The member, which could go no further, pressed into the back of her throat. Terrified that it might go even deeper, Liv placed her hand on the Marquis’s thigh. Fortunately, he seemed to relent.

The member, which had seemed ready to advance indefinitely, slowly pulled out. The hard length dragged heavily across her tongue.

The sensation on her tongue resonated through her entire body. She couldn’t help but think of the times the Marquis had used that rod to press into her entrance, as if foreshadowing the penetration to come.

“By the way, Teacher.”

The member, with only its head remaining inside, plunged into her mouth once more. The motion was slow but deliberate. Maintaining her jaw wide open was already difficult, her jaw ached, and each deep thrust into her mouth made her gag.

Despite everything, the Marquis continued speaking calmly above her, “Sharing a carriage, stopping by a cake shop together, escorting you to your home…”

At some point, Liv simply let the Marquis control her head’s movements. She lacked both the experience and skill to do it herself.

“And yet, you’re not close?”

“Mmph!”

Just as she was getting used to it, the member abruptly thrust into her throat. Tears welled up in Liv’s eyes from the gag reflex.

“Haa… That bastard seems unable to take his eyes off you.”

His movements became rougher. The once-calm breaths of the Marquis were growing labored.

“Open wider.”

The rougher his thrusts became, the more his member scraped against her teeth. It must have hurt, but his rod showed no signs of slowing down.

Liv, gripping the Marquis’s thighs, tightly shut her eyes.

“Now that I think of it, I recall seeing the two of you together quite often before.”

Saliva, drawn out by the retreating member, dribbled down her chin. Her lips, chafed by the rough thrusts, were now flushed red.

Unable to keep up with the thrusts, Liv’s chest tightened as she struggled for breath, pushing against the rod with her tongue. It seemed her resistance only excited the Marquis further.

“Who would’ve thought I’d confirm your popularity this way.”

The thick flesh that had been filling her mouth abruptly withdrew. A line of saliva trailed from the tip to her lips.

Liv could feel the Marquis’s gaze on her tear-stained, drool-covered face. But all she could think about was trying to catch her breath.

Panting heavily, Liv looked up at the Marquis with tear-filled eyes.

“Huff, huff… Such a thing… mmph!”

As she tried to speak, the menacing rod invaded her lips once more. Liv instinctively tried to pull away, but the Marquis gripped her chin firmly, holding her still.

“Trying to sneak away won’t work. At this rate, I might as well lay you down and fuck you properly.”

The twitching rod pressed against the roof of her mouth.

“And get rid of that friend soon. What’s there to learn from associating with a hyena who snoops into others’ affairs?”

Despite her current state—being helplessly dominated by the thrusts into her throat—the Marquis’s voice was unusually clear.

Liv could finally guess why the Marquis had insisted on bringing her to this office to listen to this conversation.

He was showing her how much he disliked Camille and was silently commanding her to cut ties with him.

“I always think this—Teacher, you have no eye for people.”

The rod in her mouth seemed to swell even more.

Whether her lips had torn or not, a sharp pain stung at the corners. But the pain was nothing compared to the way his member mercilessly struck her throat.

 The Marquis now focused on the act in silence. Only the sound of his rough breathing revealed his current state.

He was aroused. The blatant reality stirred something within Liv.

She could arouse him with her clumsy and inexperienced actions.

“Ugh!”

The Marquis’s shaft tensed, swelling solidly, and a suppressed groan escaped above her head.

“Mmph!”

“Haa…”

The member in her mouth twitched significantly. The head, positioned near the root of her tongue, discharged without giving her time to spit it out, and it went straight down her throat.

The shaft, pulsating multiple times as it was seized by sharp pleasure, finally withdrew slowly after discharging every last drop into her throat.

“Huff, huff.”

Liv gasped for breath, her chest rising and falling heavily. The overwhelming scent of his seed filled her mouth, and the strange texture that remained in her throat left her tongue feeling numbed by the taste.

Everything felt strange, but the strangest part was her own body. Despite not having touched herself at all, her senses were heightened, her lower back sweaty, and her panties damp.

She felt an overwhelming urge to cling to him, to beg him to embrace her immediately.

“Oh dear, did it hurt?”

As Liv panted uncontrollably, her body filled with intense excitement, the hand that had been gripping her chin now gently stroked the corners of her mouth. The skin stung with every touch of his fingers.

She didn’t need a mirror to know that her lips had torn. Liv blinked slowly.

Sex with the Marquis was rough as it was, but the thrusts today had not just reflected his sexual preference.

There was certainly irritation behind his roughness today. And the reason for that irritation…

“You said I have no eye for people, right?” Liv spoke in a hoarse voice that resembled a metallic rasp, looking up at the Marquis.

He was still dressed impeccably, not having undone a single button. Despite his pants being neatly put together, only his member was out, a look that would seem perverse on anyone else, yet somehow, even in this state, the Marquis could excite others.

So Liv, kneeling before him, didn’t find her current position shameful or embarrassing. On the contrary, it was maddening.

“Did I misjudge you, too?”

“No.”

The response came out indifferent and flat.

“Having no eye for people has nothing to do with me.”

The shaft, despite having just climaxed, was still half erect. It jerked slightly as though it could regain its full glory with just a little stimulation, displaying its presence.

But instead of pushing the head between her lips, the Marquis stroked her swollen lips gently with his thumb, muttering to himself.

“I am your god.”

His blue eyes, still clouded with lust, held an inscrutable expression. He looked as though he wanted to strip her and crush her under him immediately, but also as if he wished to kiss the lips that had just held his member.

What was clear was that desire filled his gaze. One climax had certainly not sated his lust.

“Reality is better than imagination.”

“Did you imagine it?”

Had he imagined receiving oral pleasure from her?

He didn’t answer. Instead, he wiped his member with a handkerchief and adjusted his pants without a word. Liv looked up at him, her face showing bewilderment, as though she’d expected something more.

Having returned to his usual composed self in an instant, he opened a window himself to air out the room. Liv awkwardly stood up.

Her mouth and face were still a mess, but at least her clothes weren’t too stained. Swallowing everything had made cleaning up easier.

The Marquis checked her face and handed her an extra handkerchief.

“Go out and ask Philip to give you a tour of the mansion.”

The Marquis, watching Liv belatedly clean herself up, added in a blunt tone, “If you’re bored, you can even check if I really have taxidermy in the basement.”

When Liv mentioned wanting to see the basement, Philip was very surprised. He seemed unable to accept the fact that the Marquis had permitted entry to the basement.

Not only did Philip ask Liv multiple times to confirm the truth, but he even subtly checked with the Marquis before apologizing for doubting her and guiding her to the basement.

What kind of place was this basement that made Philip react that way?

Liv had spoken impulsively, but now she was scared.

What if she saw something she shouldn’t? What if her life was in danger?

Under normal circumstances, Liv would have been disinterested in the mansion’s secrets or eerie rumors, waiting obediently in the drawing room for the Marquis’s summons. If she had done that, she wouldn’t have to bear this worry.

‘But…’

Liv recalled the image of the Marquis just before she left the office. She felt as though he genuinely wanted to show her the basement.

Was that just her delusion?

Lost in thought, Liv suddenly looked up, realizing the surroundings had changed. The walls and the shelves were filled with an assortment of weapons.

Philip, noticing that her pace had slowed, began to speak lightly, “This is the Long Gallery. These are weapons that are no longer in use, so there’s no need to be alarmed.”

“No longer in use” implied that they had been used in the past.

Liv’s gaze fell on a nearby firearm. The grip showed significant wear, which she found striking. There were various types of guns she wasn’t familiar with displayed all around. There were also swords.

“Isn’t a Long Gallery typically decorated with paintings?”

“Well… Usually, yes, but the Marquis dislikes leaving behind portraits.”

Indeed, Liv couldn’t imagine the Marquis posing for a painter with an imposing demeanor.

Nodding in understanding, Liv accepted Philip’s answer and muttered to herself, “It’s cold here.”

“Perhaps it’s all the metal?”

Philip gave a lighthearted response, and Liv simply smiled quietly. Philip seemed to take her words lightly, but Liv was genuinely impressed by the Long Gallery.

It wasn’t just because of the weapons that filled the space. On reflection, she realized that it wasn’t just this room—she hadn’t seen any artwork in any part of the Langess mansion.

There were no small landscape paintings, which were commonly displayed, in the lobby, hallways, or even the Marquis’s office. It was a little puzzling considering that the Marquis was known as a prominent collector in Buerno. Of course, it was possible that he kept his collection in a private gallery…

If he genuinely liked art, wouldn’t he want to keep some visible in his living spaces? Moreover, this was his main residence.

It wouldn’t be out of place to decorate this space with the most expensive and valuable artwork.

‘If he really wanted, he could fill this entire Long Gallery with his collection.’

Deep in thought, Liv suddenly stopped. She had spotted a sword that particularly caught her eye.

“Miss Rodaise?”

“That sword…”

“Oh, you have a keen eye. Beautiful, isn’t it? It’s the most valuable item in the Long Gallery.”

Listening to Philip’s explanation, Liv approached the glass case containing the sword. As Philip had said, it was indeed beautiful.

The blade sparkled as if it had been polished recently, adorned with intricate engravings. The handle featured elaborate curling vines and lush flowers, finely carved, with gems inlaid, likely diamonds.

It was indeed beautiful.

So beautiful, in fact, that it felt out of place.

“It doesn’t fit.”

The other weapons seemed to carry a sense of history, but this ceremonial sword felt detached, like an artificial flower blooming vibrantly among withering real ones.

Its prominent display felt less like a boast and more as if it was meant to emphasize its incongruity.

As if mocking the ceremonial sword itself.

“Pardon?”

“Ah, it’s nothing.”

Liv shook her head quickly and turned away.

“The basement is quite far, isn’t it?”

“There’s only one entrance. We’re almost there.”

After leaving the Long Gallery, they arrived at a door. It was smaller than the other doors and located next to a staircase.

“Here it is.”

Philip stopped, opening the door that led to the basement. Liv looked at him, puzzled, and Philip smiled kindly.

“The basement is off-limits without the Master’s permission. So I’ll wait for you here at the entrance.”

 “So, I’m going down there alone?”

“There is nothing particularly dangerous inside, so you need not worry.”

“…Really, alone?”

“The Master visits here often. The basement is the safest place in this mansion.”

It wasn’t that Liv doubted Philip.

…She was just asking for confirmation one more time.

Eventually, leaving Philip behind, Liv cautiously descended the stairs. Despite it being a basement, the stairway was well lit, with no dark or damp feeling.

Only the sound of her own footsteps startled her enough to make her stop and start several times. Because of that, Liv took an unusually long time to descend the short stairs.

Hunching her shoulders, Liv finally reached the last step and slowly looked around.

It wasn’t a dark, damp, eerie, abandoned space like one might imagine a basement to be. On the contrary, it was decorated as lavishly as the rooms upstairs, if not more so.

Liv was looking around when she noticed a shadow resembling a human figure, which made her freeze in fear.

“Who…!”

She almost screamed, but then realized it was a marble statue of a person. Next to it were various other sculptures and paintings.

 

“The Marquis seems to have an abnormal obsession with nude art—it’s almost as if he has some kind of perverse fetish.”

 

Camille’s forgotten words suddenly came to mind. It seemed that the Marquis did indeed have a penchant for collecting nude art.

This was a small gallery filled with explicit nude paintings and statues—most depicting the entire body.

The works were of a different caliber compared to the few nudes Liv had posed for, painted by Brad’s brush. The vibrant muscles that looked ready to move at any moment, the vivid colors, the seductive poses, and the perfectly balanced naked forms.

Was every perfect human body in the world gathered here?

As if in a trance, Liv walked among the works. In a corner, she noticed some particularly out-of-place frames. Unlike the ornate frames around her, these were simple to the point of appearing old and worn, hanging on the wall.

They were Liv’s nude portraits.

“Oh my.”

A sigh escaped her without her realizing.

She couldn’t help it. Seeing them hung alongside such incredible works, it was immediately clear how out of place and lacking they were. Not only was Brad’s skill amateurish, but Liv’s posing as the model was awkward too.

“How could he just hang them here like this…”

Even with no one around, her face flushed. Liv cupped her burning cheeks and turned around, though of course, she was alone.

Comparing her nude paintings to the other works made it even clearer—Liv really had no talent for modeling. Even the body she had thought passable looked so plain now.

How on earth had she ever confidently disrobed before the Marquis?

And why on earth had she posed like that? Did she really stand that way during the sessions? Even a grand tree in a landscape painting would look more natural!

The problem was that there wasn’t just one nude painting.

“Did he really buy them all?”

Every one of the few nude paintings for which she had posed was here. From the first one in which she had disrobed, to the most recent, showing her profile.

Now she understood why Brad had been so confident that the Marquis would sponsor him. If the Marquis had bought every nude painting as soon as it was completed, Brad could have easily been mistaken.

She was at a loss for words, staring at the paintings when she felt a presence behind her. She didn’t need to turn around to know who it was. There was only one person who could enter this place.

Hearing the approaching footsteps, Liv parted her lips with a worried expression.

“Can’t you take the paintings down?”

Without taking her eyes off the paintings, she asked. She could feel his gaze on her cheek, and she turned to follow that gaze.

“Do they really have to be displayed like this?”

It was too embarrassing. Her complexion must have given away her emotions, yet the Marquis, who surely saw it, seemed entirely indifferent.

“It’s up to the buyer to decide how to store the artwork they purchase.”

“But my nudes are just too…”

Liv trailed off, unable to finish her sentence. Then, finally, she spoke again, “They’re strange.”

The Marquis nodded easily at her words. “They are certainly of lower quality.”

The other artworks, excluding Liv’s nude painting, were truly magnificent. Even just a glance at a few pieces made that clear. The Marquis was undoubtedly not a mere pervert with a peculiar fetish but rather someone who could genuinely recognize and collect valuable art.

To think he owned such high-caliber paintings… Even Liv, who knew little about art, couldn’t help but be impressed by the sheer quality of the works around her. Yet amidst all these masterpieces, there hung such shabby nudes here!

Moreover, they were placed in the most prominent spot. If it wasn’t with the intent to mock her, how could he have chosen such a blatantly conspicuous position for it?

“I don’t understand why you even bought them in the first place.”

Liv hadn’t expected an answer to her mumbling, but surprisingly, the Marquis spoke up, “I was curious.”

The brief reply came casually.

“They were so terrible that I was curious.”

Liv widened her eyes. She had assumed the reason he bought them was simply because they were nude art. She couldn’t understand why he would pay for a work simply because it was terrible.

Was he curious about who dared call this a work of art?

“What were you curious about?”

Expecting a casual answer, just as before, Liv was surprised when the Marquis paused briefly before responding in a blunt voice.

“The model.”

Liv’s eyes trembled slightly. Slowly blinking, she glanced at her nude portraits. They only depicted her back. Apart from her nudity, there was nothing particularly remarkable about the poses.

“…Did you know me from the beginning?”

Instead of answering, the Marquis shifted his gaze to the paintings. Liv wanted to ask how long he had known her, which of their seemingly coincidental encounters had been intentional, but she doubted he would answer.

The painting the Marquis looked at was the most recent one, showing her profile.

In Liv’s eyes, the woman in the painting looked miserable and pale. She couldn’t imagine what about it had caught his interest.

Or perhaps it was that very wretchedness that had piqued his curiosity.

Was it interesting to him because he had spent his life above others, looking down?

“If that’s the case, doesn’t it make even less sense for you to keep the painting up?”

This time, she received a response.

“There is no safer place in Buerno than this gallery. If you want to hide a painting, it should naturally be kept here.”

The basement was only accessible with the Marquis’s permission. The basement itself was located in the mansion of the Dietrion family, with its fortress-like gates. It was such a secluded place that it was hard to imagine anyone even reaching the front gate in the future.

Perhaps the Marquis was right. Since he owned the nudes, this basement would be the ideal place to keep them hidden.

And yet, Liv still didn’t see why they needed to be displayed like that.

“The model is right here in front of you, not in the painting.”

If the reason he wanted the nudes was only because of the “model.”

“You can strip me anytime you want.”

The Marquis’s gaze, which had momentarily rested on the paintings, shifted back to Liv. His eyes, filled with an unusual intensity, fixated on her intently.

“You speak vulgar words so elegantly, Teacher. It’s quite a curious talent.”

Though his words seemed mocking, his tone was calm, and his eyes sincere. The Marquis let out a faint laugh, almost muttering to himself as he looked directly at her.

“If it were vulgar, I’d tire of it quickly.”

There was a hint of regret in his voice, as if lamenting that he had not tired of her. Liv felt her heart drop.

She didn’t want him to tire of her. Not anymore…

“I…”

She simply wanted to get closer to this man.

“I want you to look at me, the real me, not the painting.”

She wanted the man who showed his thorns to others to reveal more of himself to her. She wanted him not to tire of her in the future. She wanted him to impulsively bring her along and show her parts of himself hidden from others, just like today.

She wanted to know sides of him that no one else did.

“So, won’t you take the painting down?”

The Marquis, who had been staring into Liv’s eyes without blinking, took a step closer. His hand cupped her cheek gently as he bent his head.

The kiss that followed was softer than any they had shared before. His tongue teased hers gently, exploring her mouth.

The Marquis bit her lips lightly, like one would bite into a soft cake, without causing pain. The gentle sensation made Liv’s heart flutter.

After planting a few playful kisses, he pulled back slightly and whispered, “As you wish.”

Liv closed her eyes tightly, barely holding back the sigh rising to her throat.

Ah, she could no longer even imagine an end to this relationship.

 If you really don’t want the nudes to be leaked outside, leaving them in the basement of this mansion is the answer.

That’s what he intended to say. But instead, he found himself removing the paintings that had been hanging openly, just because of Liv’s words.

Daaemon found his own behavior a little amusing. Even so, he didn’t particularly regret it, which was also a strange thing. He hadn’t managed to make Liv move as he intended, yet instead of being angry, he felt refreshed. Strangely so.

She was now getting quite skilled at asking for what she wanted. It probably wasn’t deliberate, but her way of asking definitely aroused something in him.

He was convinced of his actions. All the tricks and efforts he had made to bring her here were not pointless or meaningless after all. Rather, they were things he absolutely had to do.

How satisfying it was. Even at the moment right before climax, for just a fleeting moment, he had even thought he didn’t want to let her leave this mansion.

“Ha…”

A sigh mixed with laughter escaped him. His lust for her grew uncontrollably day by day. He hadn’t even known such a desire had been inside him.

Daaemon quietly picked up a wine glass, staring absentmindedly at the bed sheets, which had been left in a mess from their earlier activities. Just as he took a sip of wine, Liv emerged from the bathroom, opening the inner door.

She wore a robe and was pressing her wet hair with a towel when she saw Daaemon and opened her eyes wide in surprise.

“Marquis?”

Seeing her with her robe loosely tied, her wet hair, and her clear, porcelain-like face made his chest itch. He had been moving his hips between those plump thighs not long ago, yet here she was again, reigniting his every sense.

He took another drink of wine to quench his rising thirst. The glass emptied in an instant.

“Why do you look so surprised?”

At Daaemon’s  question, Liv lowered her gaze slightly, still looking flustered.

“I thought you would surely be gone…”

Until now, Daaemon had always left first after their encounters. It wasn’t for any particular reason—he simply disliked the traces of their lovemaking on the bedding or the heavy scent lingering in the air.

He had no qualms about joining their bodies together, but he saw no reason to linger in a space sullied by bodily fluids.

Today, however, he had a clear purpose. There was something he wanted to give to Liv.

He had originally intended to give it to her before they had sex, but from the basement on, his arousal had taken over, leading him to embrace her without any leisure. Only after releasing his desire and seeing the exhausted Liv head to the bathroom did he remember the box he had prepared.

And so he had no choice but to wait. Seeing her shocked reaction made him feel somewhat peculiar.

Was it really that surprising?

“This is my mansion, so it shouldn’t be strange for me to be anywhere in it.”

“You’re right.”

Liv carefully pulled her robe tighter and glanced at Daaemon.

“Do you have any instructions for me?”

“Must I always have an order to see you?”

“That’s not what I meant, Marquis. I just thought you must have some reason since you waited for me, even though you haven’t bathed yet.”

Her reasoning was perfectly sound. But for some reason, Daaemon found himself feeling a bit sour.

Whenever he summoned her, he usually had a reason, but sometimes, there wasn’t one. Why did she think he had to have a reason to see her?

“Open that box over there.”

Daaemon gestured with his chin toward the bedside table. On it lay a red velvet box.

“This is…”

Liv hesitated. She probably had an idea of what was inside just from the box. Given the precedent, it would be stranger if she didn’t.

“Open it.”

Daaemon spoke in a casual tone as he filled his empty wine glass. Swirling the glass, the red wine sloshed inside the transparent vessel.

Liv, who had been watching Daaemon, quietly opened the box. Her eyes widened at what she found inside.

It was jewelry. A necklace and earrings, far more ornate and beautiful than the ones she had received before.

Gazing at them with an overwhelmed expression, Liv cautiously spoke, “It’s quite late. Could we postpone this until another time? Corida is waiting for me.”

“Though seeing you wear nothing but these jewels is certainly delightful, that’s not why I prepared them. I’m giving them to you. Take them.”

Liv’s expression changed subtly at Daaemon’s  words. She stood there, staring at the contents of the box, before slowly speaking.

“…I’m in no position to wear such valuable jewelry. I don’t even have appropriate attire or any place to wear it to. So why not just leave it here, and… take it out when you wish…”

“Then I’ll make sure you have the right attire and the right occasion.”

“Pardon?”

Daaemon set down the wine glass he’d been toying with and approached Liv. He pulled out an envelope hidden beneath the box that Liv hadn’t noticed.

Inside the stiff envelope was an opera ticket.

“Now we have the occasion; we just need the attire.”

Liv looked at the ticket in disbelief, then jerked her head up to look at Daaemon.

“You want to take me as your partner?”

“Is that surprising?”

“I…”

Liv’s green eyes were filled with complex emotions. She opened her mouth but seemed unable to speak, her lips simply opening and closing. Daaemon, watching her, gave a faint smile before taking something out of the box.

It was a sparkling diamond necklace. Made of thin gold strands, woven like a net with small diamonds, the necklace was designed to wrap broadly around the collarbone. Though he hadn’t picked it out himself, the moment he saw it, he thought it would look good against Liv’s fair skin.

And as he expected, it did.

Daaemon unhesitatingly untied Liv’s tightly wrapped robe and put the necklace around her neck.

“That Eleonore man you seem so close with is investigating. It will all come to light eventually.”

“Can’t you stop it?”

“I could, but I don’t see the need.”

The cool necklace settled on her freshly washed skin. From up close, he could see the fine hairs on the nape of her neck stand on end. Daaemon rubbed them lightly with his thumb and whispered in her ear.

“Is there really any need to hide it?”

Liv didn’t answer easily. Perhaps she had believed that their relationship would always remain secret. Her face, half-visible, looked pale.

“You don’t seem entirely happy with this relationship.”

“That’s not true. Rather…”

Liv, fumbling over her words, lowered her head slightly. She fiddled with the necklace around her neck and let out a sigh-like whisper.

“It’s just too much for me.”

“How about being honest, Teacher?”

Daaemon lowered his hand, which had been touching the necklace and her neck, and picked up the earrings from the box. They were finely crafted, large, clear diamond earrings.

“Did you really want to keep this relationship entirely unknown to anyone?”

Daaemon touched her earlobe. It was thick and clean, seemingly unpierced. He stared at it for a moment before inspecting the back of the earring.

The gold pin was sharp at the end. It seemed sharp enough to make piercing unnecessary.

“Did you really not want anyone to see you by my side?”

How could that be? Human desires are infinitely greedy. When things that seemed impossible begin to fall into place one by one, eventually one starts reaching for things far beyond one’s grasp.

Daaemon knew Liv was deeply shaken by him. She would undoubtedly want more.

Liv, hesitating, lifted her head slightly. He thought she might act overwhelmed, but to his surprise, she appeared quite composed.

“If I stand by your side…”

Liv looked at Daaemon.

“For how long will that be?”

To be honest, Daaemon was curious about that himself. How long would he keep her by his side?

He was an avid collector. But a collector doesn’t obsess over a single object forever. Having never been this focused on anything before, Daaemon couldn’t predict how long his interest in her would last.

One thing was certain: at least for now, he was very pleased with Liv. Enough to make their relationship known and cherish her openly.

“Just don’t let me get bored of you. You’ve conducted yourself well so far. How about trusting yourself a little more?”

“Ah!”

Liv winced, her eyebrows furrowing. Daaemon, who had been toying with her earlobe, had pierced her skin with the earring. The sudden pain made her long lashes quiver.

A gleaming diamond earring now adorned the swollen red skin.

“It suits you.”

Daaemon rubbed her flushed earlobe and the area around it between his thumb and forefinger, narrowing his eyes.

“Let’s meet a bit earlier next time. There are some shops we need to stop by.”

He handed Liv the remaining earring, telling her she could pierce it herself in front of a mirror. Just as he was about to turn away, Liv’s clear voice reached him from behind.

“Do you love me?”

 “What?”

“Or do you like me?”

It was an audacious question, one that felt almost impudent. Daaemon raised his eyebrows, looking back at Liv with a rather unpleasant expression. Liv quietly waited for his answer, her eyes meeting his calmly. It seemed as though she was begging for affection, but the look in her eyes was rational and composed.

That was refreshing. It meant that, more than anyone, she herself was acutely aware of just how meaningless her words were.

“I cherish you.”

So Daaemon decided to answer benevolently.

“If I must define it, I cherish you.”

It was as though he had picked out his favorite piece from his collection and given it first place. Not unique, but not the same as the others either—treated just that much more preciously.

“Is there any other feeling you need?”

“I suppose not.”

Liv lowered her gaze and turned away. She walked towards the mirror, holding the other earring that Daaemon had handed her. As if she intended to pierce her ear herself, just as Daaemon had said.

Her movements were strikingly quiet, as if they made no sound at all.

Liv stood in front of the mirror, her presence barely noticeable, and touched her earlobe, carefully raising her hand. Her shoulders rose sharply, showing her nervousness.

Soon enough, the other earlobe sparkled with a clear, transparent diamond.

Blood stained the tip of the gold pin she had crudely pushed through, but it wasn’t visible from the front, so it didn’t matter.

 



 

Liv smiled bitterly.

The Marquis never asked about her feelings. He simply cared for her the way one would care for a beloved pet.

In hindsight, it had always been that way. From the beginning, it had been clear that this relationship would only cause her pain.

She had known it from the start.

Ah, this is why people need to know their place.

Liv stifled a sigh. The red velvet box she had brought with her caught her eye. She remembered how expensive the ruby necklace she had refused looked, but compared to the diamond necklace in front of her now, it seemed almost childish—a toy for playtime. The diamond necklace and earrings were so dazzling that she couldn’t even muster the courage to touch them.

Even so, Liv accepted them. If she refused, the Marquis would be angry. She didn’t want to incur his wrath.

 

“How about being honest, Teacher?”

 

No, in truth…

 

“Did you really not want anyone to see you by my side?”

 

Her greed had grown, making all her previous caution meaningless. That greed had pushed her to accept the box.

As the Marquis had pointed out, Liv didn’t want her relationship with him to remain entirely secret forever. She knew that making their relationship public would bring no benefit, and might even cause upheaval in her life.

But Liv wanted to confirm that she was special to him. For the Marquis to stand her by his side in front of everyone was the most definitive proof of that.

Just visiting the mansion for business drew enough attention—being his partner would create rumors beyond comparison. Many would question and take an interest in their relationship. Some might even try to pry into their past…

Whether their meeting had begun with a nude painting or whether he treated her as a collectible—it didn’t matter. Had it not been for these special circumstances, she wouldn’t have met him, and he wouldn’t have paid her any attention.

The Marquis was a man Liv could never have dreamed of having, if not for this extraordinary situation.

 

“I cherish you.”

 

The Marquis disliked whispers behind his back, so surely, he would provide her with at least minimal protection. He had always treated her generously. It would be wasteful to suddenly change now, given all the effort he had put in so far.

Liv ran her fingers over the box. It felt soft.

Unable to bring herself to open it again, Liv simply ran her hand over the lid repeatedly before lifting her gaze. In the small hand mirror sitting on the table, she saw half of her own face. There was a small scab forming on her pale earlobe.

When she woke up, both piercings were bleeding. She had disinfected and cleaned them in the morning, but another scab had quickly formed. She would need to take good care of them if she wanted the piercings to stay open and wear the earrings to the opera.

“Ha…”

Liv let out a deep sigh and stood up. Her belief that he would protect her was nothing more than a sandcastle built without a solid foundation—easily crumbled by even a wave of foam. But perhaps it wouldn’t collapse.

Did she need to be the one to destroy it, simply because it would eventually fall apart?

Liv decided to accept her growing greed.

Even if that greed continued to swell and eventually burst, leaving only shattered fragments behind, she could always gather the pieces and dispose of them when the time came.

 



 

A report came in that Corida’s condition was improving faster than expected.

It was a report separate from the one Liv received—a report that Daaemon received independently. Of course, it wasn’t because he was concerned for Corida’s well-being. He was checking because he wanted to separate Corida from Liv as soon as possible.

After impulsively bringing Liv to the Langess mansion, Daaemon had focused on her even more diligently.

Especially the moment he saw Liv standing among his precious collection in the basement—it was unforgettable. She was a woman who fit perfectly in the Langess mansion.

However, as long as Corida was around, bringing Liv to the mansion would not be easy. If he had to accept Corida as well, that would be one thing, but what Daaemon wanted was Liv Rodaise alone.

Since her sick sister was an inconvenience, Daaemon was more than happy to wish for Corida’s recovery. The money spent on Corida’s treatment was negligible, especially if it brought Liv’s goodwill—it was practically an investment.

And so, today’s outing had been an easy decision.

“It’s truly an honor to have you visit us in person!”

Daaemon looked around the interior with a disinterested gaze as the head of Hyrob bowed deeply. The herbal scent typical of an apothecary filled the air, though it was more subtle than overwhelming, thanks to careful management.

“I heard a new medicine arrived.”

“Yes, indeed. It arrived early this morning!”

The distribution of the new medicine was done through official channels. Buerno was no exception, so to acquire it, Daaemon had to go through Hyrob, which was authorized to handle it.

This was the very first distribution. Naturally, the supply was limited. It made sense for him to come personally—to both secure his share and send a message that others should not even think about obtaining it.

The head of Hyrob seemed to understand the significance of Daaemon’s  visit immediately. Clearing his throat, he cautiously began to speak.

“However, Marquis, as you know, the quantity is limited. If you could show a bit of leniency, more people could have the opportunity…”

Daaemon glanced at the door leading further inside the shop and asked in a cold voice, “Is there a patient waiting for this medicine who will die without it?”

“We cannot know that. Our duty is simply to provide the best medicine to those in need…”

“Then fulfill your duty.”

Daaemon continued without even looking at the head of Hyrob, “If a customer wants to buy medicine, why should your tongue be so long?”

Daaemon had already obtained a list of those who had made reservations for the new medicine. None of them were critically ill or caring for someone who was. They were all people looking to buy the “new medicine” for its uniqueness and rarity, rather than for genuine need.

Compared to them, how much more urgent was his need? At the very least, it held more meaning than letting someone else have it.

The head of Hyrob broke into a cold sweat as the Marquis made it clear he intended to monopolize the supply for a while. For someone dealing with various noble clients, the Marquis’s stance was likely quite awkward. But Daaemon wasn’t the type to concern himself with others’ business circumstances.

The head of Hyrob circled around, unable to say anything, like a dog with its tail on fire. Ignoring him, Daaemon’s  gaze shifted towards the commotion at the shop’s entrance. The head of Hyrob straightened up and moved towards the door.

 “What’s going on? I told you not to receive any visitors today!”

The shopkeeper, who had left the door firmly closed, slightly opened it to berate the gatekeeper.

“Well, this woman kept lying about having an appointment, causing a commotion. I’m sorry.”

“Do you know who’s inside right now? Making such lies… Never mind, I’ll take care of it quietly!”

The shopkeeper, who had been scolding the gatekeeper through the crack in the door, gasped in surprise upon noticing Daaemon approaching the entrance, and immediately lowered himself.

Ignoring the shopkeeper, Daaemon focused his gaze on the slightly open door of the shop.

“Let her in.”

“Yes, I’ll send her away immedi… Pardon?”

“She said she had an appointment, yet this pharmacy keeps a deaf person as the gatekeeper?”

The sarcastic remark, delivered in a calm tone, caused the shopkeeper to hurriedly open the door. Thanks to this, the figure of the person hidden from view became visible.

Daaemon clicked his tongue instinctively upon confirming the woman standing there in shabby attire.

He should have brought her to a tailor’s first, not to the pharmacy. No wonder she had been turned away in that state.

“Are you really sure you have an appointment… ?”

The shopkeeper and gatekeeper, looking incredulous, alternately glanced at Liv and Daaemon. It was clear they couldn’t comprehend what they were seeing. Judging from appearances alone, they probably belonged to completely different worlds. Daaemon let out a cold scoff.

“How you manage to run a business with such poor judgment, unable to even recognize your own clients, is beyond me.”

“I, I’m so sorry… Hey, apologize immediately!”

The shopkeeper, who had reflexively tried to apologize, quickly scolded the gatekeeper. The gatekeeper, still wearing a vacant expression, turned to look at the woman standing next to him.

The woman, Liv Rodaise, appeared indifferent, as though she was unaffected by everything happening. But moments ago, when the door had first opened, her neck and cheeks had been visibly flushed. She must have felt humiliated.

After all, Liv Rodaise had a stronger pride than most would expect

“I apologize, miss.”

Liv’s expression as she received the gatekeeper’s apology was rather peculiar. Perhaps she was recalling some past incident not too long ago?

Daaemon already knew about the time Liv had been turned away here. He had had someone following her for quite some time now, and keeping an eye on an unguarded commoner like her was hardly a challenge for a trained person.

“You should manage your staff better. If an offended customer decides to ‘visit a more welcoming place,’ what will you do then?”

Daaemon’s  taunt was loud enough for both the gatekeeper and Liv to hear. The gatekeeper, who had been shifting his eyes nervously while bowing awkwardly, turned pale.

“I sincerely apologize. It will never happen again, so please forgive me just this once!”

The gatekeeper bent so deeply that it seemed as if he would fall to the ground, and this time, Liv looked visibly flustered. She waved her hand, signaling forgiveness, and even reached out as if to help the gatekeeper up.

Seeing this, Daaemon frowned. “How long are you planning to stand at the entrance, Teacher?”

“Ah, yes.”

Before Liv’s hand could reach the gatekeeper, she withdrew it. Daaemon’s  frown also relaxed a little.

The shopkeeper from Hyrob now acted as if he couldn’t even see Liv’s shabby appearance, treating her with utmost respect as he led her inside. Liv, clearly uncomfortable with his sudden change in attitude, hesitated before moving closer to Daaemon. She had unconsciously sought someone to rely on.

Daaemon liked that. He willingly pulled her closer to his side.

“From now on, all the new medicine supply will be given to this woman.”

The shopkeeper immediately agreed without any argument. Liv, on the other hand, was the one who seemed startled. Daaemon had only told her to come to Hyrob without explaining the details, so he now offered a belated explanation.

“It’s the new medicine from Dominian. Since I can’t accompany you every time, you should be the one to receive it.”

“New medicine…”

“Isn’t it needed?”

Gradually, color returned to Liv’s face, which had been blank with confusion. Her green eyes shone brightly, more vividly than ever.

“…Yes, it is needed.”

Liv, who spoke with a small but resolute voice, bit her trembling lips firmly, causing them to turn pale.

A kiss right now would taste perfect.

Daaemon was entertaining this thought when the staff who had gone to retrieve the medicine returned. Holding a tightly sealed package, the staff eyed Liv, standing beside Daaemon, curiously, though they wisely kept their questions to themselves.

“Here it is. When administering it, be sure to consult a physician once more and familiarize yourself with the usage instructions.”

“Yes.”

Liv took the medicine from the shopkeeper with a peculiar expression. With their business concluded, Daaemon turned away without hesitation. The carriage was already waiting in front of the shop.

Daaemon stepped into the carriage first, followed by Liv. In that brief moment, he felt a few curious stares directed at them.

He could have avoided those gazes, but he chose not to, and Liv seemed to be aware of that, saying nothing about it.

Inside the carriage, Liv fiddled with the medicine package on her lap.

“How did you know?”

“Know what?”

The carriage started moving, swaying slightly. Daaemon, leaning back comfortably, glanced at Liv.

“How I was treated at Hyrob before.”

“I’d be disappointed if you were asking because you truly don’t know.”

Liv wasn’t a fool. He hadn’t made much effort to hide that he knew about her daily life, so she must have had some idea.

As expected, Liv didn’t show any particular surprise at Daaemon’s  words. She fell silent again, her gaze deepening as she stared at the medicine package, lost in thought.

“When did you start caring for me, Marquis?”

“Does it matter?”

“Knowing even that would help me decide how to act in the future.”

Daaemon tilted his head slightly. “Isn’t the present more important than the past? As long as you remain by my side wisely, you’ll always receive this kind of treatment.”

“Wisely…”

Liv repeated Daaemon’s  words under her breath, then suddenly moved the medicine package to the empty seat next to her. She then scooted closer to Daaemon. He looked at her blankly, wondering what she was up to, when she hesitated for a moment before gently placing her hand on his chest and looking up at him.

Liv’s face, looking up at Daaemon from such a close distance, was composed yet somehow exuded a mournful vulnerability.

Gazing at him with her calm green eyes, Liv softly asked, “May I kiss you?”

Daaemon raised an eyebrow. Liv’s shoulders shrank slightly, perhaps misinterpreting his reaction. She was like a shy mimosa—approaching boldly, only to shrink away just as quickly.

“I thought you might have wanted to kiss me earlier. Was I mistaken?”

Liv asked in a much less confident voice than before, her eyes darting nervously before she tried to pull back. But her attempt was futile, as Daaemon immediately wrapped his arm around her waist and pulled her close.

“Ah!”

With her balance completely lost, Liv fell against Daaemon’s  chest. Daaemon lowered his head towards her, their lips meeting a bit hastily.

Liv clung to Daaemon’s  clothes, her awkward position making it difficult for her to steady herself. She struggled to regain her balance, but Daaemon’s  deep kiss—his tongue invading her mouth—made her lose control entirely. It wasn’t long before wet saliva trickled from between her parted lips.

“Mmph…”

The sound of Daaemon’s  tongue sucking hers, along with her faint moans, filled the carriage. Daaemon scraped Liv’s soft palate with the tip of his tongue. Each time, her breathless panting revealed her heightened state of arousal.

After thoroughly exploring her mouth, Daaemon finally pulled his lips away. As soon as he did, Liv gasped for air, resting her forehead against Daaemon’s  shoulder. The kiss, made more challenging by their awkward positions inside the moving carriage, had left her more breathless than usual.

Daaemon let her catch her breath, silently offering his shoulder as support while looking down at her. Through her neatly tied hair, her pale nape peeked out.

“If it weren’t for the tailor’s appointment.”

He would have ordered the carriage to turn back to the mansion.

Daaemon muttered, his gaze fixed hungrily on her tempting neck, and Liv flinched.

 After catching her breath, she leaned entirely against Daaemon without lifting her head. Her hand, clutching his clothing, was full of tension, as if she was proving her resolve.

“You probably don’t know the kind of resolve I’ve made, Marquis.”

“Does pleasing me require such ‘resolve’?”

Daaemon responded in a mocking tone. Liv said nothing in response; instead, she tightly clung to his clothing. In the past, such creases would have annoyed him, but seeing her clinging to him so desperately made the wrinkling seem insignificant.

Daaemon raised his hand, gently brushing the back of Liv’s head. Her soft hair tangled around his fingers, loosening her once neatly kept hairstyle. Watching the growing disarray of her hair caused by his touch, Daaemon lowered his hand to grasp her neck. When he pulled forcefully on her nape, Liv obediently raised her head to meet his gaze.

“If you want to tell me what resolve you’ve made, I’ll listen.”

Perhaps because of the earlier kiss, a faint blush lingered around Liv’s eyes, making her look subtly excited.

“No, it’s nothing significant to you, Marquis. It’s just…”

Her slightly swollen lips trembled from the short but rough kiss.

“I just want you to know I’ve decided to accept it this time as well.”

For the first time, Daaemon felt like he could not understand Liv’s thoughts. Her straightforward gaze had always made her inner feelings clear, yet now they seemed obscured.

However, he couldn’t dwell on this strange feeling. Soon, Liv extended her arms and actively pulled him in for another kiss.

 



 

The reaction at the boutique was even more intense than at Hyrob.

The fact that the Marquis of Dietrion himself had brought a woman to get a dress fitted!

It was only natural that the shopkeeper, the staff, and even the attendants couldn’t take their eyes off Liv. In their gazes, Liv could sense envy, jealousy, and shock. Though there might have been some pure admiration, it was outweighed by the negative emotions.

Even though she had anticipated this, she still felt uncomfortable.

Just a word to the Marquis could dispel all of those stares. But that would only be temporary. The Marquis couldn’t manage every moment of her daily life, and she would continue to face such hostility and unpleasant curiosity wherever she went. If it couldn’t be erased completely, it would be better to grow accustomed to it. At least then, she could ignore it.

However, what surprised her was the Marquis’s attitude.

Until now, Liv had assumed that the Marquis was just as eager as she was to keep their relationship hidden. After all, he had once said himself, “I don’t like leaving traces.” Showing her off so openly now was bound to attract the “greedy people” he despised.

 

Lying in the bed, the air still warm after their passionate moments, Liv slowly turned her head. The Marquis had not left immediately after their encounter this time, just as he had stayed to give her the jewelry previously. Today, however, there seemed to be no specific purpose for his lingering.

Such small actions gave rise to new hopes.

His gradually changing behavior threw her feelings into disarray. It was as if someone had reached into her chest and stirred everything up.

“I thought you disliked rumors.”

“I do.”

Sitting on the bed, smoking a cigar, the Marquis answered in a cold tone.

“Is there anyone who actually likes such things?”

As always, he was composed and put together. When they were intimate, it was always Liv who ended up in disarray.

She used to think it didn’t matter because their relationship was inherently one-sided and hierarchical. However, now that she wanted more from him, seeing him so impeccably dressed made her feel a bit resentful. He had just openly taken her to a boutique today. He had presented her without hesitation in front of others.

“But today, you didn’t seem to care about such things at all, Marquis.”

Why had he decided to make their relationship known? Surely he wasn’t planning to reveal his “peculiar tastes.”

“Sometimes rumors can be quite useful.”

The Marquis added indifferently, “I dislike people digging into my affairs; it doesn’t mean I want to hide.”

“Since nothing is known about you, I assumed you’d prefer to stay quiet.”

“There are people who want me to stay hidden.”

The Marquis sneered.

“But I don’t have to cater to their wishes.”

Occasionally, he would casually mention things related to his past. Whether he did it because he knew Liv wouldn’t repeat it or simply because he trusted her discretion, she couldn’t be sure.

Either way, Liv liked it. She couldn’t ask him to tell her more, but whenever he dropped hints like this, she would file away each piece, adding to her understanding of the side of him she alone knew.

In that sense, today’s information was interesting. People wanting to keep the Marquis hidden—could it be something related to his family? Camille had said that the Marquis’s lineage was unknown.

Maybe he really was a surviving member of some royal bloodline.

Imagining Daaemon as a royal was easy. Draped in the finest fabrics and adorned with the world’s most precious jewels, he was magnificent even in her fantasies.

Lost in her futile imagination, Liv snapped back to reality at the sensation of a touch against her bare skin. Daaemon was gently scratching her side with his fingers—more precisely, the scar on her side.

“It seems I dislike it when you get marred more than I thought.”

It was a sharp scratch caused by a pin. Earlier, at the boutique, an apprentice had accidentally pricked her while taking measurements. Behind the crying apprentice, a few staff members, failing to hide their satisfaction, had glanced at Liv.

The apprentice had probably been pressured into it by a senior employee. Had Liv complained, the apprentice would have been the one held accountable and fired.

Liv chose not to make an issue of it. Because of that, the Marquis only noticed the wound on her side after they had returned to the bed.

“It will heal soon. It’s not deep.”

“Tch.”

The Marquis’s face remained displeased despite Liv’s assurance. She let herself relax into his touch.

“Do you have a reason for preferring unblemished skin?”

“Because it’s beautiful.”

Maybe because he kept touching the wound, it started to itch slightly where a faint scab had formed. Or maybe her body temperature, which had just cooled, was rising again.

“Isn’t it a simple matter? Anything damaged loses its value.”

Liv’s gaze shifted to her side. It was a wound that would soon disappear—a visible representation of human malice: red, sore, subtly irritating.

“But scars are also proof of survival.”

Her eyes moved from her scar to the man’s hand. Between his fingers, not easily noticeable unless spread apart, Liv knew there was a scar there.

“Like the scar on your hand, Marquis. Proof of victory.”

What expression would he make if she told him she liked that scar?

The Marquis seemed to dislike the scar on his hand, but Liv cherished it.

It made him seem more human, a man who appeared to live untouched by even a speck of dust. It reassured her, reminding her that he, too, was human, like her.

It made her feel she could, perhaps, dare to desire more from him.

“Even just enduring life can be considered a victory.”

At Liv’s words, the Marquis narrowed his eyes. She could feel his once teasing touch grow firmer. As he gripped her, pressing down with force, the Marquis’s lips curved into a sly, slanted smile.

“Your perspective is certainly peculiar.”

A faint puff of cigar smoke escaped his slightly parted lips.

“Intriguing.”

“I don’t claim that my perspective is the correct one. But… when you say you dislike scars, it sounds like you’re referring to the one on your hand.”

The Marquis silently drew on his cigar, his gaze still fixed on Liv. The glowing ember at the tip of the cigar briefly flared.

“I just thought… perhaps it would be good to think differently.”

The smoke grew thicker, spreading throughout the room. Amid the faintly stinging haze, the Marquis’s cold voice resonated.

“Have you ever seen limbs torn apart, cast across the ground?”

His tone was detached.

“On a dirt-covered battlefield, with blood dried and mixed with the earth, losing a limb is almost trivial. Even if one manages to survive, they’ll have to live with a grotesquely twisted body, unable to sleep peacefully…”

She couldn’t tell what he was describing. But one thing was certain—such vivid descriptions could only come from someone who had witnessed it firsthand.

“Their screams, their cries of despair—how loud, how ugly they were.”

For the first time, a foreign emotion flickered across his usually arrogant and cynical eyes. It was emptiness.

It disappeared before Liv could react to it. She tried to search for traces of that feeling, but the Marquis turned away indifferently, preventing her from studying him further.

He got up and placed his cigar in the ashtray. It looked like he intended to leave. Liv spoke to his back as he moved.

“Still, if they survived, couldn’t they at least dream of hope?”

Daaemon, who seemed poised to exit through the door, glanced back at Liv.

 “Hope?”

“The hope that tomorrow could be better than today.”

Liv slowly lifted herself.

“Even without a huge stroke of luck… At least tomorrow could be better than today.”

“Have you cared for your sick sister all this time with that kind of mindset?”

The question seemed closer to curiosity than mockery. The Marquis, with his head tilted slightly, stared intently at Liv.

“Believing that she would someday recover?”

“Yes. And in the end, I found hope. Thanks to you, Marquis…”

Liv hesitated momentarily before speaking, looking at the Marquis with a calm gaze.

“Because you answered my prayers.”

The Marquis said nothing. His expression was so inscrutable that Liv had no idea what he was thinking. Though she knew he was good at maintaining a poker face, today he was even more unreadable.

The one consolation was that there were no signs of mockery or disdain in his gaze. At the very least, it meant he was taking her words seriously.

A strange silence filled the room. It was Liv who looked away first. Glancing down, she began to move. Since the Marquis was leaving, she figured she, too, should get ready to wash up and leave.

As usual, she was about to head to the bathroom when suddenly, the Marquis spoke.

“Stay here tonight.”

Liv instantly knew that this wasn’t one of the generous but empty words he often offered.

If he made a request disguised as an invitation, Liv had no means of refusing. She doubted the Marquis would consider her personal feelings—that she didn’t want to be left alone in the cold room. Even so, she responded impulsively.

“I can’t sleep alone.”

Ridiculous. She wasn’t a child, and the idea that she couldn’t sleep alone was absurd. But the words had already left her lips.

The Marquis raised his eyebrows, narrowing his eyes in response, prompting Liv to quickly offer an excuse.

“I-I’ve gotten used to sleeping with Corida.”

Embarrassment flushed her cheeks. She cleared her throat unnecessarily and averted her gaze.

Perhaps she had gone mad, even if only for a moment. It was foolish of her to be swept away by the Marquis’s occasional kindness and let her desires soar so high. The longer the silence stretched, the hotter her face grew.

Just as she was about to give in to the embarrassment and say she would stay, the Marquis spoke, “Wash up and come out.”

Ah, so he was telling her to go home after all.

She tried to understand it that way, but the Marquis added in a calm voice, “I don’t sleep in Berryworth.”

“…What?”

Liv looked at the Marquis with wide eyes. He wore his usual indifferent expression, but there was an inexplicable hint of amusement in his voice.

“You asked to stay, didn’t you?”

It was as if he were looking at a child afraid of the dark.

She could have tried to brush it off as a joke. But Liv couldn’t bring herself to do so. After all, she never knew when the Marquis might change his mind and leave her again, as he often did after sex.

Swallowing nervously, Liv climbed off the bed. She could only hope her pounding heart would calm down soon.

 



 

One common misconception people had was that Daaemon couldn’t get along with others.

To put it precisely, Daaemon didn’t “can’t” interact with people; he “wouldn’t.” But no one knew the difference. Since he had consistently kept everyone at arm’s length, there had never been an opportunity for anyone to notice.

It seemed Liv was no different. When she realized that Daaemon was someone who could share a bed with someone else all night, she visibly tensed. He wondered how monstrous she must have imagined him to be in her mind.

It was absurd, but ultimately insignificant. After all, now she knew her assumptions were wrong.

“I’ve made sure to deliver the message clearly to Miss Corida. I’ve also arranged for guards to be stationed around the house for her safety, so you need not worry.”

Liv, who had been unable to hide her anxiety about leaving Corida alone at home, finally let out a sigh of relief. Philip, after providing Liv with a few more instructions, quietly left.

They were in one of the many rooms of the Langess mansion. Though it wasn’t Daaemon’s  private bedroom, it was far too luxurious tobe called a guest room.

Maybe because they had stayed at the Langess mansion before, Liv didn’t seem uncomfortable preparing to sleep in this room.

Come to think of it, he had once thought he didn’t want to send her away from the mansion.

“Do you need anything before bed?”

“No, nothing. But Marquis, are you really going to sleep like that?”

Liv’s face showed a hint of puzzlement. To someone about to go to bed, Daaemon’s  attire did indeed seem uncomfortable.

Daaemon glanced at his outfit. Admittedly, it wasn’t what one would wear for a comfortable night’s sleep. The shirt, buttoned up to the neck, and the trousers—while technically loungewear—were far from appropriate sleepwear.

“Is there a problem?”

“If you find sharing a bed uncomfortable, you don’t have to push yourself.”

“I never do anything that I find burdensome.”

Daaemon was well aware of his capabilities. Whatever he chose to do was always within his control.

The woman standing before him was living proof. She had walked into his grasp willingly, and nothing she did had ever deviated from his expectations.

Upon hearing his words, Liv pressed her lips together. In stark contrast to Daaemon’s  attire, Liv wore a loose, worn nightgown. She averted her gaze from Daaemon, her discomfort evident.

“You look uncomfortable.”

Her words sounded like a sulk, almost as if she were pouting. Perhaps it was a crazy thought, but…

“Wearing something light is said to help with a good night’s sleep.”

“Teacher.”

Liv, who had been mumbling, snapped her head up. Daaemon looked directly at her, throwing out his next words in an indifferent tone.

“Do you want to undress me?”

He expected her to blush, shake her head, or wave her hands in a flustered denial.

But instead, Liv remained remarkably composed, almost as if mocking his expectation. In fact, she seemed to realize something, letting out a soft murmur. She blinked slowly, fiddling with the blanket before finally parting her lips.

“Can’t you relax in front of me?”

The moment the words left her mouth, Liv hesitated, stealing glances at him. But soon after, she feigned a calm tone and added, “I’m the only one who gets into your bed, after all.”

Suddenly, he recalled the time she had awkwardly tried to seduce him, hastily undressing herself. This felt similar to that moment.

Liv probably didn’t know what it meant that he had brought her to the Langess mansion, shown her the basement, and now even allowed her to stay the night. The truth was, he was already showering her with more affection than she could ever deserve.

But since she knew nothing, she continued to demand more.

Daaemon knew that if he expressed any displeasure, Liv would immediately retract her words. If he had been irritated, he would have laughed at her without a second thought. Yet, to his surprise—perhaps fortunately, perhaps unfortunately—he felt more curiosity than annoyance.

“Would you attend to my bed, then, Teacher?”

This was the woman who had once called the scar between his fingers a “medal of victory.”

“Me?”

“Yes. Since you’re so eager to undress me, I’ll give you the chance.”

He was curious to see if she would feel the same once she saw his body.

Medal of victory? He found that expression ludicrously naive.

“How about it?”

“All right.”

Daaemon let out a small, irritated laugh as Liv nodded innocently. She, oblivious to his rising irritation, approached him unguardedly and reached out.

She undid the first button of his shirt, which was tightly fastened around his neck.

Standing right in front of him, Liv cautiously undid his buttons. He looked down at her face as she focused on her task.

How long had it been since someone had undressed him?

He was used to roughly pulling his own shirt off, but now, having someone else do it felt novel and strange.

He had always been self-sufficient. At the academy, on the battlefield, and especially in his private life. There were emotional reasons, like his reluctance to show the scar-ridden torso underneath, but it went beyond that.

Even now, though it didn’t matter anymore, he remained constantly alert. During the height of the war, he lived with his life on the line, needing to scrutinize and verify every small act of service.

While Daaemon briefly reminisced, Liv had undone more than half of the shirt’s buttons. The bare skin hidden beneath was slowly revealed.

Her hand, which had been moving at a steady pace, began to falter.

“Is it revolting?”

Though phrased as a question, his tone made it sound like a statement. He knew that, objectively, his body was unpleasant to look at.

“Like bugs crawling across the surface.”

That was exactly how it sometimes felt. He often imagined his scars growing larger, his body itching all over, like maggots crawling on his skin throughout the night.

No matter how tightly he wrapped himself in clothing to avoid looking at his own body, it made no difference. His memories of shattered, torn, and mangled limbs remained vivid, ever-present. The stench, the cries of agony—they, too, were vivid and constant.

He didn’t want to acknowledge that the grotesque pieces of flesh had once been people.

In that sense, nude artwork was the epitome of beauty. Its flawless form, preserved forever—how peaceful and beautiful.

Daaemon stared at Liv. With her head lowered, he couldn’t see her expression.

“Tell me, Teacher. Do you still see these scars as a medal of victory?”

 Almost simultaneously, Daaemon’s  question and Liv’s briefly hesitant hand resumed its movement. Undoing each button methodically, Liv responded in a steady voice.

“No matter what caused these scars, Marquis, you are alive, and everyone looks up to you with admiration.”

Finally, all the buttons of his shirt were undone. Through the loosened fabric, his muscular body was revealed. His skin, marked with discolored scars, testified to the time he had endured. Except for a few large scars, he couldn’t remember where most of the smaller ones had come from.

Liv brought her fingertips to the scar on his abdomen. Her hand was warmer than he had expected.

“So why shouldn’t I consider these scars a medal of victory?”

Daaemon squinted at the scar Liv was touching. Though he wasn’t entirely sure, he thought it might have been from shrapnel during a mine explosion. He couldn’t recall which battle it was from.

As soon as he looked at his scars, unpleasant remnants of the past began creeping into his mind. With a furrowed brow, Daaemon murmured, “You’re trying very hard to please me.”

At his cynical words, Liv finally raised her head. Her face, looking up at him from close by, was innocent. In her green eyes, there was no hint of deceit or sly motives.

“Do you think I’m lying just to flatter you, Marquis?”

“It’s fine. Because it doesn’t feel bad.”

Daaemon deliberately showed that he didn’t entirely believe her, causing Liv to awkwardly force a smile. Her slightly furrowed brow seemed to reveal her unease and complex emotions.

She didn’t grovel, begging him to believe her. Instead, she moved her hands, apparently intending to fully remove Daaemon’s  shirt.

Daaemon let her do as she wished. Once his upper body was fully exposed, all the hidden scars were laid bare. On his arms, chest, shoulder blades, and abdomen—everywhere her eyes landed were scars, like bugs crawling across his skin.

Upon seeing them, Liv’s eyes widened. This time, Daaemon thought, perhaps he would finally see disgust or fear on her face.

However, her words were completely unexpected.

“…If I said I liked these scars, would that displease you?”

Her voice was pure, almost filled with admiration.

“If I said I felt relieved that your body isn’t as flawless as a statue’s, would you be offended?”

For the first time in front of her, Daaemon found himself at a loss for words. Perhaps taking his silence as a negative response, Liv, who had been touching his scars, hesitated and withdrew her hand.

A moment ago, she seemed lost in admiration, but now she appeared to come to her senses, clearing her throat and searching for his robe. Daaemon watched her in silence for a while as she looked around the room rather theatrically.

Finally, Liv found a spare robe. When Daaemon extended his arms willingly, she cautiously draped it over his shoulders.

“Teacher, you should never invest in fine art.”

As Liv was adjusting the robe’s loose belt, she looked up at Daaemon in puzzlement. Daaemon took the belt from her hand and carelessly tossed it to the floor before striding toward the bed.

“Your taste is terrible—you’d lose your entire fortune in an instant.”

“What about your trousers…?”

“If you take off my trousers, I’ll take it as a sign you don’t intend to sleep tonight.”

Without a word of protest, Liv gave up on removing his trousers. It seemed she wasn’t comfortable enough to stay up all night while spending the night away from home.

Which was fortunate. If things continued as they were, he felt he would embrace her much more roughly than usual.

“Do you need me to sing a lullaby for you?”

“No, just… having you nearby is enough.”

She had already laid herself bare, literally and figuratively, yet she now acted as if she was embarrassed again. Lying down on the edge of the wide bed, Liv pulled the blanket up as far as it would go, her face unsure what to do. Ignoring her restlessness, Daaemon closed his eyes.

With her scent and breath so close, a familiar lust began to stir. But he had no desire to indulge it tonight. His entire body was on edge, sensing danger.

The survival instinct, which overpowered his desire, swept over him violently. Though his rational mind knew there was nothing in this place that could threaten him, his instincts, honed by years of survival, continued to warn him.

Strangely enough, he didn’t want to touch her tonight. It felt as though she were the source of the danger signals he was sensing.

 



 

When Liv awoke in the morning, she was alone in the wide bed.

She had expected to be too nervous to sleep properly, but once she lay down, she fell into a deep sleep, oblivious to when her companion had left.

Liv stared somewhat gloomily at the side of the bed, long cold from Daaemon’s  departure. There was barely any sign that anyone had ever occupied that space.

After all, this was the Langess mansion, so she had hoped they might share breakfast together, but all she heard was that the Marquis had left early in the morning.

In the end, using Corida’s worry as an excuse, she refused Philip’s invitation to have breakfast before heading home, which she had done just moments ago.

And upon opening the door, she was greeted by an unexpected guest.

“Teacher!”

“Sister!”

Sitting beside Corida with a teacup in hand was Million. As Liv stood frozen at the entrance in surprise, the two girls rushed over, each grabbing one of her arms and seating her at the dining table. Then, like police officers about to interrogate a suspect, they solemnly took their seats across from her.

There was no opportunity to ask why Million was here or how she had become so close with Corida.

“Teacheeer, I’ve heard such a strange rumor!”

Propping her face up with both hands like a flower, Million narrowed her eyes at Liv from across the table. Corida, sitting beside her, followed suit, narrowing her eyes and speaking in a sly voice.

“Sister, Million told me something strange.”

When had they even started calling each other by their first names?

Speechless, Liv looked back and forth between Million and Corida before letting out a sigh of resignation. No matter how much she wanted to ignore it, it was impossible not to understand what the two girls were hinting at. Pretending not to know would be futile.

With an air of composure, Liv turned her gaze to Million. As urgent as their inquiry seemed, certain matters needed to be addressed first.

“Million, I’ve told you that visiting someone’s home without prior permission is impolite.”

No matter how diligently she tried to teach her, it was pointless if Million didn’t apply it to her daily life.

Seeing Liv’s expression, as if she were about to bring out an etiquette manual right then and there, Million looked rather aggrieved.

“That’s true, but waiting for that would take too long!”

“What could be so urgent that you couldn’t even wait to send a messenger?”

“What could be more urgent than this?”

“What could be more urgent than discovering that my lessons on manners have had no effect?”

At this, Million slapped her chest and stomped her feet in her seat.

“Teacher! Are you serious? It’s about the Marquis of Dietrion!”

Though she had suspected it, Liv now knew for sure: rumors had spread like wildfire overnight. She dreaded to think just how exaggerated those rumors might have become.

When Liv hesitated, Million’s eyes lit up, and she leaned forward.

“Is it true?”

“I don’t know what you’ve heard…”

“That the Marquis of Dietrion has fallen into a great love story!”

Could she even hope to correct such a ridiculous claim? Feeling a growing sense of despair, Liv answered calmly, “I owe the Marquis a great deal.”

“Aaaah, he really is in love with you?!”

“Million, it’s not love—it’s a debt.”

Fortunately, Million didn’t seem jealous of Liv’s involvement with the Marquis. Instead, she was busy screaming in excitement, as if a storybook romance had come to life before her eyes.

Liv tried her best to temper Million’s rose-colored imagination with realistic details, but Million paid her no mind.

And Million wasn’t the only one excited.

“Sister, are you really involved with such an incredible person?”

“It’s complicated, Corida. It’s not like…”

“Aaah! What are we going to do?!”

“Sister, you’re amazing! How did you meet? Was it love at first sight?”

“Well, actually…”

“We should hire an author right away! We need to turn this into a novel!”

“How romantic!”

“…Please, both of you, give me a moment to explain.”

 After almost an hour of talking non-stop, Million and Corida finally calmed down.

It was only then that Liv learned that Million, having heard the news from the maids about the rumors spreading the night before, had rushed out of her parents’ house without permission. Million’s rash actions were one thing, but what were the maids thinking, letting her leave like that?

After immediately sending a message to Baron Pendence through the maids, Liv decided to get to the bottom of what exactly was being said about her.

“So the only concrete facts being mentioned are the accounts from the pharmacy and the boutique.”

That was to be expected. No one had any real knowledge of the connection between Liv and the Marquis.

The only verifiable fact was that the Marquis had visited the pharmacy and the boutique with Liv. Everything else that had spread was simply speculation and imagination based on those facts.

If that was all, she could probably manage the situation. At least there was one truth she could make absolutely clear.

“I told you I owed the Marquis a lot, didn’t I? The truth is, he’s the one supporting Corida’s treatment.”

At Liv’s words, Corida’s eyes widened as she interrupted her sister. “Sister! You never mentioned that it was the Marquis of Dietrion helping us!”

“He’s not someone whose identity can be easily disclosed.”

Liv’s explanation was simple yet easy for anyone to accept.

“That’s why I went to Hyrob. The Marquis kindly made arrangements for me to purchase the new medicine.”

It was fortunate that the first place the Marquis had taken Liv was Hyrob. Since she had even argued with the gatekeeper there, it made it easier to create a plausible excuse.

“As for the boutique… That wasn’t planned. When they treated me dismissively at Hyrob, the Marquis took pity on me and decided to help.”

Liv didn’t want to mention the fact that she had been mistreated at Hyrob, especially not in front of these young girls. But it was better than letting their wild fantasies grow unchecked.

“I can imagine what kind of rumors are circulating, but they’re not true. Nobles of high status sometimes offer anonymous support privately. We were just lucky enough to be chosen.”

It was a much more realistic and plausible explanation than some vague love story.

Million seemed slightly disappointed, which made Liv feel somewhat relieved as she added gently, “So, Million, if this topic comes up in conversation with your friends, could you correct the misunderstanding?”

Liv clearly remembered the commotion caused when the Marquis had visited during Million’s birthday party. Naturally, those young noble girls would now be dying to dig for more information. Since Liv was Million’s private tutor, people would inevitably direct their questions at Million.

It was a bit awkward to think of using Million to clear up the rumors, but it was far more effective than trying to do so herself. At least no one would dare mistreat Million.

Of course, this excuse wouldn’t hold up forever. If the Marquis continued to act openly without regard for others’ opinions, talk of support or sponsorship would become meaningless.

Still, without a story like this, Liv had no other way to explain her relationship with the Marquis. Whatever kind of relationship the two of them developed later, it would be best if it began with the idea of “support.”

“I never imagined the Marquis would be interested in sponsorship.”

“Neither did I—I was so surprised to find out.”

Pouting slightly, Million turned to Corida. “So, Corida, does that mean you’ve never met the Marquis?”

“No, I’ve only ever gone for treatment…”

Corida nodded with an embarrassed expression, then suddenly lifted her head. “But, sister, what about your overnight stay yesterday? I thought… I assumed it was because of a new love.”

“That was…”

Liv hesitated at the unexpected question. Just as she missed the chance to answer, Corida clapped her hands, seeming to understand.

“Ah, was it another visit to Baroness Pendence?”

Liv remembered using “Baroness Pendence” as an excuse when her extra work had been confirmed. It was the same excuse she used every time she was late.

Aware of Million, who was glancing between herself and Corida with wide eyes, Liv hurriedly changed the topic.

“How did you two become friends anyway? Didn’t you just meet today?”

Raising her voice deliberately, she managed to shift their focus.

Million responded to Liv’s question, “Oh, I came to see you, but you weren’t home, so I waited. While waiting, I talked to Corida, and we got to know each other!”

With Million being so cheerful and Corida so sociable, they seemed to have had no trouble becoming friends.

Lately, Corida had become more social, likely thanks to meeting more people. With Million, she must have shown kindness just because Corida was Liv’s sister.

“Why didn’t you bring Corida along before? If I’d known earlier, we could have become friends much sooner.”

While working at the Pendence estate, Liv had mentioned her sick sister but never elaborated. There was no need to lay out the details of her troubled family life, and even if she did, it would only lead to feelings of inadequacy and gloom.

But now, their situation had improved, and Corida’s health was getting better. Because of that, Liv felt happy seeing Million and Corida together.

“I’m glad you two get along.”

“Million invited me to go out together.”

“There’s a festival being held by the lakeside to celebrate the visit of the Peace Pilgrims! Can Corida come with me?”

Liv was about to brush off the idea, but Million’s specific proposal made her pause.

“A festival?”

They had just met today, yet they already planned to go out together?

Seeing Liv’s hesitation, Corida chimed in, trying to support Million’s suggestion. “The doctor said I could go out! She said I’m much better now!”

Corida knew her sister better than anyone and understood how anxious she got at even the thought of Corida stepping out of the yard. So instead of relying on her own enthusiasm, she referenced Doctor Thierry’s assessment.

Liv furrowed her brow, pondering for a moment. It was true that Thierry had given a positive evaluation of Corida’s condition, but after spending so much time caring for her sister, Liv couldn’t help but feel apprehensive about her going out.

However, seeing Corida’s hopeful eyes, filled with excitement at the prospect of experiencing a festival for the first time, she couldn’t bring herself to say no.

Moreover, if she went with Million… Considering the attendants and guards that accompanied Million every time she went out, it might actually be the safest opportunity for Corida.

“The festival is still a few days away, so let me ask the doctor again, and then we can decide.”

Liv decided to leave some room for consideration. Just that was enough to make Corida’s face light up. Million, too, seemed thrilled by the idea of spending time with a new friend and spoke with excitement.

“Since the Marquis arranged for you to get the new medicine, you’ll be well in no time, and then we can go out!”

Yes, the new medicine. Not only was Corida seeing a skilled doctor, but now she was receiving treatment with the new medicine as well.

Thinking of this, the lingering worries in Liv’s mind gradually began to dissipate.

“Yes.”

It was too miraculous a change to complain or grumble about the rumors and gossip. Life had improved so much—couldn’t she handle the eyes of others?

Liv looked at Million and Corida and resolved herself. She would endure jealousy and slander gracefully. After all, there was no need to please everyone. As long as those close to her remained the same, everything else was bearable.

If it meant she could keep this peace and stay by the Marquis’s side, she could deal with all the rumors.

 



 

After Liv and the Marquis’s visits to the pharmacy and the boutique, rumors ran rampant in Buerno for some time.

However, since Liv’s identity had not been publicly confirmed and there were no further sightings, the rumors could only spread so far. After all, it’s not easy to pinpoint a specific individual based on vague descriptions like hair or eye color.

Among the well-connected families of Buerno, like Million’s, it seemed that Liv’s identity was already fully revealed. But rather than approach Liv directly, they were cautiously observing the situation.

It wasn’t as bad as Liv had feared. She even thought that if she could just disappear quietly, the rumors might fade away completely. But she couldn’t fully hide—she had to move about to collect the new medicine and tailored clothes.

At Hyrob, Liv was immediately recognized. The gatekeeper who had twice turned her away was nowhere to be seen, and she was welcomed warmly and led to an inner lounge. The shopkeeper seemed to know what had happened with the gatekeeper during Liv’s first visit.

All the new medicine secured by Hyrob was provided to Liv. Thierry had already assured her that it would speed up Corida’s recovery significantly, so Liv felt as if she had the world at her feet.

“If you leave your address, we can deliver it directly.”

“No, thank you. I’ll keep picking it up myself.”

Now that many people were paying attention to her, it was better not to leave her address anywhere. Besides, if delivery were an option, she suspected the Marquis would have assigned someone to handle it from the start.

Declining the shopkeeper’s offer politely, Liv stood up. She needed to move quickly if she wanted to visit the boutique as well.

The boutique they had visited together was the largest in Buerno, so Liv expected it to be crowded. However, upon arrival, she was surprised to find it unusually quiet.

From a distance, the bustling popularity of the boutique had always been evident, so this unexpected calmness puzzled Liv.

Was the boutique closed today?

As she hesitated at the entrance, before she even had a chance to open the door, someone suddenly rushed out from inside.

 “We were expecting you after receiving your message.”

“Ah… yes.”

It took Liv a moment of looking at the woman to recognize her as the owner of the boutique. It wasn’t that Liv couldn’t remember the face of someone she had only met once; it was because the owner’s complexion had clearly worsened over the past few days.

“Please come this way.”

Even at Hyrob, the owner had not rushed out to greet her so frantically. Liv couldn’t help but find it strange, especially since she still remembered the envious and jealous looks she had received during her previous visit to the boutique. She had been prepared to face more of those furtive glances today, yet no one even dared to look at her directly.

“Please have a seat here. I’ll have some refreshments prepared shortly.”

“No, I only need to collect the clothing I ordered.”

Liv barely finished shaking her head before the owner’s face went pale.

“Please, allow me the chance to at least serve you a cup of tea, my lady.”

For a moment, Liv wondered if she had done something as drastic as strangling the owner with her own hands. Naturally, she hadn’t laid a finger on her, but the way the owner looked—like she might faint if Liv refused again—made it impossible for her to decline any further.

Reluctantly, Liv took the seat offered, and the owner urgently gestured to an employee. The staff, shoulders hunched, set up an elaborate spread of refreshments on the table. The tea set they used was so lavish that it almost hurt Liv’s eyes.

By this point, Liv had caught on to the strangeness of the situation. More honestly, there was only one reason that came to mind for why they were acting this way.

“I didn’t ask the Marquis to do anything.”

“Pardon?”

“Since I made no request, I cannot undo whatever he decided to do.”

The owner’s face stiffened at Liv’s words, and she remained silent. Swallowing nervously, the owner glanced toward the door, and all the boutique employees filed into the lounge one by one. Liv quietly watched as they lowered their heads in shame.

The apprentice who stood at the front, the most visible position, looked almost corpse-like.

“My lady, I made a grave mistake during your last visit.”

“The apprentice who was still learning had many shortcomings. Such an error will not happen again.”

The owner spoke in support of the apprentice, explaining that they had been dismissed and that today they were here to offer an apology.

Quietly observing, Liv shifted her gaze to the other employees standing behind the apprentice. They, too, kept their heads bowed, their expressions hidden. Unlike the apprentice, they showed no intention of stepping forward to apologize or explain.

To Liv, the small scratch from the pin was no big deal… It was something that could have genuinely been a mistake—just that insignificant.

Even the envious glances she had felt that day might have just been her own insecurities projecting misunderstandings.

“So are you admitting that you disrespected me by assigning an apprentice to handle my request?”

Despite these thoughts, Liv knew she couldn’t simply let this situation pass.

“Pardon? N-no, that’s not what I meant!”

“Even though the Marquis himself instructed that my clothes be made, you openly assigned an apprentice. Such remarkable judgment.”

The owner looked at Liv, visibly flustered. Liv tried to recall the Marquis’s cold demeanor, attempting to replicate it. It was not an easy task for her.

“Or is it that you lack the discernment to have an experienced employee step in for an incompetent apprentice?”

“My lady—”

“Or are you perhaps suggesting that the employees decided on their own to dump the work on an apprentice? If you can’t manage your staff’s misconduct, that’s a problem too.”

The owner’s face flushed bright red, but she remained speechless. The room was silent, and no one dared to breathe audibly.

This kind of atmosphere made Liv uncomfortable. She didn’t enjoy cornering someone like this. It wasn’t satisfying or pleasant.

However, since the Marquis had already expressed displeasure towards this boutique on her behalf, Liv knew she couldn’t easily forgive them, even for his sake.

“I apologize. The mistake of my employee is ultimately my responsibility. It was all my inadequacy.”

The owner bowed deeply, and Liv, suppressing her discomfort, averted her gaze.

“I’m not saying people shouldn’t feel envious. But forming a group to act on those feelings is another matter entirely. Especially when responsibility is glossed over—how can your apology come across as sincere?”

The staff, who were lined up like they were being punished, hunched their shoulders. Outwardly, they all looked remorseful.

But Liv didn’t think their jealousy had disappeared. In fact, after this incident, it was likely that their simplistic envy would turn into fierce hatred.

They would feel wronged, angry, and bitter. They would curse her behind her back, saying it was ridiculous to make such a fuss over a little pinprick.

Liv smiled bitterly. She could easily imagine how she must look to them.

Perhaps just a fussy mistress, arrogantly flaunting her immense backing.

“I’ll collect the clothing I ordered, but I have no desire to continue dealing with a boutique lacking professionalism.”

After all, trying to be moderately kind would only give rise to more gossip. If she was going to be talked about behind her back regardless, she might as well make sure they had nothing to say to her face—especially people like this.

By causing this uproar, at least they wouldn’t dare use such petty tricks again.

“My lady!”

“Bring me the finished clothing.”

Liv had a feeling she would face similar situations several more times in the future.

She wasn’t thrilled about it, but she knew she had to get used to it.

Initially planning to head straight home after the ordeal at the boutique, Liv changed her mind.

Since she wanted to avoid this street as much as possible, she decided to take care of all her errands while she was out.

After loading her belongings onto a rented carriage, Liv, wearing her hat low, walked briskly to a shop selling various accessories related to clothing. She had been thinking about getting some gifts for Philip or Adolf and had eventually decided on handkerchiefs as the safest option.

Once, she wouldn’t even have looked at an upscale shop like this, but now such spending wasn’t a burden for her.

“The handkerchiefs are displayed over here.”

As Liv followed the employee’s guidance, she paused to glance at something. The employee, noticing her interest, also turned to see what had caught her attention.

“Those are premium items that our store specially handles. They are supplied to noble households, so they come at a considerable price,” the employee explained cautiously. It seemed that they had assumed Liv’s financial status based on her attire.

Liv left the employee behind and approached the display case decisively. The first thing she noticed was a pair of sparkling cufflinks. She also saw a shiny silver boutonnière and a sleek cravat. The display appeared more intended for showcasing items rather than for sale.

Liv slowly examined the items until her gaze lingered on a display case at the far end.

“Do you have gloves suitable for someone distinguished?”

“If they’re for someone distinguished… would they be for a lady?”

“No, for a gentleman.”

“Of course, we do.”

The employee, who had asked her to wait a moment, moved swiftly to retrieve the item. While she waited, Liv quietly stared into the display case.

She thought of the Marquis, who always wore gloves except when they were intimate. Surely, he had his gloves custom-made from high-quality materials.

Even if she gifted them, she might never see him wear them.

“My lady, do you know the size by any chance?”

The employee, who had gone to retrieve the product, peeked out and asked.

Liv answered in a calm voice, “Yes, I know.”

She remembered the size of the hands that touched her vividly and clearly.

 



 

It was the greatest luxury of her life.

Even after adding up the cost of all the handkerchiefs she bought as gifts for others, they couldn’t compare to the price of the gloves she intended for the Marquis.

Surely her hands didn’t shake while paying?

“Thank you. Please carry them over there.”

With the help of the coachman, Liv moved the surprisingly large amount of items in front of her house, feeling a sense of accomplishment. She thought she should reduce her outings for a while and spend more time with Corida.

After adding a bit of extra compensation for the coachman and sending him off, Liv turned to go inside.

“Liv!”

Drawn by the familiar voice, she turned around and saw Brad approaching in his worn clothes.

Upon catching her eye, Brad beamed and rushed over, only to be suddenly intercepted by others. They were the guards assigned by the Marquis during Liv’s overnight stay, and they had stayed on, maintaining order around the area.

“Wait, I’m a friend of Liv! Liv! Please spare me a moment!”

“…I know him. It’s fine; let him go.”

At Liv’s words, the guards obediently released Brad. His arm hurt slightly from being held, and he rubbed it with a groan before hurriedly approaching Liv, afraid of being stopped again.

 “Liv! I’m so glad to see you. I’ve been searching for you everywhere. Do you have any idea how shocked I was to hear that you suddenly moved?”

It had been a while since she’d last seen Brad, and his face looked significantly gaunt.

Liv, who was watching him with a somewhat wary look, calmly asked, “How did you find this place?”

“That’s not what’s important, Liv. We need to talk. It’s really urgent. It’s about our work.”

Hearing the word ‘work’ made Liv flinch. She realized that she had completely forgotten about the work she had been doing with Brad for some time now.

Technically, the contract for Brad’s nude painting was still valid; it was merely on pause.

“Let me move these things inside first.”

“Yes, yes!”

Even though Brad nodded eagerly, there was an anxious glint in his eyes as he glanced around nervously.

Had he gotten involved with a swindler?

A dark unease began to stir within Liv. She couldn’t tell if it was worry for Brad or for herself, once his nude model.

They considered going to a nearby coffeehouse, but the subject they needed to discuss was sensitive, so they decided it would be too dangerous to talk in a public space. After much deliberation, they agreed that Brad’s studio was the most suitable place to talk.

It had been a long time since Liv last visited Brad’s studio, but it was still cold and stale.

Having grown used to the pristine mansion of the Marquis, Liv couldn’t help but frown as soon as she stepped inside Brad’s studio. The overwhelming scent of cheap paint made her head ache.

“Uh, I should at least make you some tea…”

“It’s fine. More importantly, what’s this about our work?”

“What do you mean?! We need to start working on the Marquis’s nude painting again!”

Brad’s eyes widened, and he raised his voice instantly. However, when Liv didn’t respond, his anxious expression returned.

“I, I wasn’t well for a while and couldn’t work. But now that I’ve recovered, I want to resume.”

“…Brad. Do you honestly think the Marquis believed that excuse?”

“Excuse? What are you talking about, Liv?”

“You said you were planning an exhibition in the capital.”

At Liv’s calm words, Brad’s face turned pale.

“Did you take a good look at the exhibition hall?”

Brad, who had been staring at Liv blankly, slowly grimaced.

He had told Liv about his plans for the exhibition, but he hadn’t mentioned anything about going to the capital to check the exhibition hall. From his reaction, it seemed he could easily guess who Liv had spoken with.

“…Did you tell my wife about the venue fee? Was it you?”

“Is that important?”

“Of course it is! Because of that, my wife has… How could you do this to me, Liv? You just destroyed an entire family!”

Brad’s agitated words and disjointed accusations gave Liv an idea of what he must have been through.

Liv pressed her forehead and took a deep breath before speaking calmly, “Your wife didn’t know about the venue fee at all. Are you saying you couldn’t have predicted what kind of problems it would cause?”

“Liv!”

“I told you it seemed strange back then. I told you to deal with it before it got worse.”

“Ha! Aren’t you just so perfect!”

Brad, who had been grumbling under his breath, suddenly rubbed his face with both hands, cursing quietly. Then he mumbled as if confessing.

“You’re right, Liv. I was foolish. I must have been blinded by the hope of having an exhibition. I admit it, I should have listened to your advice.”

Brad’s face was flushed, and his shoulders drooped as he paced nervously around the studio.

“That’s why I came to you now. You gave me honest advice back then! You’re the only one who can help me now. Please, Liv, help me.”

“How can I help you?”

When Liv shook her head, Brad’s eyes flashed, and he took several steps toward her, grabbing her arms with a tight grip.

“No, you can help me! You’re the woman who suddenly appeared next to Marquis Dietrion, right? Reddish-brown hair, green eyes—that’s you, isn’t it? Right?”

Brad’s voice trembled with excitement as he mentioned that he had heard the rumors and was convinced it was her.

She had a feeling that denying it would be pointless. Besides, lying to escape the situation might only come back to haunt her later.

So Liv chose to remain silent, neither confirming nor denying it.

“If the Marquis keeps giving me commissions, it’ll all be sorted out. As long as the nude paintings keep selling, the problem will be solved.”

His grip on her arms hurt. Liv struggled to free herself and took a step back, shaking her head once more.

“That’s not something I can do.”

Brad, who looked like he was about to kneel at any moment, gritted his teeth at Liv’s repeated refusal and shouted in frustration, his face twisted in anger.

“How did you even get the Marquis’s attention?! It was all because of me! I painted you!”

“Brad.”

“Please, Liv. I could really die like this. I barely managed to escape this time. If they catch me again, I’ll disappear without a trace.”

It seemed Brad really was cornered. Even setting aside his usual poor circumstances, his appearance now looked no different from that of a vagrant.

The smell of stale sweat and musty odor mixed with the scent of paint that filled the studio. His beard, left untrimmed for who knows how long, was scruffy, and his hair stuck out messily beneath his hunting cap. His sharp gaze, his eyes bloodshot, indicated he hadn’t slept properly in days.

How could someone become so haggard? What kind of swindler had he gotten tangled up with?

“Earlier, I saw your new home. I know your circumstances. The Marquis gave it to you, didn’t he? I have my pride, so I won’t ask for that. Just save my life. Please?”

Brad forced a smile, his voice pitiful.

“My wife and children have all left me. There’s no one left by my side.”

A part of Liv wanted to turn away without listening to anything more. But she couldn’t—she had no idea what Brad might do if she coldly pushed him away now.

Brad was the painter she had worked with on the nude paintings. And Liv’s history as a nude model was something that absolutely couldn’t be exposed.

“What do you want from me?”

“Just say something to the Marquis for me. Please?”

“There’s no way the Marquis would listen to me.”

Brad seemed to think she was some great courtesan. Someone who could twist a man’s heart with just a word, who could make him dance to her tune with just a touch of her fingertips.

Yes, the Marquis treated Liv well. But it was because she knew how to behave and avoid displeasing him. He himself had told her to act wisely.

And it was none other than the Marquis who had warned her to keep her distance from Brad. Delivering Brad’s words would only backfire.

“How about I lend you some money? Use it to deal with whatever’s most urgent.”

Liv offered another option. Unfortunately, it didn’t seem to satisfy Brad at all.

“This isn’t something money can fix!”

Grinding his teeth, Brad finally lost control of the anger he had been holding back and raised his voice again.

“Is it such a big deal to just say a few words on my behalf? You’re living in luxury thanks to me! Do you really think you could’ve become the Marquis’s mistress without my nude painting?!”

Liv’s face went pale at Brad’s crude outburst.

“What did you say?”

“Don’t play dumb! I always knew it would come to this. I knew you’d eventually seduce someone!”

Brad twisted his lips.

“Shouldn’t you be grateful to me for advertising your body to the Marquis? I made it possible for you to seduce the greatest nobleman in Buerno!”

Brad’s explicit and unfiltered words fell over Liv like icy daggers. It felt as though she had been slashed from head to toe.

Liv’s lips quivered in unnamable emotion. She bit down hard on her molars.

“We can’t have a proper conversation like this.”

Liv abruptly turned her body. Only then did Brad, who had been ranting furiously, snap back to his senses. As Liv reached for the doorknob to leave, Brad grabbed her arm desperately and spoke hurriedly.

“Liv, Liv! I misspoke. Please, just wait a moment! Liv!”

Liv forcefully shook off Brad’s arm and gripped the doorknob tightly.

Instead of immediately opening the door, she took a deep breath. Without looking back, Liv spoke in a restrained voice, “I’ll tell him, but I can’t influence his decision.”

“Thank you! Thank you so much, Liv!”

Brad, filled with joy, kept expressing his gratitude. Liv didn’t look back at him once as she left the studio.

 She needed to at least say she would. If she hadn’t, Brad, now cornered, might have gone mad and sold out Liv’s secrets.

If Brad said something like that, the Marquis would intervene. Rather than trying to appease him in vain, seeking the Marquis’s help seemed safer. Surely the Marquis wouldn’t want the nude painting project to become public knowledge, so he would take some sort of action.

No, even without such interests, he would help her. Because he cherished her. He said he cherished her; he had even said he disliked seeing her marred…

Caught up in these scattered thoughts, Liv almost got hit by a carriage before she realized she had been walking straight into the middle of the street.

“Where are your eyes, lady!”

The coachman’s curses echoed loudly. Liv, her face pale, hurriedly moved to the edge of the sidewalk.

She felt a slight sweat at the back of her neck, not because she had almost been run over by the carriage.

 

“Do you really think you could’ve become the Marquis’s mistress without my nude painting?!”

 

Brad’s voice, filled with rage, wouldn’t leave her ears.

Liv couldn’t deny his words. Though she tried to cover it up with the ridiculous term “extra work,” she knew exactly how the world defined her relationship with the Marquis.

She would occasionally be summoned for sex, and in exchange, she would receive his favor, various support, and money.

She knew this, but she kept trying not to think of it that way. She repeatedly told herself that she hadn’t offered her body with a merchant’s heart. She desired him—his body, or perhaps his heart.

But no matter how much she tried to dress it up, it was ultimately just rationalization.

 

“Shouldn’t you be grateful to me? I made it possible for you to seduce the greatest nobleman in Buerno!”

 

Brad wasn’t wrong.

Everyone would think that way about her. That a woman with no merits threw herself at the Marquis to seduce him. And indeed, that was the truth.

To win the Marquis’s favor, she had given everything she could, even those precious things she had long guarded with her pride intact.

She didn’t want to hear herself called a mistress.

She didn’t want to be treated like that. What she desperately wanted from the Marquis wasn’t just the right to be in his bed, or the luxurious materials she could receive from him, or the status that came from being by his side.

Liv closed her eyes tightly.

Ah, in the end, I sold my heart for cheap.

My heart is worth nothing more than a mistress’s place.

“Teacher Rodaise?”

A cautious voice called from behind her, snapping her out of her thoughts. Slowly, Liv opened her eyes and turned around. There, awkwardly standing behind her, was Camille.

“Are you all right?”

Once confirming it was indeed Liv, Camille quickly approached her. Liv, staring blankly at him, saw him add an explanation in haste.

“Ah, I happened to be passing by and saw you. I really didn’t expect to see you here.”

Whether it was coincidence or not, she didn’t care at the moment. With a detached look, Liv brushed her bangs back. She felt drained without doing anything.

“You look very pale… Are you unwell?”

“I’m fine.”

Liv answered firmly and tried to continue walking, but she had to stop again, suddenly feeling dizzy.

Seeing her sway, Camille spoke with concern, “It would be best for you to sit down and rest nearby. Allow me to assist you.”

“No, I’m—”

“You really don’t look well.”

This wasn’t because she was physically unwell. It was more of a temporary issue caused by mental shock.

Camille stepped closer, intending to support her. After a moment’s hesitation, Liv eventually accepted his outstretched hand.

Maybe it was just that too many things had happened today. Perhaps, as Camille said, if she sat somewhere and rested, she would soon feel better.

“Can you walk to the park? Or perhaps that coffeehouse over there…”

He trailed off. The reason was the carriage that noisily pulled to a stop beside them.

Both Liv and Camille turned their heads toward the carriage.

“They’re driving quite recklessly. It would be better to move away from the street,” Camille muttered with a frown, gently pulling Liv further onto the sidewalk. But Liv instead pulled her hand away from his. Her gaze remained fixed on the carriage.

“Teacher Rodaise?”

“Thank you for your help. I’m fine now.”

“What? Suddenly…”

Camille looked at her, confused, before following her gaze to the carriage.

It was an ordinary, unmarked black carriage that, at a glance, looked no different from any other hired carriage along the street.

However, upon closer inspection, each component of the carriage was clearly of high quality. Above all, the coachman made no effort to hide that he recognized Liv, giving her a nod. Liv also bowed her head slightly in return.

“…So the rumors were true?”

Camille’s muttered words were stiff with tension. Liv, wearing an expression of indifference, bid him farewell.

Camille, stunned, couldn’t even properly respond to her parting words. But just as Liv was about to turn away, he grabbed her arm.

“Are you in any danger? If you need help, just say the word.”

He glanced at the half-open carriage window before looking back at Liv.

“I will help you.”

Liv couldn’t understand his exact intentions, but one thing was certain—the concern in his offer was genuine.

Liv looked at Camille quietly, then dropped her gaze. She moved her dry lips a few times before shaking her head.

“He is a good person to me.”

“But—”

“Even if he’s not good to you, he’s good to me.”

Liv spoke with a faint smile, and Camille couldn’t hold onto her any longer. Liv gently smiled at the sight of Camille’s defeated hand dropping and turned to head for the carriage.

When she opened the door with practiced ease, she saw a familiar figure sitting inside. The man resting his chin in his hand looked at her steadily through the open door. Liv slowly climbed into the carriage while gazing at his arrogant blue eyes.

The black carriage carrying Liv departed without hesitation, leaving Camille standing alone in the street.

 



 

I’ll need to station a black carriage and coachman permanently.

Daaemon thought this when he received the news from the guards stationed in front of Liv’s house about Brad.

It seemed he needed to tighten his control over her daily life even more.

He had left her alone, thinking she would manage on her own, but Liv still hadn’t grasped the situation.

He had explicitly told her not to worry about that painter, yet she had still gone to meet him?

Clicking his tongue, he had come to fetch her, only to find her holding hands affectionately with yet another vermin he had told her not to associate with. It was quite the spectacle.

To make matters worse, Liv, seemingly unaware of Daaemon’s  foul mood, even attempted a clumsy request.

“Brad’s health has improved. He wishes to finish the nude painting we were working on…”

The painter, whom Daaemon thought would have been caught by his debtors by now, seemed to have slipped away like a rat. It was clear that he still hoped for something from Daaemon, given that he had managed to contact Liv again.

“I believe I told you it would be best not to get involved with him.”

“You did, of course, but Brad painted my nude portrait. How could I just ignore him?”

“Are you worried that he might go mad and talk about you?”

Liv’s composed expression wavered slightly. She turned her head, seemingly in an attempt to regain her composure, but in the closed carriage, it made little difference. The half-open window had been closed shut the moment she boarded.

Daaemon, watching Liv stare stubbornly at the firmly closed window, found her ridiculous and reached out. With minimal effort, he easily turned Liv’s gaze back to him.

Daaemon frowned as he faced her directly. He hadn’t noticed before, as she had kept her head down or looked away the whole time since getting into the carriage, but now that he saw her up close, she looked quite unwell.

Could it be that the painter had threatened her over the nude painting?

He was cornered enough to do such a thing, and Liv, terrified at the thought of her nude painting being exposed, was certainly vulnerable to such threats.

“Should I kill him for you?”

Daaemon, tilting his head slightly, spoke in a disinterested tone.

 Liv appeared bewildered, unable to immediately understand what Daaemon had said, perhaps because of his casual tone. Her large eyes blinked at him, looking quite adorable.

It improved Daaemon’s  mood somewhat, which had plummeted vertically upon seeing her with that Eleonore brat.

“If that painter disappeared, there would be no one left to spread rumors about you being a nude model. It wouldn’t be hard, you know.”

Brad was already a man buried in debt. Who would find it strange if he suddenly dropped dead on the streets? His death wouldn’t attract any attention.

In this world, even death has value.

“Tell me. Do you want me to kill him for you?”

“…That’s not what I want.”

The words came out weakly, accompanied by a faint tremor.

“Why not? Is there a cleaner, more convenient solution than killing him?”

“I only wish for my relationship with Brad to end without trouble.”

Liv’s hands, neatly placed on her lap, tightened. Her small hands, clutching her skirt, looked rather desperate.

“How could I accept someone’s death as a comfortable solution?”

Daaemon let out a cynical laugh. “I don’t know whether to call you soft-hearted or just scared.”

Whether she took his smile as mockery or not, Liv lowered her gaze dejectedly.

Today, she seemed unusually listless. Daaemon was certain that Liv, usually quick to sense his moods, had no idea what he was feeling now.

He liked having her around because of her perceptiveness, but strangely, he didn’t entirely dislike her cluelessness today, even if it stemmed from her own emotional state. It was a new side of her, which made it rather amusing.

“Did you know?”

Daaemon’s  thumb brushed slowly along Liv’s eye.

“I’m being very generous with you.”

Liv’s eyelashes trembled slightly at his words. She looked up, her green eyes meeting his.

Those green eyes, which he had always thought of as obedient, now held an unusually vivid presence. No matter how fine an emerald one brought, it couldn’t compare to these eyes.

Daaemon touched Liv’s eye area again, caressing it gently.

Maybe he had rubbed it too much, as the skin around her eye looked a bit red. With her reddened eye area, Liv looked like she might burst into tears at any moment.

“Don’t hang around with that brat.”

“Do you mean Teacher Camille Marcel?”

“Yes.”

Marcel, huh? Was that the name he had approached Liv with?

Daaemon let out a mocking laugh as he thought of Camille—the black-haired, rather lively-looking guy who had stood there. Camille hadn’t even tried to hide his wariness, as if he knew who was in the pitch-black carriage. Instead, he’d deliberately raised his voice, offering Liv his ‘help.’

If he weren’t an Eleonore, Daaemon would have taken care of him long ago.

Unfortunately, the Eleonore family held significant power in Beren. Even someone like Daaemon, who cared little for others’ opinions, would find life in Beren troublesome if he openly dealt with an Eleonore.

On the battlefield, it might be different, but not in a society where one wore the mask of a gentleman.

Just thinking about Camille soured Daaemon’s  mood again. He frowned and clicked his tongue, and Liv asked in a quiet tone. 

“Is he still digging into your affairs, Marquis?”

Of course, he was. Daaemon found it laughable, though—how much could Camille actually do with whatever information he uncovered?

Although Camille’s rat-like persistence was indeed bothersome, the reason Daaemon repeated this warning to Liv wasn’t because of that.

“More than that, I just don’t like the way he looks at you.”

“…The way he looks at me?”

Liv seemed taken aback by the unexpected response. Daaemon nodded indifferently.

“I can tell just by his gaze how aroused he is.”

Liv’s pale face flushed red. It reminded Daaemon of the moment red paint was first applied to a blank white canvas.

“I have no relationship with Teacher Marcel. Our meeting earlier was a coincidence, and even then, I only sought his help briefly because I wasn’t feeling well.”

“Of course, there’s nothing between you. He’s the only one lusting after you.”

If there had been any connection between Camille and Liv, there was no way he would still be walking around unscathed. Even if his family’s name might protect his life, at least one of his legs would have been broken long ago.

“But, Teacher, no matter how urgent it is, don’t just ask anyone for help.”

At Daaemon’s  words, Liv bit her lip. There was an inexplicable sadness in her tightly pressed lips.

“Then, will you always be there when I need help, Marquis?”

“Isn’t that obvious? Haven’t I always been there for you?”

When Daaemon answered in a puzzled tone, Liv fell silent, seemingly at a loss for words. He tilted his head toward her.

“Like today.”

He whispered softly in her ear, and almost simultaneously, Liv leaned into his embrace.

Like a child seeking comfort, Liv clung to him, and Daaemon willingly held her.

 



 

Now, Liv used the black carriage for all her outings. The guards stationed near her house remained in place.

She didn’t go out often. Had she still been visiting the Pendence estate to teach Million, she might have had a reason to leave the house, but since guests had been visiting the Pendence estate for some time, she had stopped going altogether, leaving her with even fewer reasons to step outside.

Her already limited daily life had become even more restricted. The people Liv interacted with now were mostly those from Berryworth or Langess estates. Even then, aside from Philip, Adolf, and a few other familiar employees, she kept her distance from everyone else.

It was frustrating, but that didn’t mean she wanted to break free from this lifestyle. Not wandering through Buerno meant she didn’t hear the rumors circulating, which made everything feel a little less exhausting.

After all, she couldn’t stay like this forever.

Liv decided to think of this time as a short vacation. She had lived fiercely for so long, trying to make ends meet. It wasn’t such a bad thing to allow herself to relax and enjoy this uneventful period.

As she settled into this leisurely life, the day for the opera she had been given tickets for by the Marquis finally approached.

Although the event was scheduled for the evening, Liv began her preparations early. Unlike her usual simple attire, today required a lot more attention.

The newly tailored outfits were part of it. Changing into her clothes took longer, and she had to rely on Corida’s help.

“You look so beautiful, Sister!”

Corida clapped her hands in admiration. Liv gave her an awkward smile before sitting in front of the mirror.

Having never applied makeup to match such fancy clothes and accessories, she felt completely lost. But it was better to attempt something than to leave her appearance half-done.

True to their tailored fit, the clothes felt more comfortable than usual. However, despite not feeling any physical discomfort, there was still an odd sense of tightness. Ignoring that feeling, Liv took a deep breath.

In the mirror, she saw a pale-faced woman, her jawline appearing sharper from the recent weight loss.

Had she really been staying home too much? She seemed particularly lifeless—even more so than Corida.

“Wow, the necklace is beautiful…”

Liv, who was reaching for the makeup tools, glanced at Corida. Her sister’s attention had shifted from her outfit to the jewelry she would wear.

“Is this also a gift from the Marquis?”

“It’s not really a gift… Anyway, since I’m going to the theater as his partner, I couldn’t just go in anything. I had to make sure I at least matched his level.”

Though calling it ‘matching his level’ was an understatement—the jewelry was extravagant.

Corida, staring dreamily at the diamond necklace, suddenly turned her head and looked at Liv seriously.

“Sister, I think the Marquis must like you. Supporting my treatment is all because of you. I’m sure of it.”

Had she grown fond of romance novels after becoming friends with Million?

Liv momentarily thought so, then dismissed the thought.

Outsiders openly whispered that Liv was the Marquis’s mistress. Corida had even less exposure to the outside world than Liv, sparing her from such rumors for now, but who knew when she might hear something unexpected? It was far better for her to hold onto this romantic belief, even if it was mistaken.

Still, Liv couldn’t bring herself to agree with Corida’s words, so she quietly offered an excuse.

“He simply didn’t have a suitable partner today…”

“Sister, just because I stay home doesn’t mean I don’t know anything.”

Feeling somewhat caught, Liv looked at Corida with a slightly stiff gaze. Unfazed, Corida crossed her arms confidently.

“People don’t spend their time or money on someone they’re not interested in.”

Corida’s voice brimmed with confidence. Liv, who had been staring at her incredulously, squinted and asked, “Who on earth told you that?”

“Cyril did!”

Ah, her friend from Mazurkan.

“…You two seem to have a lot of conversations.”

Liv had wondered what on earth they could have so much to say that they used up so much stationery, but it seemed they were thoroughly engrossed in the interests of girls their age.

Liv let out a hollow laugh at the unexpected way she confirmed Corida’s friendships. Whatever Liv’s smile meant, Corida patted her back with a deliberately mature expression.

“Sister, have courage. In my eyes, you’re worth so much more.”

It was truly a ridiculous thing to say. But Corida probably meant it.

Even if the whole world criticized Liv for aiming beyond her station, Corida would give her a thumbs up and say her sister was the best.

“Just hearing that is enough, Corida.”

Thanks to Corida’s small help with the preparations, the remaining time passed relatively smoothly, and Liv was able to finish getting ready earlier than the scheduled time.

 “Sister…”

Liv, who had been checking the distance to the theater in her head and repeatedly looking at the clock on the table, turned to look at Corida. Corida was holding her flushed cheeks with both hands.

“Sister, you’re so beautiful…”

“What’s that supposed to mean?”

“I mean it! There’s no one as beautiful as you at the theater today! The Marquis probably won’t be able to pay attention to the opera at all!”

Liv finally burst into laughter at Corida, who was using every word she knew to compliment her. Corida’s eyes had lost all objectivity, and Liv figured that more than half of what she said was exaggerated… but it was still nice to hear.

Well, it was true that today was especially fancy compared to usual.

Liv glanced at the mirror. Her previously pale face looked somewhat decent thanks to makeup, and instead of the usual cleanly tied-up hair, her locks were styled in loose waves. The hair accessory was rather simple, but the other jewelry was so lavish that the simplicity provided a nice balance.

The shape of the necklace covering her neck and collarbone required her to wear a dress that exposed her shoulders. Compared to her usual attire, it was quite revealing, but it was a style currently in vogue among the upper class.

The dress, made of smooth cream-colored silk, cinched tightly at the waist, subtly accentuating her figure. Without the accompanying cape, she wouldn’t have had the courage to step outside.

“How are the shoes? Do they hurt?”

Naturally, she had bought new shoes when she had her outfit made. They were plain enough to match her tailored dress. The shoes were not as comfortable as the worn-out ones Liv was used to, given their unfamiliar height and fit, but there was no way she could wear old leather shoes with an outfit like this. It would have been disastrous if even a peek of the old shoes showed beneath the hem.

“Shoes become comfortable the more you wear them, so I’ll just have to walk a lot today.”

No matter what it was, practice made perfect.

So stepping out of the house in this attire, too, would probably become easier with time.

 



 

Entering before the opera started would mean bumping shoulders with many people.

So they deliberately planned their entrance for just after the start of the performance. However, for some reason, they arrived at the theater slightly earlier than expected.

Daaemon sat in the carriage, absentmindedly staring out the window. Liv hadn’t arrived yet, and outside, guests who had come to watch the opera were bustling around. Set against the backdrop of the sparkling theater building, each guest looked extravagant and elegant. Most of them appeared to be nobles or members of the wealthy upper class.

Daaemon imagined Liv standing among them.

Up until now, the Liv he had seen always dressed modestly and plainly. Even when he had met her at the Pendence barony, that was the case. Her clothes for her tutor duties were likely her best, yet they couldn’t hide the worn cuffs or frayed hemline from years of use.

The thought of Liv standing there dressed like that felt so out of place it made him sigh.

He had given her clothes to wear and jewelry to put on. Surely, she wouldn’t stubbornly come dressed in her usual attire, letting her modest nature get the better of her.

Daaemon found himself regretting not stopping by her house beforehand to confirm this. It was an uncharacteristic feeling for him—so rare that it was almost shocking—but he wasn’t aware of his own state of mind.

He still had time; should he turn the carriage around now?

“Marquis.”

Daaemon’s  increasingly peculiar thoughts were interrupted by Charles. Wearing a dark coat with his collar turned up, Charles approached the open carriage window.

After making sure no one outside was paying attention, he quickly got into the carriage. He closed the window to prevent their conversation from being overheard and began his report.

“We’ve confirmed that Lady Malte is on her way here.”

Daaemon immediately frowned. “Have you found out who leaked my schedule?”

“Yes, Sir Roman has already taken care of the individual.”

“He’s finally showing his competence.”

Most of the people under Daaemon had been with him for a long time. Especially those closest to him, like aides, private soldiers, and some key employees, were connected to him from his time in the military. Charles and Roman were also part of Daaemon’s  military advisory background.

Roman, in particular, had proven his prowess in actual combat. That’s why Daaemon had entrusted him with general security, including personal protection.

“If necessary, she will reveal herself here.”

“…Luzia Malte?”

Detecting the suspicion in Daaemon’s  voice, Charles explained in a stiff tone, “It seems the annulment of her engagement to the Zighilt family ended on a bad note.”

“Ah, so she’s in need of a scandal.”

Daaemon twisted his lips into a sardonic smile. “It’s not a bad idea. Using my name would certainly irk Stephan Zighilt.”

Even though they were no longer engaged, to publicly shame him like this—she had no qualms about doing so.

Well, Luzia Malte had always been that way. Quick to change her stance, always maneuvering cleverly.

Of course, her current intention with the scandal wasn’t just to divert attention from her broken engagement. Daaemon could easily see the advantage she had in mind.

“It seems Malte is certain that Cardinal Calliope will definitely become Gratia.”

The fact that she was trying to stir up a scandal involving Daaemon showed that they had made their calculations.

A few years ago, Malte had seemed to favor Cardinal Augustine’s chances. The biggest supporter of Cardinal Augustine had been none other than Zighilt. Daaemon could easily imagine how furious Zighilt must be at Malte’s abrupt shift in loyalty.

And Stephan Zighilt.

They shared a history that was tedious and tiresome, one that extended back to their time at the military academy. It wasn’t even worth recalling.

“Honestly, with Malte’s lofty pride, there must have been a limit to how much she could tolerate that idiot Stephan.”

Daaemon muttered with a sneer, then checked his pocket watch. After noting the position of the minute hand, he cracked the window open slightly.

The street that had been bustling just a while ago was now much quieter. The opera had begun.

Daaemon kept his gaze on the now tranquil street as he gave Charles an order. “Make sure Luzia arrives late, just as planned.”

“Wouldn’t it be better to prevent her from arriving altogether?”

“I think it would be more effective to show her just how beautiful the woman by my side is.”

Charles looked at Daaemon with an incredulous expression but remained silent.

True, Liv was a beautiful woman, but compared to Luzia Malte’s beauty… Charles’s expression made it clear what he thought. Daaemon paid no attention to Charles’s barely concealed disbelief as he picked up the cane resting beside him and got out of the carriage.

Right next to his carriage, the door of another black carriage, which seemed to have just arrived, opened. With the sound of rustling, a cautious shoe tip felt for the step.

It was something he had bought for her.

The dress, the jewelry—all of it. Daaemon slowly raised his gaze, taking in every detail from her feet upwards, and took a deep breath.

Contrary to his earlier concerns, Liv had dressed just as he intended.

“Marquis? Have you been waiting long?”

Liv had been looking down, making sure of her footing, and noticed Daaemon a little late. She looked up at him with wide eyes, appearing slightly different from usual. Maybe it was because of her slightly heavier makeup, aware of the fancy dress and jewelry, or perhaps it was the way her hair was styled differently from her usual neat bun or loose waves.

Or maybe it was simply because she was wrapped in everything he had given her.

“I’ll be off then… Miss Rodaise?”

Charles, who had been standing behind Daaemon, couldn’t hide his surprise and greeted Liv. Liv’s gaze shifted from Daaemon to Charles.

Until now, Adolf had always been the one to deal with Liv, so this was her first time meeting Charles. Not knowing who he was, Liv’s face showed a hint of wariness as the stranger addressed her.

“Who are you?”

“Ah, I’m… Charles, in service to the Marquis…,” Charles stammered, uncharacteristically.

Daaemon frowned and looked back at him coldly. “Leave us.”

“Pardon?”

Even in the dim light, it was clear that Charles’s face had turned red. Daaemon’s  expression had turned as cold as ice. Seeing this change up close, Charles quickly bowed.

“I will take my leave. Have a pleasant evening, Marquis!”

Charles hurriedly left without looking back. Daaemon glared disapprovingly at the retreating figure before turning his gaze back to Liv.

She looked confused by the sudden departure, watching Charles as he left. Daaemon took her hand and placed it on his arm.

“Shall we go in?”

Liv flinched at the touch and looked down at the arm she was holding.

 “Gloves…”

The gloves Daaemon wore today were the ones Liv had cautiously gifted him a few days ago. Compared to the gloves Daaemon usually wore, they weren’t of particularly high quality, but surprisingly, they fit well and felt comfortable. More importantly, Liv knew his hand size precisely, and imagining the time she spent carefully picking something suitable for him made him feel content.

That alone was reason enough for Daaemon to wear these gloves.

“I didn’t expect you’d wear them.”

“Didn’t you give them to me to wear?”

“Of course, but you must have much better gloves, Marquis.”

Liv eyed the gloves with a peculiar look, genuinely curious.

“Knowing that, why did you give me gloves as a gift?”

“…For my own satisfaction.”

It was indeed an unusual answer, one he hadn’t considered before.

“Just like you did, Marquis, I did the same.”

Liv added this with a nonchalant tone, smiling at Daaemon before casually looking away.

Perhaps because the thought of actually stepping forward in public as the Marquis’s partner weighed heavily on her, Liv’s shoulders were visibly tense. The dress design, which left her neck fully exposed, made her dryly swallow, a movement clearly visible. Liv, with her anxious face, glanced towards the theater and slightly tilted her head.

“…There aren’t many people here?”

“That’s because the opera has already started. Didn’t you check the showtime?”

Seeing her wide eyes, he didn’t need her answer to know.

“Did you think we’d be swept along by the crowd trying to enter as the opera began?”

Liv blinked rapidly and then slowly shook her head. “You probably dislike crowded places, Marquis.”

“Right. Now that your curiosity is satisfied, let’s actually head in.”

Liv carefully started walking. A few people who lingered in front of the quiet theater building were startled to see Daaemon, whispering amongst themselves.

Their attention soon shifted to Liv, who stood beside Daaemon. They were too intimidated to approach and stood at a distance, sneaking glances like startled rabbits.

Ignoring their stares, Daaemon glanced sideways. He wondered if Liv would walk with her head down, but she faced forward quite confidently. Although she couldn’t fully hide her nervousness, considering the pressure she must have felt, her demeanor was commendable.

As he expected, Liv would conduct herself properly in any setting.

Daaemon looked away, satisfied.

 

The opera was probably splendid.

Although he watched it live, he made this evaluation because he hadn’t focused on the performance at all. Sitting right beside him was a partner far more interesting than the opera itself.

The darkened audience. Many in the audience peeked at their box seat through opera glasses. Whether Liv noticed the many glittering lenses in the darkness, Daaemon couldn’t tell. She simply kept her eyes fixed on the dazzling stage.

Her elegant profile as she gazed at the stage was a side of her he hadn’t seen before. Daaemon watched her, unbothered and fascinated. Occasionally, he would touch the nape of Liv’s neck. Each time, Liv would flinch slightly but remain obedient.

Perhaps, throughout their ride home tonight, opera attendees would be too busy gossiping about “how deeply Marquis Dietrion was infatuated with the woman he accompanied tonight” to discuss the plot of the performance. And just how surprising a figure that woman was.

In a small rural town like Buerno, news like this spread quickly. Naturally, Luzia would hear of it as well.

Daaemon didn’t encounter Luzia. According to Charles’s report, she had indeed come to the opera house but hesitated to appear after seeing Daaemon openly standing with Liv by his side.

It made sense since Luzia didn’t know Liv’s identity. Besides, with Luzia’s pride, she wouldn’t want to appear as though she was clinging to Daaemon while he had another woman by his side.

She might feel even more humiliated once she learned who Liv was.

Unaware of any of this, Liv fulfilled her role of shooing away nuisances perfectly. Appearing exactly as he liked, she had played her part flawlessly, leaving Daaemon satisfied.

So he decided to take her back to Langess with him without hesitation.

“Your sister is old enough to manage alone, isn’t she?”

Liv, after a moment’s hesitation, quietly agreed to Daaemon’s  suggestion. Watching Liv move gracefully, all dressed up, she looked like a finely crafted statue.

He thought it would be wonderful to keep her close for a long time, just like this.

 

“How was the opera?”

“It was magnificent.”

Inside the carriage heading to Langess Estate, Daaemon casually asked, and Liv replied in an even tone. However, her expression was quite indifferent for someone who said it was magnificent.

Liv, realizing her response had been rather dry, shrugged her shoulders and added a bit more insight.

“However, if this is what high society etiquette looks like, I don’t feel the need to watch an opera in person.”

Daaemon’s  eyes softened into a faint smile. “Today was a special case.”

“I suppose so. It’s just unfortunate that my first memory of attending an opera will be tarnished.”

“I didn’t think you’d be so concerned about others’ gazes.”

“I’m much more affected by it than you think, Marquis.”

Liv’s lowered eyelids blinked slowly.

“For me, each of those gazes is a threat.”

“That’s a rather weak thing to say for someone like you.”

At Daaemon’s  response, Liv lifted the corners of her mouth in a faint smile, though it seemed tired.

“Can’t I say that to you, Marquis?”

Perhaps due to her makeup, Liv looked exceptionally pale. Daaemon had always known her skin was fair, but now it seemed almost devoid of life.

That bloodless face made her look even more like a statue—an inanimate sculpture.

A statue placed precisely where its owner intended, with no will of its own.

“You’re the only one I can lean on, so can’t I say at least this much?”

No, she wasn’t a statue. She was a living human being, with red blood flowing beneath that pale skin.

Daaemon thought that perhaps a hint of color suited her better than paleness.

The flush that spread across her skin like flower petals looked better than her porcelain-like white cheeks.

“It seems today’s performance was more burdensome for you than I thought.”

Daaemon raised his hand to cup Liv’s cheek. He brushed her painted lips with his thumb, and a red tint stained his glove.

“A hot bath will help relieve your fatigue. I’ll have Philip prepare it quickly, so bear with it a bit longer.”

“Thank you for your generous care.”

“You shouldn’t thank me.”

With just a couple of swipes, her lip color had faded significantly. It made her makeup appear much lighter, revealing the Liv Rodaise he knew.

“Once you’ve rested, who knows what I’ll do.”

“As if I wouldn’t know.”

Liv let out a soft laugh.

If that small laughter could be seen, it might look like a tiny bud just sprouting in spring. A bud about to bloom beautifully.

He never knew she could bloom flowers with her lips.

Even as he found his sentiment absurd, Daaemon concluded that his evaluation was quite objective and accurate. Amusingly so. At the same time, he wondered if anyone else knew about this talent of Liv’s. If they did, surely no one could resist coveting her.

Daaemon’s  hand slipped to fiddle with her glittering earring as he murmured to himself, “We should visit a millinery soon.”

Jewelry and dresses alone weren’t enough. He needed to adorn her more, to make it obvious she was his. Where was a good millinery? Perhaps there were a few other things he could buy for her.

No, first, he needed to make sure that, when the vermin approached, she could fend for herself…

“Do you have plans for tomorrow?”

“No, I don’t.”

“Good.”

Daaemon quickly finalized his plans for tomorrow in his head.

First, he needed to check if there were any women’s guns in the mansion.

 
Next to the Berryworth Mansion’s hunting grounds, there was a moderately sized shooting range. It was built for use when hunting wasn’t an option, but in practice, it had hardly ever been used. No one at the estate was particularly attached to honing their shooting skills to the extent of coming here. It was simply left as it was, too much trouble to get rid of, and only now did it finally find a purpose.

Out of the various firearms stored at the mansion, Philip had found a small pistol. Made of dark mahogany and metal, it looked more like a toy to Daaemon. But it would be different for Liv.

From the moment she stepped into the shooting range, Liv’s expression had been anything but pleasant. Thinking back, she never seemed to like violence or anything overly aggressive.

However, with more things likely to cling to her in the future, there was no guarantee that peaceful conversation would always solve everything.

“Take it.”

Liv, who had been looking around the shooting range with a doubtful expression, recoiled when she saw the gun placed in front of her.

“Me?”

“Yes, you, Teacher. I don’t use such a small pistol.”

“Why the sudden pistol…?”

Liv furrowed her brow, seemingly trying to guess Daaemon’s  intention. After a moment, she carefully voiced her assumption.

“Do you want me to accompany you hunting?”

“I doubt there will ever come a day when you can handle a rifle.”

Daaemon replied with a chuckle, and Liv awkwardly pressed her lips together. Though he wasn’t wrong, being directly told so seemed to irk her a bit. Daaemon, smiling unconsciously as he watched her, gestured toward the pistol.

“You wouldn’t even be able to catch a rabbit with a small pistol like this.”

“Then why are you making me hold a gun that can’t even catch a rabbit?”

“Because even if you can’t catch a rabbit, you could at least scare off a rat.”

Small pistols were often used as self-defense weapons by women. Small enough to carry in a handbag, they only held two bullets and had a very short effective range, but they were easy to handle, which was an advantage. Liv would likely have no trouble learning how to use it.

“Judging by what I’ve seen, you have quite a few nuisances hanging around you.”

Of course, those keeping watch around Liv were Daaemon’s  people, and her movements were limited to the areas he permitted.

So, this was less for fending off burglars and more for dealing with leeches like that Eleonore brat or that debtor painter. Or any other rats that might show up in the future.

“You need to buy yourself enough time for me to come and rescue you.”

Liv seemed lost in thought. She was probably recalling the attention she’d received at the opera house. Soon enough, she appeared to understand why she might need the small pistol.

Liv cautiously picked up the gun, her expression one of curiosity.

“It’s lighter than I expected.”

“There are no bullets in it right now.”

Liv, who had hesitated to do anything after picking it up, finally began turning the gun over in her hands, examining it.

Daaemon took her wrist, pulling her hand toward himself. He corrected her awkward grip, guiding the muzzle to his own abdomen. Liv, startled, tried to resist, but she couldn’t match Daaemon’s  strength.

“The range isn’t long, so if you want maximum effect, you need to shoot from as close as possible. Hide it up your sleeve, then aim for a vital point without warning. Something like… here.”

Overlapping his finger on hers, he pulled the trigger. The gun made a clicking noise. Even though she knew there were no bullets, Liv flinched and relaxed her grip. Daaemon clicked his tongue lightly and gave her a warning.

“In a real situation, you must never let go.”

The pistol was still pressed against Daaemon’s  abdomen. Since the barrel was so short, the distance between Daaemon and Liv was also extremely close. Standing so near, Daaemon could observe even the smallest changes in Liv’s expression.

Liv frowned as if she wanted to throw the gun away immediately, but Daaemon held her hand firmly, leaving her no choice but to be restrained. Eventually, she gave up, sighing.

“I can’t believe something this small can hurt a person.”

“Whether it’s used to harm or to defend is up to the person holding it.”

Daaemon lowered his head slightly.

“If you don’t want this gun to hurt anyone, it won’t. So there’s no need to be frightened of a mere piece of metal.”

Liv, who had been staring blankly at the pistol in her hand, slowly raised her head. Since Daaemon was leaning down so closely, when she looked up, it brought them into a position where their lips were almost touching.

Daaemon had tumbled with her at the Langess Mansion just last night. It hadn’t even been a full day, but being so close again stirred him. He had planned on sending her home today.

Just as he was about to lower his head further to press his lips against hers, Liv spoke, her soft breath brushing against him.

“What kind of weapon did you have, Marquis?”

Daaemon stopped in his tracks.

“I’m curious. Which military were you in? You seem so capable—why are you here? And why does no one know anything about your past?”

“Does any of that matter?”

“It’s just a selfish desire to know more about you, Marquis.”

As her barely-parted lips moved, she exhaled warm breaths. Daaemon neither pulled away nor initiated the kiss, keeping their close proximity. His eyes narrowed.

“The more you know, the more unnecessary risks arise.”

There was no way for Liv to uncover his past unless Daaemon told her directly. She didn’t have the social standing or wealth to dig into his history. Perhaps that was why her curiosity was even more intense.

Did she share the same delusion as everyone else?

That he was an intriguing royal bastard hidden away?

“I always thought you had lived your life as a ruler, Marquis.”

“Most people think that.”

Daaemon knew how his appearance came across. He had benefited greatly from it throughout his life, often using it to easily get what he wanted. Unless he spoke of it, no one would imagine a version of Daaemon born on the streets, wandering in search of a place to belong.

Since there was no need to correct anyone’s misconceptions, Daaemon had never told anyone about his past.

“But now I think otherwise.”

Daaemon leaned back slightly to meet Liv’s gaze.

“If you had lived your life ruling over others, you wouldn’t have those scars. Perhaps you’ve had an even harsher life than I imagined.”

Does she pity me?

The thought crossed his mind momentarily before vanishing. There was no hint of pity in Liv’s eyes.

After all, given her own situation, she had no time to pity him. It was absurd for him to even think that, knowing her past.

If not pity, then why bring up his past so suddenly?

“So, what are you trying to say?”

“I find myself being greedy. The rose seems closer than I thought, almost within my reach.”

Daaemon stepped back completely from Liv. When he released her hand, she slowly lowered the pistol.

“It seems you’re only brave when it comes to me, Teacher.”

Until just a moment ago, she had wanted nothing more than to postpone this shooting practice, yet now her mind seemed surprisingly clear. Daaemon smirked cynically.

“Recklessly displaying courage amounts to nothing more than folly.”

He glanced around the shooting range indifferently.

“If we bring out some appropriate targets and let you shoot, you’ll get the hang of it.”

In a detached voice, Daaemon added, “My scars are simply remnants of battles—of the many wars fought here and there. As you said, I’ve grown accustomed to death and have always been near it. There’s nothing special about those times.”

Liv was quick to pick up on cues. Realizing the clear boundary in Daaemon’s  words, she chose not to press the topic further and instead focused on the gun in her hand.

Her slightly bowed head looked subtly downcast, but as long as she knew when to retreat, it didn’t matter.

“There’s no need to be brave at every moment. Even following orders well makes for an excellent soldier, so don’t be discouraged.”

She didn’t respond. Instead, Liv offered a faint, bitter smile.

 



 

At some point, the Marquis had begun assigning Liv various tasks to do at the mansion.

Now, finding herself unexpectedly spending yet another night away from home, she was tasked with assisting him with his bath. Liv considered that if she were to continue staying at Langess Mansion, these would likely be her duties—helping the Marquis dress, assisting with his bath, and sharing his bed. Occasionally donning the clothes and jewelry he bought her and spending time with him.

Liv now understood that Daaemon was extremely reluctant to expose his bare body to others. In that sense, it seemed special that he entrusted her alone with tasks like dressing and bathing him. Still, she wasn’t sure if this was something to be happy about.

Through these tasks, Liv could vividly sense how Daaemon defined her. Though he never spoke the words, every situation made his perception of her unmistakably clear.

“You really have no talent for serving, Teacher.”

Startled by the low voice, Liv snapped back to her senses. The Marquis, reclined in the bath, had been quietly watching her as she sat on the edge of the tub.

 “Ah, I’m sorry.”

Liv, who had slowed her movements momentarily, tried to speed up again, but the Marquis suddenly grabbed her wrist and pulled her towards him. Off balance, Liv fell forward, ending up directly in front of him.

Splash!

The water in the large bathtub surged and spilled over the edge. Soaked from head to toe, Liv flailed instinctively, her arms wrapping around the Marquis’s neck. He supported her back with his hand.

“Cough, cough!”

Wiping her face and regaining her vision, Liv realized she had ended up practically in the Marquis’s embrace. His bare, muscular skin pressed against her through her soaked clothes.

“Are you more alert now?”

“…There was no need to go this far.”

“But it was effective.”

He didn’t like it when Liv’s thoughts drifted away from him while they were together.

Thinking back, it had always been this way. Just like his obsessive collection of nude paintings, his personality was marked by possessiveness.

“You asked me to help you with your bath.”

“You don’t seem very talented at helping with baths, so why not try showcasing another talent?”

The Marquis’s hand deliberately slid along Liv’s side. Even though it moved over her clothes, it was strangely stimulating, as if it were touching her bare skin. She could feel the hardness beneath her, unmistakable and pressing insistently.

Perhaps the bath was just an excuse; maybe he simply wanted her here, with him, in this space. He often desired intimacy in unexpected places that Liv hadn’t imagined.

Regardless of emotions, Liv also found sex with him pleasurable. Physically, they were well-suited to each other, and she could feel it.

She had heard that the degree of pleasure varied depending on the partner. She didn’t have anyone to compare him to, but for her, this was more than satisfying.

Her wet clothes clung to her skin, making it difficult to remove them. Growing impatient with Liv’s slow pace in unbuttoning, the Marquis took hold of her clothes and tore them apart.

Seeing the fabric ripping in his hands, Liv leaned in, pressing herself closer. Her hot, damp chest pressed firmly against his through the torn fabric.

When Liv moved so proactively, the Marquis would often watch her with the same indulgence one would show to a pet dog performing tricks. Today was no different. He simply observed her actions, occasionally touching her bare back and thighs.

Liv caressed his scarred skin, slowly tilting her head.

Moist, warm lips met his. The sensation of her lips, wet from the water, felt particularly vivid. Liv cautiously slipped her tongue between his parted lips.

Despite the fact that previous kisses had often been overwhelming, it seemed she’d gained some experience. She now boldly moved her tongue in his mouth.

“Mmh…”

The mingling of saliva produced wet, squelching sounds. Perhaps because of the steamy atmosphere, the sound seemed especially humid. As Liv sucked on his thick tongue, she gently scraped the roof of his mouth, drawing a low, guttural sound from the Marquis.

The hardness beneath her grew more pronounced. When she deliberately sank her whole body onto it, she felt the Marquis stiffen, his body tightening against her. His hand on her side gripped her firmly.

Liv kissed him deeply, sucking on his tongue and biting his lips, just as the Marquis had often done to her. At the same time, her hand slid down. She raked her nails lightly over his scarred skin, feeling the muscles tense and respond. His body was taut, as though it might burst at any moment.

His body wasn’t simply hot because he was submerged in warm water; this heat was a sign of arousal.

And Liv liked that her touch made him warm.

It felt as though this perfect statue, untouchable to everyone else, came alive under her touch, as if she breathed life into him like a god breathing life into a creation.

“Haa…”

Breaking the deep kiss, Liv moved her lips to the man’s neck. The water swayed once again, spilling over the edge of the tub.

The Marquis leaned his head back, letting his body relax. The thick veins in his neck stood out. Liv trailed her lips along the vein, causing his throat to bob.

Liv let her hand slide down to his abdomen and further down, grasping the hard pillar beneath his tight abs. She rubbed her thumb over the slit at the tip, drawing a rougher groan from the Marquis than before.

Liv lowered her gaze. As she gripped the large shaft as tightly as possible and stroked up and down, she could see his abdomen heaving. At the same time, the Marquis roughly tore away the remaining wet fabric clinging to her. The heavy, soaked cloth was discarded onto the bathroom floor.

With Liv’s legs spread and her body positioned in front of him, the Marquis thrust his thick fingers into her. Two fingers plunged deep inside her, parting the water as they entered without hesitation.

“Ahh!”

Liv rested her forehead against the Marquis’s shoulder, letting out a low moan. Soon, the number of fingers inside her increased to three, stretching her inner walls with a practiced ease.

“The water… The water is…”

It felt like water was entering her.

But before Liv could finish speaking, his fingers withdrew abruptly, only for his large member to take their place in an instant. The upward thrusting force was so strong, it was hard to believe they were underwater.

Holding her buttocks tightly to keep her in place, the Marquis pounded into her without mercy. Their lower bodies were pressed flush against each other, and their upper bodies, too, were firmly stuck together.

Liv clung to him, gasping for breath, her body trembling.

“Ah…”

The fullness in her lower abdomen made her let out an involuntary whimper. She hadn’t meant to make such a sound right into his ear, but as if in response, his cock swelled further, pressing even more tightly against her inner walls. It felt like a scorching rod was piercing her.

Splash, splash!

The Marquis started to move his hips. The splashing water grew more intense, and below, hot, wet flesh repeatedly slapped against her buttocks. The strength was so overwhelming that her body jerked upwards with each thrust.

“Ah, ahh!”

Every time the thick shaft deep inside her hit that sensitive spot, Liv couldn’t help but cry out. The problem was that the bathroom amplified even the smallest sounds embarrassingly loudly.

Clenching her teeth, Liv desperately wrapped her arms around the Marquis’s neck. She bit his earlobe and nibbled at his neck, trying to muffle her voice, but it was futile.

Her biting only fueled his arousal further, making his thrusts even more intense, and her suppressed moans mingled with sobs, growing louder.

“Ugh!”

“…Damn it.”

The Marquis, who had been thrusting in a seated position, suddenly swore in frustration. It seemed he was irritated by the limited movement the position allowed. Supporting Liv’s thighs and buttocks firmly, he straightened up.

Splash.

The water that had been trapped between their bodies flowed down. Fortunately, the bathroom was warm, so it wasn’t cold out of the water, but the contact of air with her wet skin gave Liv goosebumps. Besides, the slippery feeling made her position even more precarious.

Fear of slipping made Liv tighten her grip on the Marquis’s shoulders.

Keeping their lower bodies connected, the Marquis moved out of the tub with long strides. There were towels piled outside the tub for drying off, providing enough padding for Liv to lie on.

He laid her down on the towels, thrusting his half-withdrawn member back inside her. Now in a more comfortable position, the thrusts that followed were far stronger than before, incomparable to their earlier intensity. Wet thighs slapped against bare skin.

“Hah, hah…”

Liv gasped repeatedly. She thought she had gotten used to accommodating his enormous cock, but perhaps that was her arrogant misconception. The thrusts were so rapid that she couldn’t hope to keep up.

With her head spinning from the relentless motion, Liv shut her eyes tightly and whimpered. Even breathing was a struggle.

Squelch, squelch.

The obscene sound echoed throughout the bathroom. Who knew how long it had been as her lower half was relentlessly pounded? The Marquis’s body tensed as he hugged Liv.

She felt his member twitch inside her. After a few thrusts, as if to savor the moment, the Marquis lowered his head and buried his face against her. His hot breath tickled her neck.

The neatly stacked pile of towels had long been disheveled by their intense movements. Because of this, the surface she lay on was uneven and uncomfortable.

After catching her breath, Liv twisted her body to ease the soreness in her back. But with the Marquis’s weight pressing down on her, she could only move slightly. His member was still throbbing inside her.

“Marquis, let’s at least wash… ah…”

Before Liv could finish speaking, he began to move slowly once more. Resting his nose against her neck, the Marquis, now more relaxed after his release, moved his hands leisurely.

Her white breast yielded under his large hand like cream. The nipple, still stiff, was twisted between his fingers. He ran his thick tongue over its tip, then sucked hard.

“Hah, Marquis…”

“Isn’t there anything else you could call me?”

“Mmh, what?”

“Being called that in the middle of all this kills the mood.”

 Lie.

Liv, panting, looked up at the Marquis. His face was cold and indifferent, but his actions—groping her chest hard enough to leave marks, and the erection that refused to leave her—contradicted his words.

Was he losing interest? On the contrary, it seemed like he was getting rather excited.

Liv reached out as she looked at him. She brushed her thumb over his lower lip, which bore signs of their recent kissing, and his lips parted slightly, revealing his red tongue, which licked her finger.

“You call me ‘Teacher’ too, Marquis.”

“So that’s why you lost interest?”

“I think I might now.”

The Marquis smiled at Liv’s defiant response. As her finger traced the curve of his lips, he murmured in a cold tone, “The title ‘Marquis’ I hold has no value. But ‘Teacher’ isn’t the same, is it?”

“You’ve never told me what value your ‘Marquis’ holds, so I wouldn’t know.”

A drop of water from his wet platinum-blond hair fell onto Liv’s face.

“Even if I asked you again, I doubt you’d answer.”

“I didn’t realize changing what you call me required such a complicated process.”

The Marquis muttered mockingly before kissing her again without hesitation. The heat that had seemed to cool was beginning to flare up again.

His hands, which had been gripping her buttocks tightly, moved to push Liv’s limp thighs upward.

“This is an effort to understand my place. You have no need for meaningless affections.”

Mentioning “affection” was partly defiance and partly resignation. It was a spontaneous choice of words, but once spoken, their meaning became starkly clear, and she flushed with embarrassment.

Right after she spoke, Liv instinctively watched the Marquis’s reaction. He couldn’t possibly misunderstand her intentions.

Thankfully, there was no disdain or disgust on his face. Instead, he raised an eyebrow as if he’d heard something amusing.

“I think even you, Teacher, could harbor a love that knows its place.”

It almost sounded like permission to have feelings for him. Liv was about to ask for clarification, but the Marquis moved.

His body settled between her widely spread legs, already feeling too heavy to bear. His cock, now hard again, rubbed against her inner walls as it pulled halfway out.

The sensitive area was sore, throbbing from stimulation. Yet a subtle pleasure arose. Liv bit her lip, trying to swallow the moan rising in her throat, and asked in a thin voice,

“…Do you want my heart too?”

“If I only wanted your body, would it have to be you, Teacher?”

The Marquis muttered in a puzzled tone, pulling his hips further back. Now, only the thick head of his cock rested at her entrance, with the rest completely withdrawn. As the enormous shaft left her, an emptiness settled in her belly.

In the Marquis’s eyes, as he looked down at Liv from this distance, there was a mix of faint lust and the arrogance that seemed inherent to his nature.

“If that’s the case, how are you different from a courtesan, Teacher? Is that how you want to lower your value?”

Liv let out a hollow laugh without realizing it.

Did he truly not know? Ever since Adolf had first brought her the contraceptives, she had been no different from a courtesan.

“Then does treating me like this raise my value, Marquis?”

“It’s certain that no one else gets treated like you by me.”

“So I should be content with that?”

“It seems more than enough—what more could you possibly want?”

He thrust his hips harshly, as if displeased by the direction of their conversation. He seemed to think Liv’s complaints were meaningless, unworthy of discussion.

The deep, forceful thrust left Liv breathless for a moment. She inhaled sharply, only to have her breath cut off again as his slick tongue forced its way between her parted lips. The kiss soon broke apart.

As Liv surrendered herself to the whirlwind of pleasure sweeping over her, she wrapped her arms around the Marquis’s neck and whispered as he desired.

“…Hah, Daaemon.”

“Ha.”

With a short laugh, the man’s grip on Liv’s wrist tightened roughly. His bright blue eyes gleamed with a dangerous, sinister light.

“Much better.”

She dared to call his name, and he said it was better. He had no idea what hopes and desires his words ignited in Liv. Despite her earlier comment about “knowing her place,” he paid no mind.

And so Liv felt a bit weary.

It seemed that the storm she’d faced was too powerful for her shallow roots to endure.

How strange. She had decided to accept whatever he gave her and even acknowledged her desire for him…

Wasn’t bending like a flexible reed supposed to help one survive even the fiercest storm? But the more Liv bent, the more she felt herself breaking.

It felt like she was a stone, cracked and worn down by rushing water.

Even her complicated thoughts soon blurred as the pleasure overwhelmed her. She had no time to continue thinking amidst the intense sensations.

Or perhaps it was resignation.

 



 

It had been a long time since Liv went out to Buerno. She went because of a promise Corida had made with Million to attend a festival by the lake.

Naturally, Liv accompanied Corida as her guardian. Though Thierry had already said it was fine for Corida to go out, Liv still felt anxious about letting her leave like this. Whether Corida knew her sister’s worries or not, her face was filled with excitement as she leaned against the window throughout the ride.

“Wait a moment, Corida.”

Liv got off the carriage first upon arriving at the meeting spot. She wanted to see if Million had arrived yet. Since it was a festival, the place was crowded, and just sitting in the carriage would likely make it impossible to find each other.

Carriages lined up along one side, all belonging to those visiting the lakeside. Liv looked around for the Pendence family’s carriage.

It wasn’t long before Liv felt the stares of those bustling around her.

“That woman…”

“The Marquis’s…”

“The opera…”

Amid the scattered murmurs, familiar words stood out. Once she became aware of them, the voices only seemed to get louder in her ears.

“They say she’s a tutor.”

“Apparently she had a man she was seeing.”

“A tutor causing rumors wherever she goes—her behavior is utterly indecent.”

Although no one explicitly named her, it was clear who they were talking about. Liv blinked a couple of times, her expression calm as she resumed scanning the carriages. Fortunately, she soon found the Pendence crest. She quickly approached the carriage.

However, no one was there.

Liv looked at the empty carriage in confusion, but then the servant sitting on the coachman’s seat climbed down and approached her.

“Miss Million isn’t feeling well today, so she had to cancel her plans.”

Million had exchanged letters with Corida as recently as yesterday.

…But it was possible that she had suddenly fallen ill this morning. Even someone as healthy as Million could have an off day. She had canceled lessons before due to being sick.

Liv forced a smile and nodded. “Is she very sick? I’m worried since she couldn’t make it.”

“Yes, it seems she won’t be able to go out for a while.”

That wasn’t a judgment a mere servant could make. But Liv sensed there was no point in pointing that out here.

“I hope Million gets well soon.”

“Thank you. Also, the Baroness wishes to see you soon.”

It seemed the servant’s real reason for coming here was not to convey news of Million but to deliver the Baron’s wife’s message.

Liv nodded calmly. Baroness Pendence had probably heard the rumors about her and the Marquis, and they would need to talk eventually.

“I’ll take my leave now.”

How would she tell Corida about the sudden cancellation?

Liv watched the Pendence family’s carriage leave, feeling somewhat at a loss. Should she take Corida to enjoy the festival anyway?

Corida had been looking forward to this outing, so if Liv suggested they tour the festival together, she would probably be happy. But…

“Why must it be the Marquis…”

With people whispering like this, how could she take Corida around? She couldn’t let her sister get caught up in these rumors. Especially in a place like this, with so many people gossiping. Liv turned back toward the black carriage where Corida waited.

“Um…”

Just as she was about to leave, someone approached her. It was a young boy selling newspapers.

“Someone told me to give this to you.”

The boy handed Liv a neatly folded piece of paper. Without waiting for a reply, he left immediately after delivering the note.

Watching the boy rush off, Liv opened the paper, puzzled. The message was brief:

‘White four-horse carriage.’

Liv stared blankly at the note, then slowly looked up. Amid the many carriages, a white four-horse carriage stood out. Red curtains were drawn across its windows, obscuring the interior.

Someone inside that carriage was calling for her.

The first person Liv thought of was the Marquis. He often came to see her in his carriage. No one else would call for her in this manner.

However, the Marquis always used a black carriage, not a flashy, luxurious white one like this.

It wasn’t a good idea to respond to an unknown summons. But ignoring it was difficult given the obvious wealth behind this carriage.

They didn’t seem like someone she could dismiss easily.

After hesitating, Liv approached the white carriage. She saw the footman standing beside the carriage reporting something to the inside.

Liv cautiously moved closer. The curtains rustled, and the window opened slightly.

“You may join me.”

A clear female voice called from inside the carriage. Liv still couldn’t identify the speaker. She licked her lips nervously as she looked at the slightly open window.

“I’m sorry, but who are you?”

The footman standing by the carriage scowled at Liv’s question.

“How dare you ask the lady’s identity!”

“Easy, Paul. We don’t want her running off in fear.”

“But, my lady…”

The lady let out a small laugh. As she moved the curtain aside further, Liv finally saw her face. A beautiful woman with luscious blonde hair stared straight at her.

“The Malte family does not condemn ignorance. I’ll forgive you.”

The woman had honey-gold hair. Liv instantly realized who she was.

Luzia Malte. She was the young lady of the Malte family, currently on a pilgrimage with the soon-to-be visiting Cardinal.

“How much longer are you going to keep the lady waiting?”

The footman urged Liv harshly. Liv blinked and regained her composure, realizing who she was dealing with. But that didn’t mean she planned to get into the carriage.

“I have someone waiting for me. If you plan to go elsewhere…”

“So it’s not ignorance but insolence. Is this how he’s trained you?”

Luzia’s voice, which had been clear, now carried a hint of annoyance. Her eyes, once feigning benevolence, scanned Liv coldly.

“The time of Malte is not so cheap that it can be given freely to just anyone.”

Liv swallowed dryly. Luzia seemed satisfied with the frightened look on her face and moved away from the window, a smirk of satisfaction on her lips.

Soon, with a click, the carriage door opened.

 The interior of the carriage was as luxurious and splendid as its exterior.

Perched on the edge of the sleek leather seat, almost hesitant to fully sit down, Liv took a deep breath. Luzia, who had seated Liv in front of her, silently observed her for a long while. Her gaze was filled with curiosity.

“How disappointing. You don’t seem all that impressive.”

Luzia clicked her tongue lightly as she murmured in a casual tone, “Is it true what the nanny said—that you’re skilled in bed?”

“If you could tell me what exactly you’re curious about…”

“I didn’t give you permission to speak.”

Liv, who had struggled to start speaking, found her words cut off again.

“They say you’re a tutor, but it seems you’re not particularly clever. Then again, given you’re a commoner, how high could your standards really be?” Luzia muttered petulantly, extending her hand that held a folded fan. She tugged at the ribbon that tied Liv’s collar neatly, causing it to loosen and expose her neck.

Startled, Liv instinctively tried to pull back, but she stopped herself when she saw Luzia’s glare grow fiercer. Luzia was not just any “rude person” but the “Duke Malte’s daughter.” As Liv mentally reminded herself of Luzia’s status, the neckline of her dress opened carelessly, revealing her neck.

Luzia’s gaze landed on the exposed skin, specifically where there was a red mark.

“Well, at least I’ve learned that he’s not impotent, thanks to you. That’s one thing to be glad about.”

Her voice, tinged with amusement, carried the lazy arrogance typical of those in power. The tip of her fan scratched carelessly at the mark on Liv’s neck.

“It isn’t the mark of another man, is it? No matter how promiscuous you might be, it’d be wise to behave while seeing him.”

Resting her chin in her hand, Luzia continued, then suddenly let out a low exclamation as if she had realized something.

“Oh, did I forget to give you permission to speak? I’ll allow it now.”

At a glance, she seemed astoundingly arbitrary.

However, Liv quickly recognized that Luzia wasn’t acting thoughtlessly. She was acting precisely this way because she understood her position perfectly.

Otherwise, Luzia’s haughty gaze, which fixed itself on Liv, wouldn’t be so cold.

“…If you have something you want to know, please ask clearly.”

“Didn’t I just ask? That mark—is it from another man?”

“The one who left this mark is probably the person you’re thinking of.”

At Liv’s answer, Luzia’s lips curved into a pretty smile.

“Daaemon?”

The name of the Marquis flowed casually from Luzia’s lips, and it sounded foreign to Liv. It was a stark contrast to the “Daaemon” Liv had struggled to utter just recently.

It wasn’t hard to imagine the Marquis addressing Luzia by name. Unlike Liv, the two of them lived in the same world.

Liv, who had been hesitating, slowly opened her mouth. “It seems you’ve found out quite a lot. Did you come to confirm the truth from me?”

“It’s just surprising that someone like you, who’s lived so promiscuously, caught the eye of such a particular man like Daaemon.”

“I don’t know where this certainty of promiscuity comes from.”

“Oh? Didn’t you try to seduce the eldest son at your previous job and get kicked out for it? And they say you were involved with a male teacher at the house where you currently work.”

Since when had her past become such widely shared gossip? It might not have been difficult for people in power to dig into the background of a commoner woman, but hearing a stranger bring up her past, which she wanted to forget, made her stomach churn.

And the next statement was even worse.

If by her current workplace, Luzia meant the Pendence estate, then was she implying there was a scandal there?

Liv mulled over Luzia’s incomprehensible words, and then suddenly sighed. Now that she thought about it, Baron Pendence and his wife were well aware of Camille’s interest in Liv.

Ah, that must have turned into a new rumor as it spread. Liv lowered her gaze gloomily, feeling a faint sense of resentment toward Camille. Even though she knew it wasn’t entirely his fault, she couldn’t help it.

Furthermore, she felt a surge of defiance toward Luzia, who belittled her so easily. Despite knowing how vastly superior her opponent was, Liv couldn’t bring herself to respond politely.

“It seems the Malte family doesn’t teach refined speech.”

“Refined speech is only used when the person is worth it. Those beneath us can’t understand refined words if we don’t speak down to their level.”

Luzia’s eyes narrowed as she smiled brightly. Liv’s meek defiance seemed to have no impact on her at all.

“So there’s no need for you to act so reserved. I’ve seen all sorts of mistresses in my life. Although, you’re the first mistress of Daaemon I’ve ever met.”

There wasn’t any special device in the carriage, yet Liv’s lips kept drying. She wet her lips with her tongue and looked calmly at Luzia.

“Is what you’re curious about the secret of how I caught Daaemon’s  eye?”

“That’s right.”

“Why should I tell you that?”

“…What?”

Luzia’s eyes widened in surprise, as if she hadn’t expected such a response. Staring blankly at Luzia, Liv recalled the Marquis’s words.

He had said he wouldn’t invite anyone to the house where he had slept with her. Luzia was a guest who had not received an invitation from the Marquis. Unlike Liv. It meant that even to the Marquis, Luzia wasn’t worth that much.

After a moment of silence, Luzia smoothed her expression into a smile.

“How foolish of you. You must not know what kind of relationship I have with Daaemon.”

“I’m sorry, Lady Malte, but as far as I know, you haven’t been invited to Lord Daaemon’s  house.”

For the first time, Luzia’s face lost its perpetual arrogance. Her expression turned cold, drastically different from the spoiled rich girl’s demeanor she’d worn just moments before. Perhaps this cold expression was the real Luzia.

“You speak quite boldly. Are you acting this way because you think Daaemon will protect you?”

“He seems to appreciate my straightforwardness,” Liv replied plainly.

Luzia, narrowing her eyes, scanned Liv with an emotionless gaze before speaking in a dry tone, “I have no interest in becoming jealous over a mere mistress. No matter how much attention you’re getting from him now, his interest will soon fade. After all, that is inevitable.”

It seemed that she wasn’t merely referring to Daaemon’s  fickle nature. Liv found herself unconsciously ruminating on Luzia’s words.

“…It will end soon?”

“Daaemon isn’t the kind of man to throw his life away for a woman. He’s bound to grow tired of country life soon.”

There was clearly something else at play that Liv didn’t know about. What could it be?

Suddenly, Million’s words about romantic love came to mind. The relationship between the famous, recently broken-off engagement of Duchess Malte and the unmarried Marquis Dietrion.

It probably wasn’t as romantic as Million imagined. But since the word “relationship” had come from Luzia’s mouth, it was clear they were entangled in some way.

Luzia’s sudden visit to Buerno was also likely related to that.

Liv had repeatedly told the Marquis that she wanted to know more about him. And each time, he had ignored her words.

That was a realm Liv had no access to.

“If it’s ending, I will hear it directly from him.”

Luzia might be right. Liv now realized that “the end” could come as soon as tomorrow. She had gotten drunk on the Marquis’s generosity and small acts of care, foolishly trying to grow accustomed to this life.

Perhaps she should never have made an effort in the first place.

“How foolish. Then again, it’s probably why you’ve ended up embroiled in such a scandal.”

Liv clenched her teeth and took a deep breath. She understood everything about Luzia’s words and attitude. But just because she was a mistress destined to be discarded didn’t mean she deserved this mockery.

“I still don’t see why I should answer your questions. If you want to catch his eye, make an effort on your own.”

“Do you think I’m asking because I need to win Daaemon over?”

A faint sneer appeared on Luzia’s otherwise expressionless face.

“I don’t need to hear your answer. As I guessed, it’s all about what happens at night. The only reason I called you here was out of curiosity. If you’ve been dishonorably discharged and ended up here, you should’ve kept a low profile, but I heard you got involved in some cheap scandal.”

Dishonorable discharge?

Liv stiffened, surprised by the unexpected term, and Luzia let out a short, incredulous laugh.

“Ha, telling me to put in effort?”

With a flourish, Luzia’s fan snapped open. Leaning back casually, she fanned herself as she spoke, “You’re fearless, which makes you interesting. With that kind of sharp wit, it wouldn’t be boring to have you around. It’s a shame you’re Daaemon’s  mistress.”

Luzia even chuckled softly, as if it were truly amusing.

“Since you’ve amused me, let me offer you some advice as a reward. Daaemon will soon leave country life behind. Make sure to get as much as you can from him before it’s too late.”

Her voice was surprisingly gentle.

“You didn’t expect to stay by his side forever either, did you?”

As Luzia watched Liv remain silent, she opened the carriage door herself.

“Did you say someone was waiting for you?”

Pointing her chin towards the slightly open door, Luzia smiled.

“You may go.”

 Liv had no time to comfort Corida, who was distraught about not being able to play with Million. After returning from the lakeside, she fell ill.

Liv, who had never had the luxury of being ill at her own will, caught a terrible fever for the first time. She had been more vulnerable to it, having never succumbed to an illness even after overexerting herself at work or getting soaked in a heavy downpour while searching for medicine.

Worried that her frail sister Corida might catch it, Liv locked herself in her room and, for the first time, refused the Marquis’s call.

Until now, she had never imagined refusing him, but once she did, it was surprisingly easy.

That night, as she shivered in bed and soaked her pillow with cold sweat, she dreamt of a future without the Marquis.

Whether it was a nightmare or a promising dream, she couldn’t tell.

 



 

“It’s hard to see your face lately.”

Luzia, sitting elegantly on a lavish sofa with her chin propped on her hand, smiled sweetly.

“It’s been a while, Daaemon.”

Daaemon sat across from her with an indifferent look. He had no intention of reciprocating Luzia’s greeting.

“I don’t have much time for a long conversation, so let’s finish this quickly.”

He checked his pocket watch as soon as he sat down, making it obvious to anyone that he had more pressing matters to attend to.

Luzia narrowed her eyes and smirked sarcastically. “What could be so urgent? Is your mistress waiting?”

“Yes.”

Luzia, who had been attempting light banter, faltered.

Daaemon glanced at her and spoke coldly, “I’ve been quite taken with her lately.”

In truth, Daaemon deeply regretted the time he was spending here with Luzia. If not for a specific reason, he wouldn’t have agreed to meet her.

Luzia didn’t seem to believe him. She gave him a dismissive smile, as if hearing a dull joke, and shook her head. “There’s no conviction in your face when you say that, so just drop it.”

“I don’t see why you think I’m lying.”

Daaemon was in the process of accepting that his recent behavior was rather unusual. Specifically, his attitude towards Liv was clearly out of the ordinary.

It wasn’t like the emotions he had felt while collecting artworks. Initially, he had thought of her as just another intriguing acquisition.

Daaemon truly became aware of his peculiar state when Liv hadn’t shown herself for a few days, claiming to be ill. Thinking back, he had spent quite a lot of time with her lately.

They had always ended up in bed whenever they met, but it hadn’t been just that. He had taught her shooting techniques, taken walks, brought her to the hunting grounds for no reason, and had her sit idly in his study. Liv had permeated his once monotonous daily life, and he realized her absence through it.

People often say you don’t notice a presence until it’s gone, and that was exactly what Liv’s presence had become to Daaemon.

In the meantime, Daaemon learned that, shortly before falling ill, Liv had briefly boarded a suspicious white four-horse carriage. He also found out that Luzia was the owner of that carriage.

And so Daaemon responded to Luzia’s request to meet. Luzia, by her very existence, was a burden to Liv. Even more so now that Luzia seemed bolder than before. Daaemon intended to respond accordingly.

“I’m aware of your unpleasant personality, and I expected some resistance, but this should suffice. We must make a good impression when Cardinal Calliope visits.”

Luzia, unaware of why Daaemon had come to this meeting, already looked triumphant as if everything was going her way.

She handed Daaemon a document she had prepared in advance. “These are our terms. Let’s settle this with an overseas deployment. All records can be erased.”

Daaemon scanned the content of the document briefly without a word.

“As for Zighilt, there’s no need to worry. Thanks to Stephan, he’ll have to keep his head down for a while.”

The document contained the expected content—a proposal to accept Daaemon as a member of the Malte family. In essence, it was akin to a marriage proposal, albeit devoid of any proper decorum, resembling a cold transaction.

Daaemon had received similar “marriage proposals disguised as business contracts” before. The first time had been while he was still in the military. Back then, Luzia had placed Stephan and Daaemon on her scales. Stephan’s appeal lay in his illustrious family, while Daaemon had everything except for a family name.

And the scales had tipped towards Stephan.

“I remember you judged my worth too low to break up the union between two noble houses.”

“Marriage between noble houses is dull and outdated. Who wants to live like that these days?”

Luzia’s attitude shifted in an instant, just as it had in the past.

Daaemon, amused by her answer, casually tapped the document with his fingertips.

“Isn’t this just as outdated in the end?”

Daaemon gave her a cold smile and added, “I’m also not particularly interested in old-fashioned women.”

Luzia’s smile faded slightly. Realizing that the document alone wasn’t enough to sway him, she spoke in a gentle voice.

“I heard you picked up a new hobby recently. But art collecting? Isn’t that too refined for you? You, who killed people on the battlefield, now plan to spend your days leisurely admiring art in the countryside?”

“Good point. As you know, I need to see blood periodically to stay satisfied.”

Daaemon turned halfway towards the door, where Charles, who had accompanied him here, was standing.

“Bring him in.”

Charles, with a bow, opened the door. Luzia’s guards looked on with alarm at the sudden turn of events, while Daaemon leaned back lazily in his chair, as if mocking their reaction.

Moments later, Roman entered amidst some commotion from outside. He was dragging a man along, half pulling, half carrying him.

Roman brought the man to a stop beside the sofa. The man’s face was streaked with dried blood, and he shivered as he scanned the room, his eyes widening when he spotted Luzia.

“L-Lady Malte!”

Luzia frowned.

Daaemon, still lounging, asked in a bored tone, “Do you know him?”

“Not at all.” Luzia shook her head coldly and looked away.

The man’s face crumpled in despair, and he spoke in a trembling voice, “M-My lady! Please, spare me…”

But he never finished his plea. Daaemon pulled a silver revolver from inside his jacket and loaded it without hesitation, his movements so fluid that they seemed almost casual.

Bang!

The deafening sound of the gun echoed.

“Ugh…”

“Ah!”

“My lady!”

The man’s chest turned red with blood. Luzia screamed and jumped up, her guards quickly stepping forward. But Daaemon was faster. He pulled the trigger again before they could react.

One of the guards let out a groan and collapsed. The remaining guards were swiftly subdued by Roman and Charles.

Luzia, left defenseless in an instant, stumbled backward, her face pale.

“W-What are you doing?”

“The problem with people who’ve never known fear is that they think they’re immune to all danger.”

Luzia, her face white as a sheet, clenched her teeth. “D-Do you dare threaten me? I am Malte…”

“Didn’t Stephan tell you? One of my acts of insubordination was breaking his arm. Using your family’s name is a poor decision.”

“Daaemon!”

“Didn’t they teach you not to call someone’s name carelessly? Poor upbringing, Lady Malte.”

Bang!

A piece of fabric tore and fluttered in the air.

Luzia froze, looking as though she might faint at any moment. The bullet had torn into the luxurious sofa she had been sitting on just moments before.

Daaemon finally gave a satisfied smile as he confirmed Luzia, so pale she looked as if she might not even be breathing.

“Now it’s quiet. Much better.”

Relaxing into his chair, Daaemon pulled out a cigar case. Charles quickly approached to light it for him.

“So, what was it again? You said you’d erase my military record?”

Daaemon exhaled a puff of smoke, his voice dripping with sarcasm.

“Did you really believe I ‘can’t’ go back? I find it hard to believe that the smart Lady Malte truly held such a naive belief.”

 Luzia swallowed dryly. Even from her reaction, it was clear—she had never expected such a response from Daaemon.

“Then why… why did you just back down back then?”

“Why would I need to explain that to you?”

“You withdrew knowing full well that all your accomplishments would be recorded under Zighilt’s name? You finally had the chance to reclaim your position, and you’re just going to turn it down?”

Could it even be called ‘reclaiming’ it? Daaemon sneered.

He knew now that it had never been his to begin with.

Of course, there was a time when he believed without a doubt that his future held honor and glory. Back then, it was exactly what he needed. But because his lineage was unsuitable, he had no choice but to find someone to be his stepping stone.

On the other hand, Stephan Zighilt was a man who had nothing to show for himself besides his bloodline—lacking in many ways. If not for his family, he wouldn’t have even gotten into the officer academy; he was an idiot who inevitably sought out and used a capable person at his side.

It was only natural that Daaemon was chosen by him. Even though Daaemon internally looked down on Stephan, he didn’t refuse the position of Stephan’s aide.

Stephan was foolish, but he made an excellent stepping stone.

“This is the problem with outdated folks. They believe that as long as they don’t get their own hands dirty, no mud will stick to them.”

Seeing how much attention Daaemon received after enlisting, Stephan must have felt a considerable inferiority complex.

Sometimes, Stephan tried to obstruct Daaemon, but often it backfired, actually aiding in Daaemon’s  promotions. That was when Luzia Malte was weighing Stephan against Daaemon.

Daaemon had no intention of being held back by someone like Stephan. He never once thought he was any less capable than him. Even the loyalty of their subordinates was more directed at Daaemon than Stephan.

Everything was about to fall into place as he wished. He was just moments away from receiving a formal title from the king in front of everyone, adorned with a medal, and standing as the fiancé of the only daughter of the Malte family.

Daaemon ended up taking the fall for Stephan’s fatal mistake, and as a result, he received an empty title. He was forced to keep silent in exchange for a substantial settlement and ended his military service in disgrace, with his entire military record classified.

Cardinal Calliope, who had supported Daaemon all his life, turned his back on him at that decisive moment. In exchange, the Cardinal secured the prestigious and sacred position of a “leading Gratia candidate.”

It was then that Daaemon realized he had been raised as a “useful bargaining chip” by Cardinal Calliope. The Cardinal had deliberately cultivated his weaknesses for future beneficial trades.

“How pitiful, Lady Luzia, that all you can spout is nonsense.”

Luzia Malte was foolish enough to think that Daaemon still held lingering feelings for the military.

And she wasn’t the only one. Likely, everyone who knew of Daaemon’s  disgraceful withdrawal believed so as well—that he would return immediately if given the chance.

If that had been his plan, he wouldn’t have taken his subordinates with him in the first place. Nor would he have publicly committed insubordination by breaking Stephan’s arm.

“You’ll regret this.”

“Regret what? Rejecting your proposal?” Daaemon asked leisurely, and Luzia’s face turned red and pale in turn.

He gave her a derisive smile. “If you were going to propose, you could’ve at least put some effort into preparing a bouquet of roses.”

“Even if I can’t kill you, I can make you a laughingstock.”

“We can’t kill each other, but we can make each other look foolish. I know that.”

As a Malte, Luzia was untouchable, and similarly, she couldn’t recklessly harm Daaemon, who was Cardinal Calliope’s ‘critical weakness.’

But if nothing else, they could certainly make each other look ridiculous.

“…You will regret this.”

“I don’t regret anything, Lady. Regret is a useless, wasteful emotion.”

Daaemon took one last puff from his cigar before pressing it firmly onto the document on the table. The paper blackened and burned.

When he checked his pocket watch, more time had passed than he anticipated. He clicked his tongue in displeasure.

By now, Thierry should’ve arrived at Liv’s house. Daaemon had intended to go with Thierry to see Liv’s face before moving on to his next schedule.

He even considered canceling his next appointment, but it was to check the fitting of a hat tailored for Liv. Ever since the commotion at the boutique, Daaemon had made it a point to personally oversee any orders of women’s clothing or accessories. It was a kind of warning.

Moreover, choosing even a small decorative jewel himself brought more satisfaction when he saw Liv wearing it.

If he wanted the hat completed before Liv fully recovered, he had to visit the hat shop today.

Well, he could just ask Thierry about her condition.

Daaemon decisively set aside his regrets, grabbed the cane beside him, and stood up.

“You’re leaving like this? Aren’t you afraid of the consequences?”

“You’re the one who’s scared of past consequences, running after me like a dog with its tail on fire. And after all that effort, this dreary proposal is all you had to offer—what a disappointment.”

In a flat tone, Daaemon likened Luzia to a “dog,” stepping over the pool of blood as he turned his back.

Just as he was about to leave the room, he suddenly paused.

“Above all…”

Trailing off, he turned halfway, fixing Luzia with a cold gaze.

“Maybe it’s just my poor disposition, but the very thought of keeping you by my side makes me want to vomit.”

Only after watching Luzia break into a humiliating sob did Daaemon finally leave the room.

 



 

Due to Liv’s illness, Corida’s regular treatment schedule had to be adjusted. Although Corida said she could skip a week, Liv couldn’t bear the thought.

It was completely unexpected when Thierry offered to visit their home himself. Remembering that Thierry had said she would never treat anyone outside the Marquis’s estate, Liv couldn’t help but be surprised.

“This is a very special exception, you understand?”

“Thank you so much!”

Seeing Corida’s bright smile as she expressed her gratitude, Thierry fell silent, seemingly at a loss for words. She frowned slightly before speaking again, her tone serious.

“Not even the Marquis can order me around like this. Remember, this is my own decision.”

“Yes!”

Watching Corida’s cheerful face, Thierry cleared her throat, turning her gaze away. The tension in her brow relaxed slightly. It seemed Thierry had grown quite fond of Corida over the course of her treatments.

No matter what Thierry said, Corida was delighted to see her visit her home in person. When she excitedly went to prepare drinks and snacks, Thierry looked around the living room, frowning.

“Why is there so much stuff in such a small house?”

Leaning against the wall, wrapped in a thick shawl, Liv answered awkwardly, “I received gifts, but I had nowhere to put them… The inner sitting room has more space, so it should be better for your examination.”

It had all happened during the few days she was bedridden, unable to even get out of bed.

Dresses she doubted she’d ever wear, jewelry too delicate to touch, dozens of shoes and hats to match—all piled up. And what was even more surprising was that the stream of gifts wasn’t over yet. According to Adolf, there were still quite a few items in production.

The attire she had worn to the opera must not have pleased the Marquis much.

Thinking this, Liv looked at the pile of gift boxes with indifferent eyes. Despite the impressive mountain of gifts, she felt no emotion.

“Wouldn’t it be better to move to a larger house? There’s only two of you, but it seems like this small house is at its limit.”

Liv smiled weakly. If this were her previous home, much smaller than the current one, Thierry might have sworn never to come again.

“Adolf knows about the estate matters well, so you could consult with him. Though he’s a bachelor and may lack some attentiveness, he’s quite meticulous with paperwork.”

Liv, who had been half-listening to Thierry’s words with a smile, froze.

“…What?”

“Adolf. Didn’t you know he serves as the Marquis’s legal representative?”

That wasn’t what Liv was curious about.

“Mr. Adolf is single?”

“Yes. Doesn’t he look the part?”

“…Did he get divorced or have a child somewhere…?”

“I didn’t know you disliked Adolf so much that you’d imagine him as a divorcee with children.”

Thierry chuckled lightly. Just then, Corida poked her head out from the sitting room, having finished preparing refreshments.

“Doctor! Do you like cookies?”

“I don’t eat things like that.”

“They’re really good with apple juice!”

“Are you even listening to me?”

Corida chatted cheerfully, while Thierry answered curtly, their voices echoing distantly. Liv watched Thierry’s back as she walked into the sitting room, her mind swirling.

 

“I have a daughter around your sister’s age who is also ill, so I understand a little about caring for a sick family member.”

 

He had said that.

Was that a lie?

But why would he lie about something like that? What could Adolf possibly gain from doing that?

Tightening the shawl around her shoulders, Liv hunched over. Not fully recovered yet, she felt her legs weaken, as if she might collapse. She remembered Adolf’s words from that day when he had mentioned his ill daughter.

 

“I’ve come to understand certain things through my own experiences. That some illnesses can be treated now.”

I’ve learned quite a bit myself. Some diseases can now be treated.”

“I’m merely offering advice as someone in a similar situation. If it’s been a long time since her last check-up, this might be an opportunity to reassess her health.”

“I’m certain the Marquis could find a suitable one.”
Adolf had told Liv that they couldn’t keep protecting Corida forever, and that she should actively seek treatment for her with a good doctor. He mentioned that the Marquis would surely be able to find an excellent physician, and later added…

 

“What if your sister recovers?”

“If your sister becomes healthy enough to leave your side, I mean.”

“Since you want her to be healthy, you must also consider this possibility.”

 

Yes, he had said something like that. It was the first time Liv had considered Corida’s independence.

Corida was now much healthier compared to before, even able to go outside. With the new medication, she might soon be nearly fully recovered, just as Thierry had predicted. The healthy Corida would want to meet more people and dream of exploring the wider world. She was a curious and cheerful girl.

Adolf, who had grown close to Corida, likely knew this as well.

Liv, who had been standing idly, glanced at the reception room and slowly moved. She headed to Corida’s room.

After getting their own rooms, the sisters had spent more private time apart. When Corida stayed in her room, Liv no longer knew what she was up to. Unlike the past, where a mere turn of the head let her see her sister, now a door stood between them.

Standing by the doorway, Liv looked around the room. One corner of the neatly arranged room had a small desk. Liv strode towards it. Proof of Corida’s busy correspondence lately—neatly placed ink and stationery—lay on the desk. Liv opened the top drawer and found a bundle of letters.

They were letters from Cyril. She opened the top envelope, revealing round, neat handwriting.

It began with the usual greetings, talking about daily life, hobbies, and then…

Liv, who had been quickly skimming through personal matters, suddenly stopped at one part. It mentioned her.

Cyril wrote that he understood Corida’s concerns and that if Liv had indeed fallen in love, Corida, as her sister, should support her wholeheartedly. The letter then discussed ways to study abroad in Mazurkan.

Cyril was a reading friend Adolf had introduced to Corida.

Liv folded the letter and placed it back into the envelope. She closed the drawer and quietly left the room, heading towards the reception room. Gently opening the door, she saw Thierry checking on Corida’s condition with a serious demeanor.

Thierry, who appeared to have great pride, didn’t seem the type to play around when it came to Corida’s health. It truly seemed she intended to make Corida well again.

Adolf, who spoke of Corida’s independence, and Cyril, who encouraged her to study abroad in Mazurkan.

It was hard to believe there wasn’t any intent behind it all.

Adolf was a man who acted on the Marquis’s orders.

 

“Your sister is old enough to manage alone, isn’t she?”

 

The Marquis had recently encouraged Liv to stay out more often, as if wanting to practice separating from Corida.

If Adolf had an agenda, it must have aligned with the Marquis’s will. But why? If the Marquis wanted to distance her from Corida, what was his motive?

What on earth did he want from her?

Liv’s thoughts, tangled and confused, abruptly ceased when the reception room door opened, and Thierry stepped out.

“Fortunately, the prognosis is very good. The new medication is working well, so if you continue taking it regularly, you’ll see results soon. Keep your body moving, even if it’s just a light walk outside. You need to get sunlight and exercise to regain your strength.”

“Yes, I understand!”

“As for diet… well, you seem to be eating well enough now.”

Thierry nodded as she looked at Corida before turning her gaze to Liv.

“Now, Miss Rodaise, it’s your turn for an examination.”

“I don’t need one.”

“The Marquis ordered me to check on your condition.”

“I’m fine.”

Liv took a step back. Thierry raised her eyebrows in surprise at her unexpectedly firm refusal.

She knew that Liv usually displayed compliance regarding the Marquis.

Realizing her stern refusal must have seemed strange, Liv quickly added, “I’m recovering. No fever, and everything else is fine.”

Thierry looked unconvinced. However, since the person in question vehemently shook her head, she couldn’t force her to comply.

“…Alright then. If that’s the case, I’ll leave some antipyretics and cold medicine just in case. Use them if you need to.”

“Thank you.”

“Thank the Marquis. This is the first time he’s taken such interest in anyone.”

At that moment, what came to Liv’s mind was the basement of Langess Mansion. The space so secluded that even Philip, the head butler, couldn’t enter it. The deepest place in the mansion, holding every beautiful nude artwork in the world, all for the eyes of a single viewer.

Liv realized it. He wanted to place her there now. To become a statue isolated from the world, existing solely for him.

“Since the examination’s over, I’ll be on my way.”

Thierry, with a cold expression, picked up her medical bag and moved towards the exit.

“Thank you for coming all the way here. Take care, Dr. Gertrude.”

“…Since you’ve refused an examination, I’ll let it go for now, but you should rest more. You don’t look well.”

Leaving that troubling remark, Thierry departed, while Corida approached Liv with a concerned expression.

“Sister, are you alright? Are you feeling worse again?”

“Corida.”

“Yes?”

“I need to apologize first. I read your letters while checking on something.”

“…What?”

“So, I can’t avoid asking—do you want to study abroad in Mazurkan?”

Corida, who had been looking up at Liv in confusion, widened her eyes. She blinked rapidly in surprise, then stammered, “Oh, well, um, that’s…”

“Please be honest. If you want independence, I won’t be angry. If you’ve been holding back out of consideration for me…”

“No! I’d never do that!”

“Then what’s this talk of studying abroad?”

“It’s just…”

Corida, hesitant and avoiding Liv’s gaze, cautiously spoke up, “I also want to become a craftsman like our parents, so I was looking into how to study without it being a burden.”

“Is going abroad on a scholarship that way?”

“Well, everyone else says that’s how they study…”

Liv gazed at Corida silently. Her mind was a mess, and it was difficult to define her emotions. She felt bewildered and dumbfounded by how meticulously this plan to separate Corida from her was being orchestrated. She even felt a strange sense of betrayal. If she hadn’t found out now…

And yet, when she thought of Corida becoming healthier and being able to study as she wished, she wasn’t sure if she could honestly resent it.

When she thought about it, the sense of betrayal and anger bubbling within her crumbled into an awful feeling of helplessness.

“Sister?”

“…I just don’t have the ability…”

The ability to even qualify for being angry in this situation.

Words she couldn’t bring herself to say piled up, pressing down on her heart. Liv, who had been opening and closing her mouth, eventually turned away without saying much more.

The only thing the Marquis wanted was Liv herself. He must be trying to rid himself of Corida. From the start, he disliked anything cumbersome and messy and had no qualms about removing obstacles.

If Liv was to enter his beautiful gallery, she had to be just like that, regardless of what Corida meant to her.

“I’m going to rest for a while.”

What had she lived so diligently for until now? All it took was selling her cheap pride to gain someone’s attention, and everything resolved so easily.

“Sister, sister! Are you alright?”

“I’m fine, Corida. I’ll feel better after some rest. I’m sorry for reading your letter.”

“No, it—it’s fine. I should apologize for not telling you earlier. But I haven’t decided to study abroad! I just heard it was an option!”

“Alright.”

“I’m serious! I don’t want to go overseas by myself!”

Liv, who was about to enter her room, stopped at Corida’s outburst. She remained silent for a moment before turning halfway to look at Corida. Corida’s eyes were red.

“How could I live without you, sister…”

Tears rolled down her cheeks as Corida, struggling to hold back her sobs, finally let them fall.

“I’m sorry, sister. I know I ruined your life… I’ve been too selfish…”

“What are you saying, Corida? My life isn’t ruined because of you. Don’t say things like that.”

Liv sternly denied Corida’s words. But Corida looked far from comforted. Instead, her face twisted, and she began to cry even harder.

“Sister, you should be living your own life… but you’ve been stuck taking care of a sick little sister, unable to live freely, just working all the time…”

It was true that Corida had always worried about Liv in various ways, but this reaction seemed excessive. Liv, sensing something was wrong, approached Corida with a serious expression.

“Why are you suddenly saying things like this? I’ve never felt held back by you.”

“I’m not a child anymore! Uncle Adolf said he could connect me with a good sponsor, so you don’t have to worry about me anymore.”

“…You had that conversation with Mr. Adolf in the study? He told you that you’d ruined my life?”

Perhaps feeling the anger in Liv’s voice, Corida shivered.

 “Uncle Adolf simply told me… that I should get better soon so I wouldn’t be a burden to my sister. That if I wanted to take care of myself, I had to get healthy quickly, study hard, earn money, and live on my own. That right now, I’m useless baggage, unable to do anything.”

As Corida sobbed with her nose turning red, Liv wrapped her arms tightly around her.

“You’re not useless baggage; you’re my precious sister. How would I have endured without you? If you start talking about leaving already, I’ll be too sad.”

At Liv’s soft words, Corida pursed her lips tightly and buried her face. Holding Corida close, Liv gritted her teeth. It was fine if her own pride was shattered. But hearing Corida call herself ‘useless’ was a different matter altogether.

Just because they wanted to separate Corida from her, did they have to go this far?

Liv felt anger.

Did she really need to endure all of this just to cling to Daaemon Dietrion’s fleeting interest? Even after sacrificing her body, her heart, and her pride, enduring people’s prying eyes and whispers, had the comfortable life that came in return not been enough?

Amongst all the fury and confusion, one thing became clear.

…At the very least, the fact that her desire not to fall out of favor with that man was not something worth preserving at the cost of making Corida cry.

Her sister, Corida, was far more important than the attention of a man who might vanish by tomorrow.

 



 

Liv’s recovery came a few days after Thierry’s visit.

During that time, Liv took the opportunity to reflect on the past, and she realized a few more things. For example, about Brad’s profile nude painting.

Given Brad’s personality, he wouldn’t have painted it if there wasn’t money involved from the start. The fact that he insisted on painting a profile meant that, in the end, someone had ordered it from the beginning.

Even the source of all these events, that nude painting, might have been instigated by the Marquis.

Perhaps the time when he decided to keep Liv by his side was much earlier than she had thought. As she considered that all the assistance she had thought was coincidental might have been intentional, her heart turned cold.

Had the Marquis found it amusing to watch her, desperately clinging to his attention, grateful for his interest?

“I heard you’ve recovered.”

Liv, whose hands had been moving mechanically, stopped. She had been staring blankly at the meat on her plate, barely touched, and looked up. The Marquis wasn’t even holding his cutlery. It was impossible to tell when he had stopped eating.

“I’ve recovered.”

“But you aren’t eating.”

They were seated in an upscale restaurant. The Marquis had reserved this place after hearing of her recovery. Liv knew this wasn’t a place anyone could reserve just because they wanted to. Especially not today.

Today, the Cardinal was finally arriving in Buerno.

Their table had a direct view of the largest chapel square in Buerno. Crowds welcoming the Cardinal were filling the square at this very moment, with celebratory parades and performances starting from the morning, continuing right outside the window. The value of such a seat, offering a view of everything, was beyond measure.

For Liv, who had been holed up at home all this time, the Marquis suggested that this would be a good change of pace. If this were the old her, who knew nothing, she might have enjoyed the view and the taste of the food.

“…I’m having trouble digesting.”

“I should’ve brought the mansion’s chef.”

Without hesitation, the Marquis called a waiter and ordered food that would be easier to digest—a comment that would’ve made the restaurant’s chef gasp.

“Even now, let Dr. Gertrude examine you.”

“I’m fine.”

“If you’re going to say that, at least look fine.”

“I am fine.”

After repeating her refusal, Liv lowered her gaze. The plate of meat, cut into small pieces she had no intention of eating, caught her eye.

It was a wonderful dish. The problem wasn’t the food but rather that Liv, who was eating it, wasn’t someone suited for such an extravagant meal.

She could pretend for a time. Perhaps once or twice.

“I was always fine… until you showed up.”

“Are you saying I’m the reason you’re unwell?”

“Maybe.”

Liv could feel the Marquis’s gaze sharpen. She didn’t bother to look up to confirm. Instead, she quietly set down her cutlery.

“I thought everything was better now, that I was wealthier than before… But all that has improved is the facade.”

Luzia Malte had said that she wouldn’t be jealous of a mere mistress. Liv thought she understood why.

No matter how well a mistress imitated, there was a limit to how much she could mimic those of the upper class.

Liv, treated at best as a mistress, a favored possession, would never understand their mindset.

“I have no intention of being separated from Corida.”

“What?”

“Corida is my only family and the one who gives me the strength to keep living.”

The Marquis frowned at the sudden change in topic. Even so, he didn’t ask Liv what she meant. Though he’d been caught, he showed no sign of surprise.

“Teacher, shielding a child isn’t a good way to raise them.”

The words that broke the short silence were beyond disappointing.

Liv bit her lip. Maybe—just maybe—it hadn’t been his idea. Deep down, she had held on to that hope. Or perhaps she had hoped he would deny it, even if it was a lie.

“I am very grateful that you helped with Corida’s treatment. And for all the financial support, too. I know you’ve bestowed blessings on me far greater than I could ever deserve.”

Liv placed her clasped hands on her lap and licked her lips before continuing, “But in matters regarding Corida’s future, you shouldn’t have excluded me, regardless of what you wanted.”

“I don’t understand. It’s not like I was trying to get rid of your sister. In fact, shouldn’t you be grateful enough to bow down and say thank you?”

Some might call this complaint selfish. But how long could she be grateful for a one-sided act of grace? Especially when it went in a direction she never wanted.

Wasn’t it merely charity for his own satisfaction?

“You already have everything of mine in your hands, Marquis. There’s nothing more you need to change or remove.”

“I want you to come live at Langess Mansion.”

A sharp clattering sound echoed. Liv instinctively looked up in surprise and saw the Marquis’s wine glass swaying.

He had slammed it down so hard that droplets of red wine had splashed out.

Looking at the stains with an annoyed expression, the Marquis turned back to Liv.

“I want you there without ever leaving.”

For a moment, an indiscernible emotion flickered in his cold blue eyes.

“It means I don’t want you falling into someone else’s hands.”

The Marquis spoke as if he wanted to take Liv and lock her away in his mansion right that instant. His gaze was so intense it was almost suffocating.

Liv, her lips trembling slightly, barely managed to ask, “Like those many pieces of art in your basement?”

“It would’ve been easier if that were the case. At least they stay put without fuss.”

“I’m not a trophy. Not some expensive statue meant to be displayed. I’m a person—a person with feelings and thoughts.”

Liv’s eyes briefly glistened with tears.

“I have a sense of self too.”

She wasn’t sure how it would sound to the Marquis, who hadn’t even bothered to call her by her name. But this was something Liv had always wanted to convey. She wasn’t just a ‘mistress’ or a ‘statue’; she was Liv Rodaise, a person. He, at the very least, needed to know that.

If, as he said, he truly ‘cherished’ her even a little… then…

“You might be used to giving and taking one-sidedly, but I… I think there needs to be a mutual exchange, at least between people. So…”

“Teacher.”

His irritated voice cut her off.

“This is as natural as water flowing downhill.”

From outside, already noisy, sudden cheers erupted.

“The kind of ‘exchange’ you’re talking about requires equality. Do you think that’s possible between you and me?”

Amidst the cheering, the crowd began chanting the Cardinal’s name.

“I always thought you knew your place, Teacher.”

The Marquis glanced at the raucous scene outside, clicked his tongue, and wiped his mouth with his napkin.

“This kind of conversation is unfortunate, even for me.”

Liv, who had been struggling to keep her trembling lips closed, finally looked down. Her eyes burned, and an uncontrollable despair flared up like fire, burning everything black.

She thought she could endure it.

She had overestimated herself.

Liv silently wept. Drops of tears fell onto her lap, staining her clothes pathetically. The permission that man offered was always partial and would never change.

But if it wasn’t everything, it was meaningless.

She would rather not have it at all.

 Bang!

Objects on the desk tumbled to the floor, scattered by a rough hand. Spilled ink blackened the carpet, and papers flew everywhere, fluttering down in disarray.

“…Marquis.”

“Leave.”

Philip, glancing at the chaotic floor and sensing the mood, quietly withdrew.

Left alone in the room, Daaemon wore an irritated expression as he retrieved a bottle of vodka from a display cabinet. He downed a glass in one go, feeling a fiery heat rising within him, as if flames were licking up from his insides.

The dinner with Liv had ended in complete chaos. The plan he had originally intended to carry out was not fulfilled, and the items he had meant to give her remained untouched.

The image of Liv’s tear-streaked face, her expression filled with sorrow, came back to him, reigniting a nameless frustration and anger. Daaemon, gripping the glass tightly, finally hurled it.

Crash!

The glass shattered loudly against the wall, breaking into countless shards. But the rage within him didn’t subside in the slightest.

Was it because his plans had gone awry? Or was it because Liv, who he hadn’t seen in a while, had worn that gloomy expression throughout? He had gone out of his way to let her rest when she said she was ill, and he’d arranged an outing to lift her spirits, but she had ruined everything.

If that was the reason, then at the root of his anger stood Liv. She, with her tears over trivial matters, daring to vex him—she needed to be put in her place.

And yet, how had he acted earlier?

Faced with Liv, silently shedding tears, for the first time Daaemon felt an overwhelming sense of helplessness—he didn’t know what to do.

It wasn’t the first time he’d seen her cry. He had seen Liv crying in the chapel, praying to an unresponsive god. Back then, he had found her silent tears rather pleasing. It had felt like a “composed sadness.”

But today was different. Though her tears were as silent as they had been in the chapel, they affected him in an entirely different way. Seeing her cry made him angry, though he couldn’t pinpoint why, and thus found it hard to control his emotions.

Even in the midst of his anger, Liv’s face had grown increasingly pale, almost sickly, and he couldn’t just leave her like that. He couldn’t even imagine directing his rage at her.

 

“It seems you’re not in a condition to eat.”

 

He had considered taking her back to the mansion to rest, but she insisted on returning home. To that cramped little place without a doctor or even a maid to care for her.

Her sick sister was there, but how could she look after Liv? She had spent her whole life being cared for by her older sister.

Despite his obvious displeasure, Liv had stubbornly refused to bend.

Lately, he had been too lenient with her. Looking back, he had acted out of character many times. Liv surely knew this, and she must have believed that he would forgive her insubordination again today.

 

“I have no intention of being separated from Corida.”

 

That ailing sister of hers—her very existence was like a thorn in his side.

 

“Corida is my only family and the one who gives me the strength to keep living.”

 

Even without Liv saying so, Daaemon knew well enough.

From the beginning until now, that sister had always come first for Liv. In all her emotions, all her actions, Corida was always the top priority.

So how could he leave things as they were when he desired Liv—not just her body but all of her?

 

“You already have everything of mine in your hands, Marquis.”

 

He didn’t want such dutiful words; he wanted her genuine devotion. He wanted to be her top priority in all her decisions.

He had no doubt that all the kindness he had shown her would make that possible. Indeed, Liv had seemed to open her heart to him, had always yielded to him. She was smart and knew better than anyone what she could gain through obedience.

But why now? Knowing that things would be easier if she just stayed still, why was she saying such things?

 

“I’m not a trophy. Not some expensive statue meant to be displayed. I’m a person—a person with feelings and thoughts.”

 

Why did you look at me like that?

 

“I have a sense of self too.”

 

As if you were hurt.

As if you were disappointed in me.

…Yes, like someone who had been let down.

“Marquis, it’s Roman.”

Daaemon, who had been standing dazedly, raised his eyes. Roman’s voice came from beyond the door.

“We’ve captured the target. How should we proceed?”

“Kill him.”

Daaemon spoke without hesitation, directing his command toward the closed door.

“Clear out the mansion and dispose of everything.”

“…What about the works stored at the mansion?”

A nearly completed nude painting came to mind. The work was practically finished. To Daaemon, who obsessively collected nude artwork, it was naturally a piece to be added to his collection.

But right now, he saw no need for the finished piece—not even if it was the nude painting of Liv, which had pleased him so.

“Burn it.”

Only after making this decision did Daaemon realize something.

Ah, mere paintings could no longer satisfy him. It was no longer possible to find solace in viewing nude artwork.

He needed the real thing.

He needed the living, breathing Liv Rodaise, the one who shyly confessed her desires.

 



 

Luzia Malte had always lived as a proud woman, accustomed to making others kneel before her.

So she could not hide her fury at the humiliation she’d endured. How dare someone do this to her, the only daughter of the Malte family!

That man had always been such scum, and his mistress was equally insolent. Hadn’t the vulgar paired perfectly with the vulgar?

She wanted nothing more than to tear Daaemon apart, but as long as Cardinal Calliope stood behind him, she couldn’t touch him.

Luzia ground her teeth. Especially when she thought of the way Daaemon had looked at her, without a trace of hesitation, calling her “nauseating.”

Wasn’t this the same Daaemon she had abandoned when he was groveling, without even a title?

Her pride could never allow her to back down like this. So Luzia stubbornly dug into Daaemon’s  affairs. And the competent subordinates she had—the same ones capable of leaking Daaemon’s  schedule to her—picked up a scent again.

This time, Roman, who had once caught the informant leaking Daaemon’s  schedule, had apprehended some painter. Luzia knew Daaemon had become obsessed with collecting artwork since settling in Buerno, and her instincts told her that this painter was suspicious.

Roman had taken the painter to an isolated mansion. Luzia’s order to her subordinate was simple: get that painter out.

“Miss, I’m sorry. We failed.”

Luzia, still fuming over thoughts of Daaemon, turned her gaze sharply. Her subordinate, dressed in black, wore a tense expression under her fierce gaze.

“Failed?”

“The mansion has been closed, and the painter has been eliminated.”

“That’s why I told you to get him out.”

“…I’m sorry.”

Due to the limited time, Luzia hadn’t been able to learn much about the painter. All she knew was that he was heavily in debt, boastful, and not very talented.

Based on that information alone, it was difficult to determine any connection to Daaemon. Further inquiries might have yielded something, but Luzia had run out of time. Cardinal Calliope had arrived in Buerno, and Luzia now had to join the peace pilgrimage and act as the devout daughter of Duke Malte.

But she wasn’t ready to give up just yet.

Daaemon’s  arrogance was entirely thanks to Cardinal Calliope, and she wanted to ruin their relationship. If some scandal sullied Daaemon’s  name, wouldn’t the Cardinal, who had traveled all this way to fetch him, be disappointed?

If Daaemon were once again abandoned by the Cardinal and forced to stay in the countryside forever, Luzia would feel some satisfaction.

“However, we did secure a few items from the mansion.”

“What did you find?”

“They’re not particularly noteworthy.”

“Then why bother bringing them?”

“They were about to be burned, so I thought they might hold some importance.”

Luzia narrowed her eyes. It was an isolated mansion, and no one would care if it was simply closed off. But if they were specifically trying to destroy the items inside, perhaps there was some significance to them.

“What is it?”

“A painting.”

“Bring it here.”

A moment later, her subordinate returned with a canvas. At first glance, it was clear the painting was unfinished. Luzia tilted her head. It was a poorly executed nude, unusual in that it depicted the model’s back.

As she stared at the model in the painting, Luzia suddenly realized that the color of the model’s hair reminded her of someone.

 

“If you want to catch his eye, make an effort on your own.”

 

Ah, yes. That pretty mistress. The thought of her came to mind.

Come to think of it, rumors had spread through Buerno that Daaemon had been keeping a mistress close lately.

“I’ve been rather infatuated with her lately.”

She remembered Daaemon’s  arrogant voice.

So he’s madly in love.

“I’ve just had a rather amusing idea.”

Luzia smiled brightly.

“Find me a skilled painter and hand over this piece. Instruct them to complete it as I direct.”

 Buerno was abuzz with excitement over the Cardinal’s visit, but Liv’s house remained quiet.

Despite the minor disagreement at the restaurant, nothing had changed in her relationship with the Marquis. He still summoned her often, desired her body, and frequently encouraged her to stay overnight.

However, whether the Marquis had given instructions or not, Adolf no longer spent time alone with Corida, and it didn’t seem like he said strange things to Corida when Liv wasn’t looking. Judging by Corida’s reaction—well, maybe nothing had actually changed, but Corida was now cautious about what she said around Liv. Corida could tell, after all, which words might hurt her sister.

In the grand scheme of things, life hadn’t changed much. But Liv no longer trusted anything. She no longer harbored the ridiculous delusion that great fortune had appeared in her life.

She no longer anxiously sought the Marquis’s attention, nor did she strive to learn more about him.

Instead, she simply maintained the obedient attitude that he wanted from her. For some reason, the Marquis seemed displeased by this attitude of Liv’s, but she found it puzzling. After all, it was he who had wanted her to be like a delicate flower.

It didn’t matter.

All of Liv’s attention was focused solely on Corida’s health. Fortunately, the new medicine suited Corida well, and now, even if she got hurt, she no longer bled excessively. She had gained weight, appearing plump and healthy.

The only regret Liv had was that she couldn’t take Corida out. There were still rumors circulating about her, and she couldn’t bring herself to go out in public with Corida.

Liv had hoped that the Cardinal’s visit might alleviate things, but sadly, the gossip about her seemed to be treated as a separate matter. In fact, it seemed to have intensified.

Proof of this was the serious expression on Baroness Pendence’s face, whom Liv was now facing.

“It’s been a while, Teacher Rodaise.”

They were in a private room at an upscale coffeehouse in Buerno. The Baroness had reserved the place unilaterally, and from the setting alone, it was clear that she had no intention of having anyone see her meeting with Liv.

“Yes, it’s been some time. But aren’t you busy with recent guests at your estate, Baroness? If you had contacted me, I could’ve come to your residence.”

At Liv’s composed words, Baroness Pendence’s expression turned awkward.

Did she mean that the rumors were so bad Liv couldn’t even enter the mansion? If that was the case, perhaps Liv should be grateful that the Baroness was even willing to meet her one last time.

“Teacher Rodaise, I’m well aware of how hard you’ve worked to teach our Million all this time. Million also relied on you a great deal. I’m truly grateful.”

Baroness Pendence, apparently seeing no need to extend the formalities, got straight to the point.

It was, to some extent, a conversation Liv had anticipated. She had sensed it the day Million and Corida’s appointment had been canceled.

Ah, so it ends like this.

“With the Cardinal visiting Buerno, I don’t want to cause any disturbances.”

“I understand.”

Liv nodded silently, and Baroness Pendence pressed her lips into a firm line. Looking at her cup with a troubled expression, she let out a sigh.

“I tried to watch quietly and decide carefully. After all, you aren’t like the person the rumors make you out to be. But I can’t let this continue any longer. It seems to be having a negative impact on Million.”

“Yes, I understand completely… but could you at least let me say goodbye to Million one last time?”

Liv understood that she couldn’t continue teaching Million. However, given the time they had spent together, shouldn’t she at least say her farewells in person?

At Liv’s request, Baroness Pendence gave a reluctant shake of her head.

“I was too embarrassed to bring it up, but I saw a painting on my way here today—by chance. I was shocked. After seeing that, I can’t let you meet Million.”

“A painting?”

“Yes.”

Baroness Pendence narrowed her eyes as she looked at Liv’s expression.

“You don’t know?”

Liv blinked rapidly, her lips parting slightly. Her mind was gradually turning blank.

“What painting… are you referring to?”

“The outdoor exhibition that started today.”

Now that she thought about it, she vaguely remembered. Camille had mentioned that there would be an outdoor exhibition near the art museum to commemorate the Cardinal’s visit.

But what did that have to do with her? What kind of painting could possibly be there?

Liv’s already pale complexion turned even more ashen. A chill ran down her spine.

 



 

Liv didn’t even know how she managed to say her goodbyes to Baroness Pendence. The Baroness had subtly advised her to cover her face if she decided to go to the outdoor exhibition.

All the way to the exhibition, Liv’s palms were damp with cold sweat. Even though she didn’t want to, countless anxious thoughts filled her mind.

A painting related to her—there was only one that came to Liv’s mind.

The nude painted by Brad.

But all of Brad’s nudes belonged to the Marquis. A man as obsessively possessive and fastidious as the Marquis would never have sold the nude now, of all times.

As Liv anxiously fidgeted with her skirt on her lap, the carriage finally arrived at the exhibition. She pulled her bonnet down as far as it would go before stepping out of the carriage.

In the wide open space in front of the museum, wooden easels stood at even intervals. One spot, in particular, had drawn a large crowd, and Liv instinctively knew that was where the painting mentioned by Baroness Pendence was displayed.

With a stiff expression, Liv strode over.

“…Could someone paint that without seeing it in person?”

“I saw her measurements when they were taken, and it looks about right.”

The women, who were whispering to each other, flinched and stepped back when they saw Liv. Without even looking at them, Liv pushed her way through the crowd. Some people muttered irritably as they were jostled, but upon seeing Liv’s face beneath her bonnet, they quietly stepped back. Thanks to that, Liv managed to reach the painting with little trouble.

“It’s just shameful.”

A woman standing beside Liv clicked her tongue, muttering under her breath, but stopped when she noticed Liv. However, Liv paid no attention to her reaction. Her gaze was fixed on the canvas, displayed without a frame.

It was a nude painting of a woman’s back.

As if to expose exactly what had just happened, her body was depicted with splotchy bruises, while luxurious ornaments lay scattered around her.

The slightly turned profile wasn’t distinct enough to identify the subject, but the upturned corners of her mouth hinted at something provocative.

The rough brushstrokes and the vaguely familiar form.

This was the very painting Brad had worked on at the Marquis’s mansion. And yet, at the same time, it wasn’t Brad’s painting.

For one, the profile was new. The original work had only depicted the back, without those bruises on the body. The ornaments in the background were also unfamiliar. It seemed as though someone had added to Brad’s unfinished painting. Naturally, it had a different atmosphere from the other nudes Brad had painted.

And yet, the model in the painting was unmistakably Liv.

…This nude was of Liv Rodaise, the mistress of Daaemon Dietrion.

“Teacher!”

A desperate voice called out behind her as Liv stared blankly at the painting. Suddenly, someone grabbed her firmly and turned her around.

It was Camille, his forehead glistening with sweat, breathing heavily as if he had run. A few men followed closely behind him.

“I’m sorry, but this painting is not for exhibition.”

“Please step back.”

As the men moved to remove the painting, someone complained irritably, asking why they were taking it down when it was such a good piece. The loud protest seemed to pull Liv out of her daze.

“Let’s move somewhere else for now.”

Camille took hold of Liv’s arm and led her away. People continued to watch them, but no one stepped in their way.


The rumors about her promiscuity will only grow worse now.

It was a thought that occurred to Liv after she had stopped walking, like someone under a spell. Yet her emotions were calm. She felt no worry, anxiety, or fear.

Liv glanced down at the arm Camille was holding and looked around. They had entered what seemed to be a storage area. Multiple easels were piled up, tins of paint were stored all over, and boxes, likely filled with art supplies, were stacked here and there. It appeared to be a warehouse set up near the museum.

“Teacher Rodaise, are you alright?”

“…Yes.”

Despite Camille’s concerned gaze, Liv felt strangely serene. It was such an eerie calm that even she found it odd.

 
 “The painting has been removed. It wasn’t initially agreed upon, but today it was suddenly added.”

“I see.”

“We are also looking for the person who submitted the painting. The Marquis Dietrion must have heard the news by now, and he won’t sit still. Whoever did it, they’ve done something they can’t handle.”

“Is that so?”

“…Are you really okay, Teacher?”

Liv, who had been staring blankly into the air, slowly blinked and looked up.

“Yes, I’m fine.”

It was a voice that seemed perfectly fine to her, yet Camille’s face darkened even further. He glanced toward the warehouse door, hesitated for a moment, and asked cautiously.

“Did you perhaps not see the painting properly earlier?”

“If you mean the nude painting, I saw it.”

Camille closed his mouth as if at a loss for words. Liv, who had been quietly watching him, spoke plainly, “It was you who called the staff, wasn’t it? Thank you for removing the painting, Teacher Marcel.”

Camille, who had been silent with a complex expression, wiped his face with his hands.

“…I was also present when we selected the works to be used for the outdoor exhibition. I came today for the start of the exhibition to check, and when I found it, I immediately called the staff. I should have removed it sooner….”

He seemed embarrassed, perhaps even feeling guilty. Either way, his reaction was something Liv appreciated. It was even a little amusing.

Liv, who had been looking at Camille with an enigmatic expression, turned her gaze to the door.

By now, would the Marquis have heard that she was with Camille? He had told her not to associate with him, so surely he would be angry upon hearing the news. And since he must have also heard about the painting, he might be doubly furious.

But even if he got angry, would that stop the whispers outside?

“There must be a lot of talk about me in social circles these days, right?”

When Liv asked in a calm voice, Camille looked up in surprise, and when their eyes met, he flinched and froze.

“Teacher Marcel, you’re well-versed in gossip, aren’t you? So you must know.”

“That…”

Camille couldn’t bring himself to answer, but his attitude was the most certain answer of all.

“After today, I suppose I’ll become even more famous.”

As the Marquis desired, she was now in a position where she had to quietly hole up at home, playing the part of a pretty statue. Liv let out a hollow laugh without realizing it.

If the shameful rumors about her isolated Liv, the Marquis would likely be pleased more than anyone. Wasn’t it even possible that the whispers tormenting her were orchestrated by the Marquis himself? He certainly seemed like someone capable of that.

Hadn’t he said he wanted to lock her up?

But if he locked her up and admired her until he lost interest, then what? Once he lost his interest, he would withdraw all his care without hesitation, as if nothing had ever happened. Then, she would be left alone in a cold basement, staring endlessly at a door that might never open.

And if the Marquis really did, as Lady Malte had said, leave behind this country life and seek his honor once more?

What would become of me, abandoned and desolate?

“I’m curious about one thing. What is the relationship between Marquis Dietrion and Lady Malte?”

Camille, looking flustered by the sudden question, slowly parted his lips.

“…I understand that they were once engaged to be married. But it was more of a political arrangement than a relationship based on affection. It seems the Marquis is also connected to Cardinal Calliope.”

Not only Lady Malte, but also Cardinal Calliope.

Great names like that being mentioned so casually only made them feel less real to her. All she could think was that, being involved with such grand people, it made sense that nothing had ever been explained to her.

He had said that it was as natural as water flowing downhill, that connections required people to be on the same level.

No matter how rough his life had been, resulting in those scars, in the end, he was a rose blooming loftily out of her reach. And she was the fool who had clumsily reached out to touch that rose, only to tumble into a thornbush.

“I’ve just been dismissed from the Pendence.”

“Ah… I’m sorry to hear that.”

“So, you mentioned that I could ask for help if I needed it.”

Liv looked Camille straight in the eye, a faint smile on her lips.

“It may be shameless, but could I ask for your help?”

I’m sorry, Corida.

I tried to hold on until you were fully recovered, but I can’t do it anymore.

 



 

Since the conversation at the restaurant, Daaemon’s  relationship with Liv had changed.

On the surface, it seemed the same, but Daaemon instinctively sensed a subtle shift. He could do nothing but watch, as there was nothing concrete to blame.

Meanwhile, the constant news about Cardinal Calliope had also been putting him on edge. The voices praising the Cardinal from all directions, his presence in Buerno providing free services, the upcoming meeting with the Cardinal—it all irritated him.

And then this incident happened, and there was no way he could take it quietly.

Thud!

Roman, who had been kicked in the shin, gritted his teeth and endured the pain. He quickly steadied himself but was kicked again, causing him to stagger.

It was a mistake with no room for excuses, and Roman endured Daaemon’s  fury in silence. Of course, Roman’s endurance did nothing to reduce Daaemon’s  anger.

Lashing out at Roman wouldn’t solve anything, and after breathing heavily, Daaemon gritted his teeth and gave his orders.

“Find every person involved in this immediately.”

“Understood.”

Roman bowed deeply. Adolf, who was standing pale-faced nearby, hurriedly led Roman out of the office.

It wouldn’t take long to find the culprit, nor would it be difficult to exact revenge. But dealing with problems only after they erupted wasn’t Daaemon’s  way.

Maybe he should have brought the painting to the Langess mansion from the start.

Daaemon, seated with a cold expression, irritably drummed his fingers on the armrest of his chair. His gaze fell on the easel placed beside him.

On the easel hung the crude, awful painting that Brad had started and some unknown painter had finished. The vile intent behind it was blatantly apparent.

Even though it was unfinished, the nude model was clearly Liv, and the vulgar additions painted over it disgusted him. He felt an urge to rip it to shreds.

“Master, Miss Rodaise is here.”

Philip’s voice came from outside the door. Without waiting for a response, the door opened, and Liv quietly entered the office.

She approached Daaemon but suddenly stopped, having spotted the painting.

“…It was just at the outdoor exhibition a moment ago.”

Daaemon finally looked at her, hearing her mutter to herself. Her face was calm as she gazed at the painting.

Was that calmness because she had already seen the painting once before?

He had heard that it was Camille who had brought Liv out from the exhibition. As one of those responsible for reviewing the exhibits, it seemed Camille had been present there.

How could he have reviewed it so poorly that such a filthy piece was displayed? There was not a single thing about that man that Daaemon liked.

“If you had taken the carriage I sent, you would have arrived before the painting did.”

“I received help from Teacher Marcel, and I was thanking him, so I was late. Didn’t you hear?”

Of course, he had heard. Thanks to that, Roman had spent even longer being beaten.

What kind of gratitude required such an extended conversation? Daaemon was displeased, but he chose not to press Liv, who had already been shocked.

Despite his displeasure, he had to acknowledge that Camille’s quick action had been helpful this time.

“…We will find those involved soon enough.”

“Alright.”

“We can’t burn that trash immediately because we need it for the court.”

“Court?”

“Public humiliation is necessary to stop others from talking recklessly.”

While Daaemon did not shy away from violent resolutions, sometimes completely destroying someone socially was more effective. This was one of those times.

“But even so, we can’t erase the memory of everyone who saw the painting.”

“It will serve as a warning. It won’t take long, so refrain from going out in the meantime.”

“…By the way, the painting was originally kept at your mansion, Marquis. How did it get leaked?”

For a moment, Daaemon found himself at a loss for words. He felt like an incompetent master who couldn’t even control his own servants. And indeed, that wasn’t entirely incorrect.

The rage that had momentarily subsided boiled up again.

Had he been too complacent lately? Unlike the past, he no longer needed to tightly manage his staff, and he had grown lax as a result.

“You didn’t deliberately release it, did you?”

 “Teacher.”

“I’m joking. I know you wouldn’t have done that. You don’t like being the subject of others’ gossip. I was just trying to lighten the mood because you seemed so serious.”

Liv smiled faintly, even though there was nothing to smile about in this situation.

“…You seem far too calm. Not like someone who was worried all this time about the nude painting being leaked.”

“I was surprised at first, but now I’ve calmed down. Besides, I’m sure you’ll take care of everything, no matter how. So, I don’t really want to dwell on it.”

It was strange.

The Liv that Daaemon knew would have been anxious in a moment like this. She wouldn’t be speaking about it with such detachment, as though it were someone else’s matter.

“No matter how much I fret, nothing will be solved right away, right?”

Daaemon, who had been staring at Liv intently, stood up. He approached the quietly standing Liv and lifted her chin with his fingertips.

Staring into her obediently lowered eyes, Daaemon murmured to himself, “You’re not really fine. You’re just pretending to be fine.”

Liv’s neatly arranged eyelashes fluttered momentarily.

“I’ll bring the culprit before the court. Before that, feel free to slap them yourself.”

“It’s alright…”

“If you’re going to say that, at least say it like you mean it.”

At Daaemon’s  firm words, Liv pressed her slightly parted lips together. Her dry eyes seemed to grow a little moist, as if some emotion had welled up within her.

Perhaps unconsciously, Daaemon gently brushed his thumb beneath Liv’s eye, as if wiping away tears that hadn’t yet fallen. Liv looked up at him, her gaze meeting his.

“Get angry. I’ll take it.”

Only now did Daaemon understand what had changed since that incident at the restaurant. Since that day, Liv hadn’t shown any emotion in front of him.

It was as if the night she’d cried so sorrowfully had all been a dream—she was calm and composed with Daaemon at all times, acting as though nothing had happened.

“You could at least complain a little.”

Liv’s eyes wavered slightly, but that was all. She neither cried nor got angry. She remained in that detached state he had seen for days.

Daaemon frowned, about to say something, when Liv suddenly reached for his neat collar and whispered, “Show me your scars.”

“…Scars?”

“Yes, the scars on your body.”

“Why all of a sudden?”

Since the day she’d first seen his scars, Liv had never made personal remarks about his body. Daaemon questioned her sudden request, and Liv blinked slowly.

“…I think I’d feel more at ease if I touched them.”

Her voice was as faint as a flickering flame. Her fingers brushed lightly against Daaemon’s  cravat. It was such a subtle movement that it would have been unnoticeable if he hadn’t been watching, yet it gave him an inexplicable thirst.

Was it because he wanted her now that he saw some intention in her touch?

“You said you didn’t like doing this in the office.”

“It’s alright now. But if you’re not inclined…”

When her white fingers started to release his cravat, Daaemon wrapped his arm around her waist and pulled her firmly against him. Her small, soft frame fell into his embrace.

Leaning down toward her, Daaemon responded in a low voice, “As if that could be the case.”

Daaemon, now leaning against the desk, was entirely bare from the waist up. In front of him, Liv busied herself, running her hands over his body.

Today, Liv was unusually proactive.

There had been times when Liv had taken the initiative during their intimacy, but it was always somewhat restrained compared to Daaemon. Today, however, she seemed like a different person.

Not that he minded. On the contrary, the difference excited him. Her earlier remark about wanting to touch his scars hadn’t been a lie—she carefully traced every part of Daaemon’s  body, occasionally pressing tender kisses onto his skin. Each kiss was both bold and cautious.

Though he once found human contact distasteful, Daaemon now entrusted his body entirely to her. Watching Liv caress him was not only stimulating, but… her touch made him feel as though she cherished him. It was that feeling that left him defenseless.

“Teacher, you certainly have peculiar tastes.”

“I told you before, I like your scars.”

“Do you think it’s okay to be greedy?”

Liv responded with a soft smile instead of words.

Her lips parted slightly, and her tongue darted out, tracing the scar near his shoulder. Then she bit down, but it was more playful than painful.

It seemed she couldn’t bring herself to hurt anyone, even now. Still, Liv continued biting and sucking at Daaemon’s  shoulder and neck, seemingly intent on leaving marks. It reminded Daaemon of a playful rabbit nibbling away.

“If you want to leave a bruise…”

Daaemon bent his head. He pressed his lips against Liv’s pale neck, feeling her pulse flutter beneath them. With just a bit of pressure, it was a fragile life easily snuffed out.

He let his tongue wet the area before sucking strongly, drawing a sharp breath from Liv.

“Ah.”

He smiled against her skin, pleased by the sound.

“You need to suck harder.”

As he bit down on the flushed skin, Liv writhed instinctively, her body struggling to escape the sharp sensation. But Daaemon wouldn’t let her go, and she eventually let out a faint moan.

Her neck, white as snow, turned red, as if petals had scattered across it. Compared to the vulgar marks on the crude nude painting left in the office corner, the marks he left on her were truly beautiful.

Daaemon pulled Liv’s blouse off her shoulders and pushed up her skirt. Liv leaned against him, pressing her forehead against his shoulder, her disheveled reddish-brown hair brushing against his scarred skin. The warmth of her breath and the damp sensation of her lips reached his shoulder.

Daaemon was about to turn his head to check when Liv suddenly shoved him forcefully. The sound of something clattering echoed as Daaemon found himself pushed back, sitting on the edge of the desk. Liv slid her hand down.

The sound of the buckle coming undone seemed especially loud.

“Hold me.”

Her warm breath touched his ear as she spoke, her voice slightly husky. Heat surged up from his toes. Daaemon gripped her waist, lifting her onto his lap.

Feeling her weight on his legs, her bare body pressed against him, Daaemon kissed her, pushing his tongue into her mouth. He grabbed her underwear and tore it off, his finger pressing against her slick flesh.

He slid his middle finger inside, too hurried to even remove her skirt.

Out of breath, Liv gasped against his lips as he moved his finger. With gritted teeth, Daaemon lifted her, switching their positions in an instant.

Clatter!

Pushing the items on the desk aside, he laid her down, finally seeing her face properly.

Her face was more flushed than usual, her eyelids wet, the edges of her eyes reddened, and her lips glistening. She breathed heavily, her parted lips trembling.

Her eyes, dazed with excitement, roamed the air, eventually finding Daaemon. Slowly blinking, she reached out like a child, her arms outstretched. Daaemon willingly leaned into her embrace. Liv pulled him closer, her arms tightening around his neck.

He spread her legs, thrusting inside her in one stroke. Liv gasped, her back arching off the desk. Sweat formed along her back, glistening as her body arched.

Daaemon paused, buried deep inside her, his hand sliding under her back, stroking her. The sticky liquid wet both the desk and his palm, but it didn’t bother him at all.

Her skin felt even softer with the sweat. As Daaemon continued kissing her neck and chest, he suddenly realized how frail her body felt in his arms.

 Daaemon felt the prominent curve of Liv’s spine beneath his hand, the raised vertebrae and the distinct outlines of her ribs under her soft breasts. The hollow of her collarbone was also more pronounced, and even when he pushed against her lower body, he could feel the hardness of her skeletal structure.

“Why…”

Liv questioned, her voice strained, when Daaemon suddenly stopped moving. She released her hold on his neck, using both hands to cup his face, their eyes locking.

Her green eyes glistened with moisture, making them shine more than usual, reflecting his face as if they were mirrors. For the first time, Daaemon looked at his reflection through her gaze—a familiar face twisted, with no trace of composure, like a foolish, lovestruck adolescent.

When had he started losing his rationality in front of her?

As an unfamiliar emotion welled up from the depths of his chest, Liv leaned up with effort and kissed him, instantly obliterating what little control he had left. He withdrew his hips only to thrust forward deeply.

“Ah!”

The force of his thrusts made their flesh slap together, the wet sound resonating alongside the creaking of the desk as droplets splattered, leaving a trail on both the desk and floor.

“Ahn, ah!”

With each deep thrust, pressing into the farthest part of her belly, Liv’s moans grew louder. Usually, she held back her sounds in her throat, but today she gave herself fully to the pleasure, moaning freely. She paid no heed to how her raised voice only made Daaemon’s  movements grow more intense.

“It’s so deep, ah, too much!”

Daaemon moved with such force that the heavy desk began to rattle. The few remaining items on it fell to the floor. Gritting his teeth, Daaemon grabbed Liv’s waist, which had been inching away from him, and pulled her back down. The thick length that had partially slipped out plunged back in with force. Liv’s moans were mixed with sobs as the overwhelming pleasure seemed to converge entirely in her core.

“Khh…”

Feeling the soft ridges of her inner walls tightening around him, Daaemon released deep inside her. Almost at the same time, Liv reached her peak, her body trembling as she twisted beneath him, but Daaemon held her tightly, not allowing the slightest distance between their joined bodies.

Even after spilling his seed, Daaemon continued to press the tip of himself deep within her, his eyes lifting to see the red marks left on her skin wherever he had gripped her.

“Mmm…”

Her chest, drenched in sweat, rose and fell continuously. Her nipples, stiff and aroused, caught his eye, tempting him like ripe fruit.

An almost primal urge washed over him—he wanted to take them into his mouth, to taste the sweetness he imagined. Just as he was about to give in to his impulse, Liv spoke, her voice breathy and soft.

“Today, ah… I was dismissed from my position.”

Her gaze was languid, perhaps due to the afterglow of their intimacy. The way she looked at him was unfocused, her eyes half-lidded.

“…So I thought I might spend some time with Corida.”

Was this her roundabout way of asking not to be summoned for a while?

Daaemon narrowed his eyes. Liv’s smile seemed to falter, perhaps noticing his displeasure.

“You said before that protecting someone too closely isn’t a good way to raise them. I need to help Corida become independent, just as you said.”

Her voice was gentle and composed as she continued, “There are many events happening in Buerno these days, and I think it’s a good opportunity to make some memories together.”

If Liv had indeed decided to help her sister become independent, it made sense that she wanted to create lasting memories before that happened.

Corida had been too frail to go out until now, so it was natural for Liv to want to make happy memories while she could. And now, Buerno was bustling with festivities to welcome the Cardinal, with all sorts of events taking place.

But Liv’s situation was not ideal for freely enjoying those festivities.

“Didn’t you say you were concerned about others’ eyes on you?”

Daaemon remembered how drained Liv had been after just one visit to the opera.

And now, after that trash painting had been briefly displayed, she would be the focus of even more inappropriate attention. Yet, she wanted to go out in public with her beloved sister?

“There are many visitors in the city these days. If I cover my face well and keep my identity hidden, I think it will be alright.”

Liv, who had been smiling awkwardly, suddenly reached out, her sticky hand carefully brushing aside the damp hair on his forehead.

“The carriage you’ve provided for me is quite recognizable, Marquis. So, for now, I think it would be better to use an ordinary one—something cheap, like everyone else uses. If I’m cautious, it should be fine.”

“Is that really necessary?”

“I don’t want Corida to hear the rumors about me, Marquis.”

It was such a simple and understandable request from her perspective.

“I’m going to end up living in this mansion anyway. So can’t you give me one last chance to spend time freely with my sister?”

Daaemon found himself holding his breath without realizing it. Hearing Liv speak about moving into the mansion herself was startling.

He had always planned to bring her into this mansion, and he was determined to make it happen. Yet hearing her say it herself, it felt strangely unfamiliar. Though it was an unexpected shock, it wasn’t unpleasant—instead, it filled him with a thrilling satisfaction.

Perhaps misinterpreting his silence, Liv’s smile faded slightly, her lips moving faintly as she spoke.

“Please.”

A wave of heat spread through his body, as if there were a fire smoldering deep inside. The length still buried inside her twitched, regaining its firmness.

Liv seemed to sense the change, letting out a pained moan. She pressed her thumb to Daaemon’s  lips, wrapping her legs around his waist.

Daaemon bent over her, capturing her lips in a consuming kiss. As Liv parted her lips, letting his tongue in, she ran her nails down his arm, clenching around him. The wet walls that had begun to dry grew slick again, urging his movement.

Daaemon, pulling away from the kiss, willingly complied. Unlike his hurried movements from earlier, he now moved slowly and deliberately, drawing a gasp from Liv with each thrust. Her flushed eyes gradually grew wetter.

“Just for a few days… I want to spend time with Corida. So, please, don’t be angry if I can’t respond to your call right away.”

Not only did she want to be without his carriage and driver, but she also hoped Daaemon wouldn’t summon her for a while.

He found himself questioning whether all of that was truly necessary, but since she was asking for some final time to make memories, he decided he could afford to be lenient—especially since she had promised to come live in the mansion.

With a frown, Daaemon finally responded.

“…Fine.”

Hearing his answer, Liv’s eyes widened, and soon after, she smiled, her eyes softening.

“Thank you for understanding.”

She hesitated for a moment before adding in a cautious tone.

“Daaemon.”

Hearing his name from her lips felt like an unexpected reward, like praise for something well done.

Daaemon swallowed, pulling her into his arms.

The desk in the office shook for a long time once again.

 



 

Liv and Corida began traveling around using the common shared carriages that were the most popular in Buerno, instead of the black carriage they had previously used.

With their hoods pulled low, dressed plainly as they used to, Liv and Corida wandered the streets. Several of Daaemon’s  men, following his orders, stayed close behind them. When the sisters were swept up in a crowd at a large event, it was sometimes hard to keep sight of their target.

However, perhaps due to Corida’s stamina, their outings were never very long. The sisters always returned home before sunset, and in the evening, Corida’s excited voice could be heard echoing beyond the courtyard wall, recounting their day.

Hearing the report, Daaemon thought it would be better to clear the places Liv and Corida visited. As a result, the men who had simply been following the sisters now had additional tasks—removing anyone who might recognize Liv.

Though they briefly lost sight of the sisters a few times, it was always in Buerno, and the outings were never long enough to cause serious concern.

And so, on the fifth day,

The sisters did not return home.

 Daaemon was in a foul mood from the moment he woke up.

The main reason was the scheduled attendance at the Blessing Prayer. Normally, he would have refused without a second thought, but there was no better occasion to naturally meet the Cardinal. Even for Marquis Dietrion, who usually skipped most events, this was one where people would expect him to make an appearance. It was something everyone would understand.

From Cardinal Calliope’s perspective, busy with public matters, there was no more fitting place to meet privately with Daaemon.

The Blessing Prayer was the grandest event during Cardinal Calliope’s stay in Buerno, causing an uproar throughout the city. There were more people out and about than usual. Despite the limited number of attendees allowed inside the chapel, the area outside was crowded with throngs of people. The atmosphere only made Daaemon more irritable.

Fortunately, his meeting with Cardinal Calliope was set in a separate space inside the chapel that had been specially allocated to him.

Upon seeing Calliope again, Daaemon found him slightly more aged than he remembered, though he still possessed an elegant appearance. His lake-like blue eyes sparkled as he gazed at Daaemon.

“It’s been a while, Daaemon.”

Daaemon, instead of replying, simply took a seat opposite Calliope. He rested his cane within arm’s reach, and Calliope’s gaze lingered on it.

“Have you recovered?”

Daaemon twisted his lips involuntarily.

Recovered, he said. It was far too late for such an inquiry, considering the injuries occurred years ago.

“I recovered a long time ago.”

“Yet you still carry a cane.”

“It has its uses.”

“Is that all?”

The question was laden with meaning. After a brief silence, Daaemon responded indifferently.

“Are you asking if I can return to active duty?”

The cane wasn’t just an accessory. Though Daaemon’s  leg posed no hindrance in daily life, it was far from ideal for the battlefield—it was in a compromised state.

When he was discharged against his will, his leg had been in a terrible condition, severely damaged in his last battle. At his rank, he should never have been on the front lines, but due to Stephan, he had found himself rolling through the trenches, and after that final battle, he could no longer withstand the pain.

Staying in the military might have led to his discharge as a cripple in front of everyone. Naturally, Daaemon had no intention of publicly revealing his state, so he had his medical records erased from his dishonorable discharge.

Only a few people knew the true extent of his condition at the time. Calliope was one of them.

“I have no intention of returning.”

His leg had been treated. If he remained in command rather than on the battlefield, it wouldn’t be an issue, so he could potentially return if he wanted to…

Daaemon frowned. A sensation long dormant seemed to be reawakening. It was an unpleasant, grotesque feeling, like scars crawling across his entire body. It was something he never felt while Liv was by his side.

“Lady Malte approached first, saying she wanted to speak with you personally. Have you met her?”

“Did Luzia not tell you?”

Daaemon murmured with a faint, cynical smile, “She proposed without even a rose, so I kicked her away.”

Of course, if she had brought a rose, he would have thrown it in her smarmy face before kicking her away.

Calliope swallowed uncomfortably, pressing his lips tightly together before speaking in a low voice, “The Malte family is a useful one. If you want to establish a proper position…”

Daaemon cut him off abruptly. “I don’t mind life here. It’s not bad, considering I picked it on a whim.”

He lifted the teacup in front of him, the fresh scent of the tea tickling his nose. For someone who favored strong tobacco and liquor, he couldn’t understand why anyone would drink such tea. To him, it was nothing more than slightly bitter herbal water.

“God gives each of us our rightful place, and eventually, we all return to that place. So you must return to yours as well.”

“God doesn’t care what I do.”

It was a blasphemous statement. Calliope frowned, clicking his tongue disapprovingly. After calming himself with a sip of his tea, he spoke again, his voice now composed.

“Would you listen if I said I wanted to return what was taken from you?”

“All value changes with time. The past holds no value for me now.”

Daaemon set the barely-touched teacup back down and leaned back into the sofa. Compared to the ones in his own mansion, the sofa’s quality was lacking.

It wasn’t just the sofa; the entire room, supposedly prepared for the Cardinal, was modest. Cardinal Calliope disliked opulence, so wherever he stayed, simplicity reigned. No doubt, the clergy here had kept that in mind when arranging the space.

The room was entirely ill-suited to Daaemon’s  taste. He couldn’t wait to leave.

“Do you still resent me?”

Daaemon’s  uninterested gaze shifted from the sitting room to the Cardinal.

“My mission cannot be limited to one person. God guides me to aim higher.”

Why did he always have to wrap his hunger for power in such convoluted words?

Daaemon mused, listening to the Cardinal’s earnest tone. Perhaps it was because he was a man of the cloth, unable to speak without invoking God.

Whether or not Calliope realized Daaemon’s  lack of attention, he continued speaking solemnly.

“Your mother understood that.”

It was an unwelcome subject. Daaemon’s  otherwise detached expression twisted slightly.

“She understood that I had a duty to watch over many more people. But I think she also believed there was a reason she left you with me.”

A most convenient interpretation.

Daaemon curled his lips involuntarily.

“Oh, you didn’t know. My mother bore me because she didn’t understand your mission.”

Her death was long in the past, and he had outgrown the age for grieving. Daaemon pitied his mother, but he didn’t cling to her memory like a neglected child.

However, if anyone had the right to speak about her, it was him alone. He didn’t know what memories Calliope shared with her, but regardless of their past, it was Daaemon who witnessed her end—not this lofty clergyman lost in his own world.

“She simply gambled to become your one and only.”

He was the one who had watched her visit the chapel every day, who saw her settle in a village where Calliope might notice her. It was a deliberate life.

“She achieved her goal, and now, because of my existence, you’ve been tied to her for the rest of your life. Not a bad wager, wouldn’t you say?”

Though she hadn’t lived to reunite with him, even in death, she had bound him to her memory. To Cardinal Calliope, Daaemon represented his past—a past filled with guilt.

How satisfied she must be. She had bound the man she yearned for, even if only in death.

And as for the old man in front of him? Claiming he had abandoned her to tend to more followers, yet clearly unable to let her go—what a pitiful sight.

Did Cardinal Calliope even realize that he had spent his life obsessed with one woman?

“Everyone keeps talking about what I lost, like I’m some child unable to keep his own toys. Should I thank them for treating me so naively?”

Daaemon pulled out a cigar without asking for permission, mocking as he spoke, “Life won’t be easy from here on.”

“The Gratia election is approaching.”

Daaemon, murmuring calmly with the cigar between his lips, smiled wryly, “Why, is someone planning to kidnap me and use me for leverage? Threaten to reveal the Cardinal’s ugly past?”

“…The Malte family is a good shield.”

The remark sounded as if it was meant to show concern for Daaemon’s  safety.

“Hiding behind a skirt won’t stop a bullet. Have you grown naive since we last met? Praying too much, perhaps.”

Daaemon took a drag from his cigar. The thick smoke, harsh against his senses, seemed to ease his unsettled stomach.

“Prayer alone won’t keep the peace.”

What a laughable contradiction. The Cardinal who publicly lamented the sorrow of war and extolled the need for peace, meanwhile worked behind the scenes to plant his people in the military ranks.

He even justified his actions with grand, lofty ideals—ones that Daaemon would never accept.

 “I have no intention of cooperating.”

“…Even so, living like this doesn’t look good.”

A deep wrinkle formed on Calliope’s forehead. It seemed he had also wandered around Buerno and met various people, hearing the rumors about Daaemon that were circulating in the city.

“Living a life of luxury with a mistress, like any other debauched noble…”

Calliope spoke with a voice that held nothing back, clearly conveying his displeasure. It was reminiscent of the solemn voice he’d used earlier in the vast chapel to recite the Blessing Prayer.

Daaemon muttered with a bored expression, “Ah, is it time for a confession now?”

“These weren’t given to you so you could live like this.”

Given to him? The things Daaemon possessed now, whether it was money or an empty title, hadn’t been “given” by anyone. He had merely received compensation for what he’d lost. Therefore, he felt no debt to Cardinal Calliope—not even for the support provided during his adolescence.

The wayward indulgence in his youth had merely resulted in consequences that needed managing. Why should Daaemon be grateful for it? The Cardinal had simply taken control of his own weaknesses before anyone else could notice, exerting his influence over them.

And yet, here he was, acting as if there had been some noble purpose behind it all. It was ridiculous.

“Those were given to you so that you would wait for the right time, to teach you patience.”

“What ‘right time’?”

A smirk tugged at the corners of Daaemon’s  lips.

“Even if you become the Gratia, your son will never be able to walk proudly.”

The vow of celibacy taken by the clergy is both sacred and noble. No matter what happens, Cardinal Calliope, beloved by believers worldwide, will never reveal his sole, absolute weakness.

The blood that flows through Daaemon’s  veins will be denied forever.

“Before God, blood ties are insignificant. One can live a gloriously fulfilling life even without them.”

Daaemon, rolling the cigar between his fingers, tilted his head. As their conversation stretched on, he felt growing boredom and irritation.

In truth, he’d felt uneasy since the morning. His mood had been off since he awoke. Perhaps it was because he hadn’t seen Liv in several days. Though she had asked not to be summoned, he hadn’t expected to feel so on edge because of it.

“What I’m asking is why my life isn’t glorious right now…”

Growing tired of his own sarcasm, Daaemon clicked his tongue, a cold expression crossing his face.

“Your Eminence seems quite hard of hearing. Or perhaps your comprehension has declined with age?”

“I once thought you were a child with great ambition.”

“I still am.”

Daaemon responded nonchalantly before taking another drag from his cigar.

“No need to be disappointed. I resemble you more than you might think.”

Unfortunately, there was no ashtray in sight—just a teacup filled with lukewarm tea.

“If it’s Malte, there won’t be any problems, so there’s no need to try and piece together the torn proposal.”

Stephan Zighilt was a coward, trembling even when dealing with his own fiancée, afraid of making any mistakes. He was truly a pathetic man. If one were to judge based on sheer courage alone, Luzia would be a better match. All Stephan had were feelings of inferiority and defeat.

So, he sought comfort in extensive investigations. Of course, Malte was part of that list. And it was all carried out by Daaemon.

That meant every backdoor deal done in Stephan’s name was actually carried out by Daaemon.

“I didn’t leave empty-handed. I had access to plenty of information.”

“…How much?”

“Are you curious?”

Daaemon’s  lips curled slightly. Though Cardinal Calliope maintained a composed expression, Daaemon could clearly see his eyes light up momentarily.

His appearance at the time of discharge had resembled that of a beaten dog—no wonder Calliope believed he had lived powerlessly in hiding. Considering where Daaemon’s  blood came from, he should have known Daaemon wouldn’t simply endure.

Daaemon shook off the emotions tied to unwanted memories as he stood up.

“As long as you don’t touch me, I have no intention of bothering you. So, from now on, you should just lose interest in me.”

Daaemon dropped his cigar into the teacup. Since he had barely touched the tea, the cup was full, and the thick cigar caused the liquid to spill over.

“It’s a very simple principle, so I trust I don’t need to explain it further.”

The tea, now filled with ashes, spilled across the table. Glancing at it, Daaemon thought absentmindedly.

It seemed he, too, had reached his limit, just like the spilled tea. Liv had asked him not to call on her, but that wasn’t a reason to avoid seeing her.

He needed to see her immediately.

 

The sky was bathed in the light of the setting sun by the time Daaemon finished his conversation with the Cardinal and arrived in front of Liv’s house.

According to recent reports, Liv and Corida, who had gone out, should be returning home soon. Daaemon stared at the neat, modest house visible through the carriage window and let out a deep sigh.

His fingertips itched. It felt like an eternity since he’d last been satisfied by merely watching Liv from afar. He wanted to stroke that soft, pale skin, to delve into her delicate flesh. He wanted to feel her hands tenderly caressing his scarred body.

Even if he couldn’t take her back to the mansion, surely he could have his way with her in the carriage. Daaemon imagined how Liv would greet him.

If he suggested doing it at her home, she would be horrified and hurriedly climb into the carriage. Such a small house wouldn’t be able to conceal their sounds. It wasn’t hard to imagine Liv shaking her head, saying she couldn’t let her younger sister hear her moans. She would surely fail to hide the blush rising up her neck, even as she tried her best to cover her embarrassment.

Or, perhaps, it could be the opposite.

The last time they’d been together, Liv had been far more proactive and wanton than he’d imagined. She had seemed like a courtesan well-versed in pillow talk. He had always thought she would remain reserved in bed, but perhaps she would wrap her arms around his neck this time as well.

Perhaps she would whisper that she missed him, that she wanted to touch his scars, that she wanted to see him.

Whether she murmured it shyly or crooned it seductively—either way, it would be good. Anything Liv said would be welcome. Her very existence made him feel noble.

He was her god, and she treated him as such.

As he indulged in these fantasies, night fell completely. One by one, lights began illuminating the streets, and the windows of nearby houses also began to glow.

The streets darkened by nightfall, yet Liv’s house remained silent.

Daaemon, who had been waiting without concern, found his expression slowly hardening.

They were too late.

Liv always returned home before it grew completely dark—she feared the dark streets. Since she had started going out with Corida, she even returned earlier than usual.

By now, she should have already returned.

“…Master?”

When the Marquis stepped out of the carriage, a servant waiting near the coachman’s seat looked at him, puzzled.

“Find out what’s happening.”

After giving the brief order, the Marquis strode toward Liv’s house. It looked even quieter and lonelier in the dark, with no lights on.

Opening the locked door wasn’t difficult. Without even needing tools, the latch broke easily under a few firm pushes. Daaemon stepped into the empty house, scanning the interior.

The living room was cluttered with boxes. They were all gifts Daaemon had sent to Liv.

Daaemon opened the lid of the nearest box. Inside was a dress, untouched, neatly folded.



He felt a chill travel from his toes upward.

Lighting the candles and lamps inside the house, Daaemon slowly crossed the living room, opening each remaining door one by one. Except for the cool air, the house seemed full of signs of life.

And yet… something felt off.

Daaemon paused in front of one particular room—Liv’s. Her familiar scent reached his nose.

Liv’s room was neat and tidy, much like her. It seemed to contain only what was necessary. Standing in the doorway, staring blankly at the scene, Daaemon approached the nearby dresser. He opened the top drawer, revealing a familiar box.

It was a jewelry box he had given her, containing a diamond necklace and earrings. Next to it were other pieces of jewelry—all of them gifts from Daaemon.

There were only things that Daaemon had given her.

 
“The Marquis still hasn’t lost interest in me. So, if I want to leave, I have to avoid his eyes.”

As Camille said, the painter who displayed such a nude painting at an outdoor exhibition wouldn’t be able to escape the Marquis’ wrath. However, Liv didn’t think this would end as an isolated incident.

Moreover, the fact that the painter, without fear of consequences, exhibited the nude so openly suggested deep emotions were involved, whether resentment, jealousy, or something else.

Whether those emotions were directed at the Marquis or at Liv, who had gained the Marquis’ attention, was unclear. In either case, though, Liv was bound to bear the brunt of it. She would be the easier target compared to the Marquis.

Relying solely on the Marquis’ protection didn’t seem wise to Liv, as she had little trust in him. He had always been unpredictable…

As Liv contemplated this, she shook her head. Though many excuses came to mind, she realized that there was only one reason that mattered most.

“I just can’t bear it anymore… not until he loses interest in me.”

Everything had simply become unbearable for her.

Her feelings for the Marquis, the growing disappointment that came with it… it had all become too difficult to endure, and she no longer found herself able to use Corida as an excuse. She was worn out by everything and just wanted to let it all go.

“Are you sure? The relationship between the Marquis and you, Teacher Rodaise…”

“It’s not as serious as people make it out to be. He’ll be furious at first when I disappear, but he’s fickle by nature; he’ll soon tire of being angry.”

“I see.”

Camille nodded with a somber expression after confirming Liv’s lack of enthusiasm.

“Alright. I will help you.”

Thus, with Camille’s help, Liv managed to secure a man’s outfit and gather a few useful tips to escape the Marquis’ eyes and flee.

They decided on the day the Marquis would be attending the Blessing Prayer. Liv needed him to learn of her departure as late as possible, and Camille mentioned that the Marquis was set to meet with the Cardinal after the Blessing Prayer.

Since it was a special day, there would be many people gathered in all parts of Buerno, making it easier to blend into the crowd and hide.

Additionally, transportation services would be temporarily expanded for the event. More train options and shorter intervals between services were evidence of that.

Clutching Corida’s hand in anxiety, Liv reached the train station without issue on a shared carriage. She glanced up at the clock tower standing tall at the center of the station and headed towards the ticket counter.

 



 

“Have you informed those waiting near the train station?”

“Yes, I passed on the news immediately. They should be in search mode by now.”

It wasn’t as if those stationed had been specifically assigned in anticipation of Liv’s escape, but here they were. Should they consider themselves fortunate?

The wind struck Demus’ face fiercely as he stared ahead with cold, hardened eyes.

 

[Please understand the fear that I couldn’t endure, the fear that made me retreat.]

 

Those were the words that had been written—so pathetically hypocritical. Fear?

From the moment she started doing things she normally wouldn’t in his office, she’d likely been planning this audacious scheme. That explained why she refused the carriage and driver Demus had provided—to cover her tracks.

She thought she’d done well, but there was no way she could manage all this alone in such a short time. Surely, someone must have helped her. But who?

It didn’t take long for Demus to deduce the name of a single person.

He already knew who Liv had met before coming to his office.

“Find that Eleonore brat. Drag him before me.”

“But, sir…”

Until now, Demus had avoided doing anything drastic to Camille because of the family backing him. The Eleonore family held considerable power—enough that even someone as temperamental as Demus had to hold himself back.

Considering that he’d previously let things slide despite Camille snooping around, Demus’ order now seemed worryingly drastic. Yet, Demus ignored his subordinate’s concerns without a second thought.

“Immediately.”

Demus issued his order coolly, without even looking at his subordinate. Eleonore? What did any of that matter now?

Grinding his teeth, Demus looked off into the distance.

How dare she—how dare she!

 



 

The line at the ticket counter was much longer than expected.

Feeling anxious as she glanced at the long, winding line, Liv chewed her lip and scanned her surroundings. Amid the chaotic, noisy crowd, she noticed a few policemen idly patrolling. Liv tensed, her shoulders hunching instinctively.

What if the Marquis had already discovered her escape and reported it to the police? He could easily fabricate any number of charges. If that were the case, she might be caught at the ticket gate.

If Liv—rumored to be the Marquis’ mistress—was arrested by the police, people would think that she had been abandoned by him… and she wouldn’t receive any kind treatment.

This new possibility heightened her anxiety even further.

While assessing the never-shrinking line in front of her, Liv kept an eye on the policemen’s movements. They didn’t seem to be looking for anyone yet. It looked like they were only dispatched to maintain order amidst the crowd at the train station.

During this, a fight even broke out ahead. Tensions had risen among a few people in the stagnant line, and conflict erupted. The policemen, wearing faces of mild annoyance, approached the troublemakers.

“Damn it, we’ll miss the train at this rate!”

Voices of protest came from all directions, adding to the already chaotic scene at the ticket counter.

Maybe she should consider a different way now.

Liv, still looking at the long line with concern, turned her gaze. Perhaps she could catch a carriage to a nearby village outside Buerno.

But the distance wasn’t that far—if they were pursued, she’d be caught quickly. It was within easy reach for the Buerno police, meaning she’d have no chance of getting away.

While gripping Corida’s hand tightly and mulling it over, someone tapped Liv on the shoulder. It was a small touch, but it was enough to startle her badly.

“Teacher, it’s me.”

“…Teacher Marcel.”

“For now, this way.”

Camille led Liv towards the waiting room.

“I came as quietly as I could after the prayer ended, so I’m a bit late. You haven’t bought your ticket yet?”

“No, as you can see…”

Liv trailed off awkwardly, and Camille, as if anticipating this, pulled two train tickets out of his coat.

“I thought this might happen, so I got these in advance. I chose the destination arbitrarily, but if you’re in a hurry, I suggest you use these.”

“Thank you so much!”

Seeing the tickets for a train departing soon, Liv’s face lit up with relief as she thanked Camille. He gave her an awkward smile in response.

“I’ll admit there was a bit of selfish curiosity behind it too—I wanted to know where you’d be headed.”

“Oh…”

Seeing Liv’s expression, Camille pulled his hat down over his face awkwardly.

“Hurry up. Judging by the time, the train should be at the platform by now.”

“Thank you so much for your help.”

“If you arrive safely and have time to spare, please send a letter. My address hasn’t changed.”

Liv hesitated before nodding. She didn’t think she’d be able to send a letter, but Camille had helped her so much that it seemed too heartless to refuse outright.

“I hope our paths cross again.”

Leaving Camille’s parting words behind, Liv turned away. She handed the train tickets Camille had given her to the station worker. The worker, clearly exhausted by the endless stream of passengers, barely glanced at the tickets before clipping their ends and handing them back.

“Platform 3.”

After taking back her ticket, Liv looked back one last time. Camille was still standing there, watching her. She was about to wave to him when she noticed two men approaching Camille. Though they wore ordinary attire, something about them felt familiar.

Liv’s face paled as she turned sharply away.

“Corida, let’s go quickly.”

With a pale, stricken face, Liv hurriedly headed for the platform.

She could only hope that her suspicion—that those men approaching Camille were the Marquis’ henchmen, the same ones who had kept watch around her house—was wrong.

 The day was dark, but the train station was brightly lit.

Finding someone in the bustling train station, noisy enough to resemble a marketplace, seemed like a far-off task. Dismas dismounted his horse and looked towards the busy ticket gate. The station attendant was loudly announcing that the train departure had been delayed.

The attendant’s face, dealing with the complaining passengers, was covered in sweat. There was nothing more he could do, though, since it was Dismas who had caused the train delay.

“This way, sir.”

The subordinate waiting for him guided Dismas. It was to a small storeroom set up on one side of the train station. As soon as they opened the door and stepped in, the musty smell and dust in the air made breathing stifling.

“Why are you doing this to me?!”

A sharp voice echoed from inside. It was Camille, who, with an angry expression, was protesting against the men surrounding him.

When he saw Dismas enter the storeroom, Camille, who had been raising his voice, opened his eyes wide in surprise.

“Marquis Dietrion?”

Dismas glanced at the subordinates standing in front of Camille.

“Did he talk?”

“No, sir.”

They hadn’t expected Camille to speak easily. Dismas turned back to Camille with a cold expression. Camille, looking at Dismas as if finding it absurd, scoffed.

“I didn’t think I’d be formally introduced to the Marquis like this.”

“Unfortunately, I have no intention of formally introducing myself to you.”

“What sort of rudeness is this? No matter how powerful you are as Marquis Dietrion, treating someone this way is…”

“Camille Eleonore.”

Camille, who had been shouting without fear, hesitated.

“Where did you hide her?”

“What on earth are you talking about…”

“Marquis!”

Daaemon’ aides rushed in behind him. They had just arrived, having been attending to different tasks at different locations. Daaemon gave them orders.

“Search every train.”

“Yes, sir.”

“Check the ticket records.”

“Understood.”

Roman and Charles hurriedly turned away. Adolf, left alone, stood stiffly by Daaemon’ side.

“I’ve informed the Eleonore family. We should receive a response by tomorrow at the latest.”

Camille’s expression twisted as he watched what was happening in front of him.

“Listen here!”

“The reason I’m not pulling out a gun right now isn’t because I’m scared of Eleonore.”

Daaemon pulled the wrist of his glove tight.

After receiving this glove from Liv as a gift, Daaemon had taken to fiddling with it for no reason, especially when she wasn’t around. The glove was something tangible, something he could touch, that symbolized a small piece of Liv’s heart.

“If I spill blood here, it makes things more complicated. I don’t want to waste time on unnecessary matters.”

Camille, momentarily at a loss for words, stared at Daaemon. In the dim lighting, where everything else seemed dark, Daaemon’ face stood out as unusually cold and aloof.

The man, as beautiful as a sculpture, appeared even more surreal with the shabby background behind him.

“I’ll ask only once. Depending on your answer, the dispute between our families may be settled quite smoothly.”

A faint crack formed in the otherwise composed expression of Daaemon.

“Did she ask for your help, or was this your unnecessary meddling?”

His fierce gaze resembled that of a monster guarding the gates of hell.

Camille, seeing this, couldn’t bring himself to answer right away. The vague hostility on Camille’s face now included traces of bewilderment.

“You…”

“Forget the unnecessary talk and just answer the question.”

Camille, who had been mumbling, forced the confusion away and smiled.

“Treating a person like this… Urk!”

Daaemon instantly grabbed Camille by the collar. He squeezed so tightly that Camille’s face turned red from the lack of air.

However, Camille refused to drop his sarcastic tone.

“Even without this… because of the rumors, she… ugh…”

“The name Eleonore won’t be enough to keep you safe, so know your place.”

“Did you tell her the same? To know her place?”

Being so close, Camille could see the slight frown between Daaemon’ brows. Camille’s smile twisted even more crookedly than before.

“I’m glad I could at least help in this way.”

 

[You are an excellent collector, and I believe you’ll quickly find something valuable.]

 

“Marquis, you’re late.”

 

[Unfortunately, that wasn’t me.]

 

Daaemon, unable to suppress his anger, finally acted upon it after seeing Camille’s smiling face as if mocking him.

Thud!

With a dull sound, Camille’s body rolled onto the floor. Daaemon had thrown him by the collar he’d been holding. Camille let out a short groan, clutching his shoulder as if he’d hurt it during the fall. Yet, he continued to chuckle as though he found it all amusing.

Seeing Camille’s appearance, seemingly mocking him, made Daaemon’ expression grow even fiercer.

However, instead of striking Camille again, Daaemon turned around. Roman, who had been searching the train with other subordinates, was now entering the storeroom. Sweat covered Roman’s forehead, proving his efforts.

“…She’s not there.”

At that moment, the tenuous thread of Daaemon’ reason turned pitch black.

 



 

Even after searching two or three more times, they couldn’t find the Rodaise sisters on the train.

They’d even checked Liv’s house again just in case, but it was just as Daaemon had left it.

Daaemon, staring up at the starless black sky, reached into his pocket. His fingers touched the paper, now crumpled and worn from being clenched so often.

He didn’t need to unfold it—he had memorized the content long ago. The neat handwriting and the infuriatingly arrogant few lines of text replayed clearly in his mind.

“Marquis, Lord Eleonore is still demanding to be released.”

Adolf’s voice, filled with concern, reported in. Ever since they were at the train station, Adolf had been listening to all sorts of ridiculous excuses while forcibly detaining Camille, who happened to be a direct member of the Eleonore family. Adolf seemed worried about how they’d handle this later.

After a moment of silence, Daaemon asked in a cold voice, “Did they figure out the ticket records yet?”

“Charles is checking them. It seems to be taking a bit of time, likely because they used an alias, but it should be finished soon.”

Looking back at Liv’s recent actions, she likely hadn’t bought a train ticket at a ticket office beforehand, and it would have been hard to purchase one quickly upon arriving at the crowded train station. The most plausible scenario was that Camille had bought Liv’s ticket in advance.

Since Camille had been at the station, Daaemon’ assumption was probably correct.

“What about Roman?”

“He’s gone to ask for the cooperation of the Buerno police.”

There was a slim chance that Liv hadn’t left yet.

If that were the case, they would have to search throughout Buerno. The easiest way would be to seek cooperation from the local police. It wouldn’t be difficult to obtain their assistance. So, Daaemon had sent someone to the police station. Although it was a bit late to take action, it was better than doing nothing.

Perhaps he should have mobilized the police as soon as he sensed Liv had disappeared.

Frowning, Daaemon reconsidered his delayed response.

The real issue had been not expecting that Liv and Corida would deliberately vanish.

Yes, that was the issue. Daaemon had never imagined that Liv would dare decide to leave him. Let alone attempt such an escape in complete secrecy.

What reason did she have? Why would she flee like this? What was lacking?

Ever since meeting Daaemon, Liv had lived comfortably, and her precious younger sister’s health had visibly improved. He had even promised to settle the damned nude painting incident himself, so why…

 

“You already have everything of mine in your hands, Marquis.”

 

That was what she had said.

 

“Daaemon.”

 

Had her sweet whispers been nothing but deceitful lies?

The more he thought about it, the more his insides twisted in rage. But he couldn’t afford to be consumed by this emotion.

Once the ticket information was confirmed, he could quickly track her down.

Pursuing someone was not unfamiliar territory for Daaemon. Though it had been a while since he had done it, he was a man who had lived through battlefields, and he had experience chasing down enemies and deserters.

He would catch her soon enough. Once he did, he would bring her directly to the Langess mansion. Then he would lock the doors and shackle her, ensuring she never left again.

He would make her realize just how undeserved the treatment she had received had been.

 They got off the train before reaching the destination indicated on their tickets.

It wasn’t that Liv didn’t trust Camille; rather, she felt that moving strictly according to the ticket’s itinerary wasn’t the best idea. Besides, Corida’s condition wasn’t great for a long train ride.

After disembarking, they chose one of the few inns in the area and rented a room under a false name. It was only after they locked the door, put down their belongings, and relaxed a bit that Liv realized how tense she’d been all along. Her shoulders were stiff, and it dawned on her that she’d been rigid with anxiety the entire time.

“Sister.”

“Oh, Corida. You’re tired, right? Get some rest.”

“You look like you’re about to collapse before I do…”

Corida wasn’t wrong. Liv’s face was pale and weary, as if she could faint at any moment. She had spent the entire day on edge, anxiously watching their surroundings, and the dark circles under her eyes were visible. Her lips were dry from not even having a moment to drink water comfortably.

“I’m fine, just rest…”

“Did things go badly with the Marquis? Is that why we’re running away like this?”

Liv paused, her hands frozen over the bag she was unpacking. She had already been wondering how much she should explain to Corida about their situation and how.

It was hard to explain to Corida, who imagined a romantic love story, why they were in this desperate situation, fleeing like criminals. After a moment’s hesitation, Liv finally said a single sentence.

“There was never anything between us, not really.”

Her eyes fell on the bundles of money neatly packed in the bag. Money she had received in exchange for taking off her clothes in front of the Marquis.

Yes, it had all started with this money. He wanted her body; she wanted his money—a purely transactional relationship. Liv had been fully aware of that from the beginning.

Perhaps she herself was the one who had ruined everything.

For the first time, Liv had such a thought. It was her greed, her misplaced emotions, that had caused her to forget her place and wreck everything.

“But you liked him, didn’t you, Sister?”

“No.”

“I remember how excited you were whenever you were going to see him.”

“I wasn’t.”

Liv firmly denied Corida’s words and turned to look at her.

Due to their strenuous schedule, Corida appeared quite tired. But her tightly pressed lips and clear gaze showed that, at least compared to Liv, she still had more vitality.

“Sister, do you think I haven’t watched you long enough to know?”

Corida’s confident demeanor made Liv sigh deeply. Liv quickly pushed her disheveled hair back under her hunting cap and hood, speaking in a brisk tone.

“He was just someone who helped with your treatment. It’s unfortunate that we couldn’t finish the treatment, but now that we know what your illness is, we can deal with it.”

“This isn’t about my treatment, Sister. It’s you who’s acting strangely!”

Corida frowned deeply.

“Didn’t he care about you too, Sister?”

“Corida.”

“I really thought he liked you.”

Given the heap of gifts that had piled up at home and Liv’s frequent outings and overnight stays, it wasn’t unreasonable for Corida to have misunderstood. Liv let out a hollow laugh.

“He had no reason to be in that kind of relationship with me.”

“Is it because of me, again…”

“No!”

Her voice rose sharply.

Liv saw Corida’s eyes widen, and she snapped herself back to reality. But the emotions that had boiled up wouldn’t easily calm down. It seemed that a faint ember had been hidden in her heart—an ember of resentment that even Liv hadn’t been aware of.

Feelings she’d tightly suppressed and bottled up, unable to let out.

“Like you said, I might have…”

Liv’s trembling lips barely formed the words as she lowered her gaze.

Foolish, stupid Liv Rodaise.

“Yeah, maybe I did. But not anymore. From the beginning… it was never meant to be.”

The first desire she’d ever had in her life had to be for someone she shouldn’t covet. How foolish.

 

“You didn’t expect to stay by his side forever either, did you?”

 

Perhaps that was a relief. If anyone, like Luzia or anyone else, had realized that she genuinely hoped for some distant future with the Marquis, her heart would have been trampled in the mud, mocked even more.

“I’m going to rest. I’m a bit tired.”

It was a small blessing that she alone knew the pitiful truth of her broken, withered heart.

 



 

“Oh, dear. How pitiful,” Luzia replied in a lazy tone, waving her fan.

One of the people seated around her clicked their tongue and shook their head. “How did he get entangled with a woman like that…”

“Do they know where she ran off to?”

“With all those people coming and going, how could they find her so easily?”

The news that Marquis Dietrion’s mistress had run away and that the furious Marquis had mobilized even the police to search the city had quickly and discreetly spread among the upper class.

Of course, it wasn’t because Daaemon had moved openly. Luzia, who had been monitoring the situation after the nude painting was displayed, had noticed Daaemon’ actions and leaked the rumor.

“I heard she had quite the sordid past. Maybe she ran off after getting back together with another man,” Luzia said in a prim tone, causing another young lady to open her eyes wide.

“Another man, leaving Marquis Dietrion?”

“Who knows. Maybe she couldn’t forget an old flame. They say physical bonds can be powerful.”

“Even the great Marquis isn’t exempt from such things, it seems.”

Though they feigned indifference, a faint sneer couldn’t be hidden. Luzia’s words made the young ladies and madams sigh. Luzia covered her mouth with her fan, hiding a smile. She hadn’t expected Liv to flee so suddenly, but it made things far more interesting.

Scandal spread all the faster when it was more provocative. Now, Daaemon Dietrion was as good as covered in invisible filth. He wouldn’t be able to pretend to be noble like before.

“To think this happened during the Cardinal’s visit, such a sacred time.”

“Causing such commotion during a holy period should be considered a sin. If it were Torsten, he wouldn’t have let it slide. What about Beren?”

Luzia looked at the young lady sitting next to her as she asked. The lady, who had been addressed, frowned uncomfortably.

“I don’t think it will go that far…”

Running away as a mistress might only amount to an entertaining story. But after Luzia pointed it out, some of them began to wonder whether they should treat it as merely a personal scandal.

“It’s certainly not a good look for a noble to appear to be toyed with by a mere mistress. Especially when the Marquis seemed to cherish her so much.”

“It’s the Marquis’ fault for not managing his mistress properly, but I doubt he wanted this outcome. So, that promiscuous woman, who dared to insult and deceive a noble, can’t be left unchecked. In a small city, the lower classes would quickly take after such behavior.”

“We should let our acquaintances know. We need to keep her in check to prevent her from causing trouble elsewhere.”

Luzia, watching the murmuring young ladies and madams, calmly sipped her tea. Hopefully, the mistress wouldn’t get caught by Daaemon. But it didn’t seem likely that she had the means to completely escape Daaemon’ grasp.

If only someone spotted her with an old lover, Daaemon would be humiliated even more. Adding a line about the runaway mistress seeking refuge with an old lover wouldn’t be too far-fetched.

The man she had once seduced was, if Luzia remembered correctly… the eldest son of the Viscount Karin?

The title was inconsequential enough to be perfect for crushing Daaemon’ pride.

Luzia smiled brightly.

 



 

It was a few days later that Liv left the inn.

Corida needed sufficient rest. For a few days, Liv anxiously watched the streets, fearing someone might come after them, but when she saw the quiet scene outside, she felt a sense of relief.

Still, she didn’t discard her disguise. It was too early to say they had completely left Buerno behind. Maybe it was excessive caution… but the Marquis’ anger wouldn’t fade in just a day or two. He was an arrogant man. It would be wise to keep a low profile for the time being.

“I was thinking… maybe we could go to Adelinde.”

“Adelinde?”

During their stay at the inn, Liv had pored over maps, searching for a new place to settle. She had finally chosen a city.

“Why Adelinde?”

“It’s a big city, so there should be a decent commercial area and plenty of job opportunities.”

 

Since Corida’s health hadn’t fully recovered, it was essential to find a city with a market large enough to distribute new medicines. Liv also needed to find a new job, and a moderately large city would be better for staying under the radar.

Most importantly…

“And there’s a girls’ school there.”

“A school?”

“Yes. Before deciding on studying abroad, let’s start by attending school. You might find that you want to study something else. We can make a decision after you’ve experienced different things.”

“Oh…”

Corida, who had been wearing a bewildered expression, lowered her gaze, her face reflecting mixed emotions. Liv gently patted Corida’s head and smiled softly.

 “Adelinde Girls’ School was one of the candidates you considered back when you were searching for a school. It has a good reputation, and there are many subjects to learn.”

“But…!”

Corida furrowed her brow at the thought of the possibility that, in addition to medical expenses, they might also have to pay school fees. However, Liv cut her off, knowing her concern.

“I made a good amount of money in Buerno, so don’t worry about the tuition.”

It wasn’t enough to spend extravagantly, but if she managed their expenses carefully, they could get by. They just needed to reach Adelinde quickly and find a suitable job.

Liv tried her best to stay optimistic. No matter how much power the Marquis wielded, he couldn’t scour every city in Beren like searching for a rat. At most, he would search Buerno and its surroundings. Adelinde was a city quite far from Buerno.

The Marquis would tire soon enough. No matter how much he liked Liv’s body, he wouldn’t go through the trouble of searching the entire country for one runaway woman. After all, his basement was full of treasures far more valuable than Liv’s body.

So they just needed to reach Adelinde safely…

 

“Ah… is this the only route available?”

“Yes.”

Liv sighed as she looked at the limited options with a troubled expression.

Had she gotten off the train too hastily? She should have disembarked in a bigger city, even if it had meant pushing herself a bit harder.

But it was useless to regret it now. Liv carefully reviewed the options available to her. Considering the departure times, there were very few practical choices.

Biting her lips, Liv finally purchased a ticket. No one stopped the sisters as they entered the platform.

The deserted station, where the wind blew coldly across the long tracks, seemed eerily empty. After a while, the black train engine appeared at the end of the tracks.

The strange feeling began to grow when the train was nearing the fourth station.

They were sitting in the dining car to grab a light meal when several people took seats nearby. They didn’t order anything and instead began complaining loudly.

“Who do these people think they are?”

“Seems like they have a convict on board.”

“Come on, really?”

Their voices were so loud that it was impossible not to overhear their conversation.

“Even if it’s true, does it make sense to corner people like that and search them?”

“Well, judging by their appearance, they didn’t seem like actual police officers.”

Liv’s hand, which was breaking off a piece of bread, gradually slowed and then stopped completely when she heard the word “police.” Corida, sensing the strange atmosphere, quietly set her utensils down.

“Sister.”

Liv pressed Corida’s hat down with a tense face. She adjusted her hood again, then put on her own hat and picked up her bag.

Their seats were in the direction the people had come from. But if they returned now, they would encounter those who were “searching the passengers, though not looking like police officers.”

Maybe those people had nothing to do with the Marquis…

Leaving their half-eaten meal behind, Liv led Corida toward the front of the train.

It wasn’t the day they had escaped anymore; several days had passed. She doubted the Marquis would be searching the train at this point. But it couldn’t hurt to be cautious.

Their determined steps quickly came to a halt when they reached the locomotive. With nowhere left to go, Liv reluctantly led Corida to the stairs by the exit.

“Let’s just stay here for a bit.”

“I don’t know what’s going on, Sister, but wouldn’t it be better to talk things through honestly?”

Liv, who had been anxiously watching the hallway, paused at Corida’s words.

“He was different from how everyone said he was—cold to everyone but not to you. So if there’s a misunderstanding…”

It seemed Corida was still caught up in a romantic fantasy. Liv didn’t want to crush that baseless dream.

“There’s no misunderstanding, Corida.”

Liv smiled bitterly and looked out the window. The train was slowing down, probably nearing a station.

“It just turned out this way.”

From the end of the hallway opposite where Liv stood, there was noise. It didn’t seem like it was just people bustling to get off at the station. After some hesitation, Liv stood close to the train door. They were far from their intended destination, but there was no choice.

Once again, she would have to waste a train ticket.

Clunk!

The train finally came to a stop. The hallway door at the far end opened almost simultaneously with the train door. Liv avoided looking down the hallway and quickly disembarked.

Fortunately, unlike the last stop, this station was relatively crowded and busy. Seeing the station sign, Liv realized it read “Elke,” and she strode toward the ticket gate.

Was it just her imagination? It felt noisy behind her. She wanted to look back, but it seemed like a bad idea.

After passing through the ticket gate and stepping outside, she saw several carriages lined up. The drivers were calling out, competing for passengers.

“I’ll take you safely!”

“Take us to the largest inn.”

“Yes, ma’am!”

As Liv caught her breath, she glanced toward the entrance of the train station through the window of the carriage. All she could see were passengers coming and going. Liv bit her lower lip.

…Was it all just an overreaction?

 



 

Elke was larger than Liv had anticipated. It turned out that the city was home to a famous casino.

The driver took Liv’s request to go to “the largest inn” to mean “the largest casino.” In truth, it wasn’t entirely incorrect—the biggest casino also served as an inn.

She later asked to be taken to a regular inn, but the driver didn’t understand her request. He explained that every inn in Elke was connected to either a large or small casino.

That was how the sisters ended up in the casino district, a place they had never thought they’d visit. Liv wanted to leave the city entirely, but she couldn’t shake the unease she had felt at the train station.

So she decided they would spend the night at the most well-maintained, clean-looking place. She figured that a larger establishment would have better security than a run-down gambling den.

“I’m going to buy some food. Wait here, Corida.”

Since it wasn’t appropriate to take Corida along the bustling streets lined with entertainment venues, Liv left the room alone.

In the lobby, there was a roulette table for guests to casually play. Inside the casino, there were probably more games set up, while the lobby seemed to offer some entertainment to lighten the mood.

Liv took a quick glance at the bustling roulette table and tried to walk past.

“Did you hear the news from Buerno?”

She might have done so if she hadn’t heard those words.

“Oh, yes, I did.”

“What a commotion to have during the Cardinal’s visit.”

“Still, it sounds quite amusing. If I’d known, I would have gone to watch.”

Giggling, the women placed their bets and continued their conversation.

“Right? I was wondering why Lady Malte joined the Peace Pilgrimage, but I guess that explains it.”

“But just how handsome is that Marquis, anyway?”

“Who knows? But I’m curious.”

On the spinning roulette wheel, the dice rolled.

“Shall we make our next trip to Buerno then?”

“Oh! But it’s such a dull place—no casinos, no decent venues for parties!”

“I hate that idea.”

One of the laughing women let out a low gasp.

“Oh my, I won!”

“You seem to be having a lucky day, Madam!”

The topic quickly shifted, and Liv resumed walking. Under her hood, her expression had hardened.

Apparently, a new rumor was sweeping through Buerno, this time linking the Marquis with Lady Malte. Liv wanted to know more but also felt it wouldn’t do any good.

If it involved the two of them, it was obvious. A romance, no doubt. It was said they had once been engaged.

Perhaps the rumors served to show just how quickly the Marquis had lost interest in his runaway mistress. If word of a new scandal had spread beyond the city so soon after Liv left Buerno, that certainly seemed to be the case.

As she passed through the grand entrance, Liv caught a glimpse of her reflection in the glass doors. The image was of her, bundled up in several layers to disguise herself as a man, her face hidden beneath her hat and hood.

She had assumed that he would pursue her, which was why she had disguised herself so desperately. But was it really necessary to go this far?

Liv pulled down the uncomfortable collar she had tucked high beneath her chin and let out a sigh.

Maybe her escape meant nothing to the Marquis. Perhaps this dramatic flight was just her own inflated sense of self-importance.

Maybe she was just playing the fool, pretending to be pursued when no one was after her…

Liv closed her eyes tightly at the thought. If she kept thinking like this, she’d drown in an endless pool of despair.

Whether she was being pursued or not, her plan was to take Corida and head to Adelinde.

That was the only thing that mattered.

 It was after discovering Camille’s fifth alias that they learned the Rodaise sisters had disguised themselves as men during their escape. Camille had used his fifth alias to buy men’s clothing in the sisters’ sizes.

They had thought it was just a change of clothes, but it turned out to be a much more serious escape plan. That realization only fueled Daaemon’ anger further. It was as if he could see her putting all her effort into escaping his grasp.

“We haven’t received any significant reports from Arburn yet.”

Arburn was the destination of the train ticket Camille had secured for the sisters. As soon as they found the ticket, they contacted Arburn and sent a description of Liv, but there was still no useful information.

Daaemon pressed his fingers against his temples in silence.

“Which stations on the route to Arburn have we checked so far?”

“We’ve just received a report that they’ve reached Elke. It’s a city with a lot of drifters passing through, so it’s taking some time. Plus, the high-profile clientele of the casino makes it difficult for the police to do much.”

Charles, who was reporting, suddenly stopped. He swallowed nervously, carefully choosing his words as he observed Daaemon’ sharp expression.

“Also, it seems the eldest son of Viscount Karin is currently in Elke.”

Daaemon’ eyes, already dark, seemed to turn into pure ice. His lips remained tightly shut, but his jawline betrayed how hard he was clenching his teeth.

“Should we assign someone to watch him, just in case…”

“I never thought my subordinates would believe the nonsense of a madwoman who says, ‘The mistress, longing for a man she was close to years ago, abandoned the Marquis and ran away.'”

Charles nodded, his face pale. The thought of the “madwoman” Daaemon mentioned sent shivers down his spine.

Luzia, who had spread the false rumors and been caught, was now paying the price for her actions. She had called it “a harmless prank,” but considering how enraged Daaemon had been upon discovering the prank, Charles knew he had to tread very carefully.

“Of course, I don’t believe it.”

“Good. Then there’s no need to waste manpower on that,” Daaemon replied coldly, biting down on a cigar before angrily smashing it onto the desk.

Liv had worked as a live-in tutor for the Karin family a few years ago, and the public reason for her dismissal was that she had attempted to seduce the eldest son. However, that was the Karin’s side of the story, and in Daaemon’ view, it was quite the opposite.

At least, that was what Daaemon had concluded. But how could he be sure?

Liv Rodaise had played him and escaped. How could he be certain that she hadn’t harbored secret feelings for the unknown son of Viscount Karin?

She had deceived him so easily.

The thought of her gazing affectionately at anyone else twisted his insides. If the eldest son of Viscount Karin were in front of him now, Daaemon would crush him like that cigar.

“…Don’t assign anyone to watch him, but keep track of his movements regularly.”

“Yes, sir.”

It had been less than a week since Liv had disappeared, but each day felt like a year to Daaemon.

He thought he could catch her the very next day, but there were too many pairs of “sisters” traveling on trains. And it was only later that they realized they should have been looking for brothers instead of sisters.

Even then, it wasn’t certain that Liv had gone to Arburn. If she hadn’t, it meant she had disembarked at one of the stations on the Arburn line. With no way to determine the exact station, they had to search them one by one, an impractical approach.

It was too inefficient. Without a proper lead, aimlessly chasing would only lead to failure.

Daaemon pressed his temples and muttered to himself, “Money, medicine, gun.”

After turning Liv’s house upside down, he discovered that she had taken only those three things with her. Initially, Daaemon had assumed that she wouldn’t get far with just those.

“…Money, medicine, gun…”

Daaemon repeated the three words over and over, narrowing his eyes.

Liv wasn’t foolish; she would try to move as far away from Buerno as possible. But she wouldn’t be able to hide in a quiet rural area.

Because she wasn’t alone.

“Corida Rodaise.”

A city where she could settle with her not-yet-fully-recovered sister, Corida, who needed new medicines currently being distributed.

The first condition for a new place to settle would be a city large enough to have access to those new medicines.

But was that the only condition?

Daaemon recalled the moment when Liv’s attitude had changed—the day she had cried bitterly with a pale face.

 

“In matters regarding Corida’s future, you shouldn’t have excluded me.”

 

With her beloved younger sister’s health improving, it was natural that Liv would have plans and considerations for her future. In the past, when she had been focused on just keeping her sister alive, there had been no room for such thoughts. But now things were different. Corida’s condition had improved, and as long as she took her medicine, she could live like anyone else.

“How many schools in Beren accept commoners?”

“Pardon?”

“Find out.”

Charles hesitated for a moment, seemingly trying to understand Daaemon’ intention, then nodded and left.

Watching Charles’ back, Adolf called out to Daaemon with a sigh.

“Marquis…”

“What about Eleonore?”

“…They’re still cautious. It seems they haven’t fully grasped the situation either.”

“Idiots. Perhaps I should show them what happens when you trust Malte.”

Daaemon had never cared who they allied with. All of this chaos had stemmed from Eleonore joining forces with Malte, trying to move in line with international politics, but Daaemon spoke as if it were purely the result of Camille Eleonore’s personal misjudgment.

Adolf, his gaze heavy with concern, cautiously spoke up, “Are you planning to take serious action?”

“Serious action?”

“If they find out what you have, everything they’ve built so far will become meaningless.”

“What kind of life have they had that they’d even notice, stuck in this backwater?”

Adolf had no response to that bitter retort and closed his mouth. Daaemon waved at him irritably.

Once he’d sent both aides away, Daaemon was left alone in his office, lost in thought. The last place he had seen Liv was here. Naturally, the image of Liv from that day came to mind.

She had clung to him unexpectedly, her composed face spouting sweet words with ease—it had been strange.

If she had been an enemy spy trying to take his life, he would have willingly offered his neck to her. For someone who had survived enemy territory, that would have been a fatal mistake.

He shouldn’t have allowed her to act that way from the start. He shouldn’t have just watched, assuming she understood her place.

He should have shown her that it was up to Daaemon alone to decide whether their relationship would continue or end.

Could she have done the same to Camille to gain his help?

They’d only had a short time alone together, not nearly long enough to do anything significant, but for someone like that weakling Camille, even a moment was more than enough.

And there were many ways to get what you wanted without going all the way. Daaemon himself had taught her that there were easy and quick ways to satisfy a man’s desire without taking off her clothes.

His thoughts spiraled out of control.

“Damn it.”

The curse slipped from his lips as he imagined Liv kneeling before Camille, embracing his neck, whispering softly in her fragile voice, or even just standing before another man, blushing as she had in front of him.

If she had stood like that before another man, or if she planned to in the future…

Gritting his teeth, Daaemon glared at the desk in front of him. No matter how much he repeated that he’d soon catch her, his rage refused to subside.

In the end, he stood up violently. He marched out of his office, heading for the underground exhibition room—the place he always went to calm his mind.

 The slightly chilly air and the familiar lingering scent of the underground immediately engaged his senses.

The basement was as perfect as always. The precious works of art he had meticulously collected were displayed in their best condition. Yet, Daaemon’ blue eyes, staring at them, seemed more indifferent than ever.

Nearby, a white marble statue with smooth, lifelike muscles caught his eye. Daaemon reached out to touch its surface. Cold and hard.

This wasn’t it.

This was not what he wanted.

His hand, gripping the statue, tightened.

Crash!

The statue toppled under his rough grasp, shattering into countless fragments. The sharp shards scattered across the gallery floor, creating a mess. Daaemon looked up, his gaze fixed on the farthest wall of the gallery.

A nude painting of a woman, her head turned halfway, hung there, seemingly mocking him.

 



 

He had found a meaningful lead.

The moment he heard the news, Daaemon mounted his horse. It had become unbearable to wait at the Langess mansion, reading his subordinates’ reports. He couldn’t sit idly any longer, tormented by the sensations that tore through his body.

Above all, the so-called “meaningful lead” he had received was too significant to merely confirm with letters.

“This way.”

The subordinates led him to a lodging in Elke, far enough from the casino lights and the laughter of those enjoying their entertainment to be secluded.

“Ugh…”

A faint groan emerged as the door opened. However, no one in the room paid any attention to the person groaning.

Thierry, who had arrived before Daaemon, was sitting beside the bed. She was cleaning bloody medical instruments when She noticed Daaemon’ arrival, and she held out a steel tray.

“Here’s the bullet that was found.”

The bullet rolled across the tray, leaving small red streaks in its path, and Daaemon’ eyes followed its movement.

Roman spoke in a low voice, “It’s definitely the item we were looking for.”

The gun given to Liv was one of Daaemon’ own. He couldn’t fail to recognize his weapon.

He picked up the bloody bullet without hesitation and rolled it between his fingers.

Impressive.

The thought brought a fleeting smile to his lips. Though he knew he looked like a madman, he couldn’t suppress his strange joy.

The fact that the man who’d been shot was the eldest son of Viscount Karin—the one who had once pestered Liv—satisfied him. Daaemon hadn’t believed the nonsense Luzia tried to spread, but nonetheless, a part of him had held on to an annoying sense of doubt. This bullet was clear proof that Liv held no lingering feelings for that man.

His joy, however, was entirely directed at Liv—not at the man before him.

“Should we treat him?”

After inspecting the bullet, Daaemon shifted his gaze to the bed. The sound of labored, wheezing breaths made it seem like the man could die at any moment, but amusingly, the man lying there looked relatively unharmed. His thigh was soaked in blood, but the injury didn’t seem serious enough to be life-threatening.

Of course, if left untreated, he might end up losing a leg.

“Wake him up.”

“…Honestly, he’s a loud one. I’d rather not wake him.”

Grumbling unhappily, Thierry moved efficiently. She took out an unmarked vial and skillfully filled a syringe.

Thierry was a former military doctor who had served alongside Daaemon on the battlefield. Unlike other medics, Thierry had handled a variety of tasks during their service together.

Daaemon knew how to kill people, but not how to save them. Naturally, “keeping someone alive just enough” was Thierry’s job.

Just like now.

“Aaaagh!”

The man woke up screaming in pain as the syringe was mercilessly plunged into him. With his face twisted in agony, he opened his eyes, but couldn’t make sense of the situation and flailed about. Thierry clicked his tongue and stepped back.

“Who… who are you?”

The man, clutching his wounded leg and whining like a miserable dog, looked around at the people surrounding his bed with suspicious eyes.

“Where am I? A hospital?”

Seeing Thierry gathering medical instruments, hope briefly flickered in the man’s eyes.

“Jacques Karin.”

Jacques turned his gaze to Daaemon. His eyes widened at the sight of Daaemon’ face—not because he recognized him, but purely out of surprise at his appearance.

Daaemon tossed the bullet he was holding back onto the tray and spoke, “You ran into Liv Rodaise, didn’t you?”

“That… that bitch hasn’t been caught yet? You need to catch her! She’s completely insane!”

Jacques, who had been awestruck by Daaemon’ face, began to shout, his expression twisted with anger. His loud accusations, labeling her as a vicious woman, grew so loud that everyone in the room looked irritated.

Daaemon, however, remained unfazed. He ignored Jacques’ words, shifting his gaze to the bandaged leg.

Though Liv had shot the gun, it didn’t seem like she’d intended to kill. It must have been an attempt to escape the immediate situation. And it hadn’t been an easy situation, either.

“She’s not the type to shoot without reason.”

This meant Jacques had clearly done something deserving of being shot by Liv.

Unfortunately, Daaemon hadn’t ordered his men to keep a close watch on Jacques—only to check on him periodically. As a result, they had only arrived after Jacques had been shot. By that time, Liv had already fled, and they had simply taken Jacques.

In a city full of casinos, the back alleys were rife with crime. At first, the subordinates thought Jacques had been attacked by some ordinary thugs.

But when Jacques regained consciousness, the first thing out of his mouth had been about Liv.

“To think such a dangerous criminal is out in the streets—it’s intolerable!”

Looking at Jacques’ situation, something seemed off. Someone coming all the way here to enjoy gambling and entertainment couldn’t have been unaware of the city’s security risks. Yet, he wandered into the back alleys without any protection.

Unless, of course, he had tried to drag someone into those secluded alleys to do something.

“Just answer the question.”

“Lock her up, immediately… Aaagh!”

Jacques, who had been shouting nonsense until his face turned red, let out a scream. Daaemon had pressed down mercilessly on the bandaged thigh.

Bright red blood began to seep through the bandages. Jacques struggled, trying to shake off Daaemon’ hand, but the bandage became even more soaked with blood.

“I don’t want to waste my time, so prove your usefulness while you still have the chance.”

“He’s so loud,” Thierry muttered.

“I’ll talk! I’ll say anything!”

Unable to endure the pain, Jacques sobbed, curling up. A trace of contempt flickered in Daaemon’ otherwise detached eyes.

Someone who couldn’t even endure this much pain.

As much as he wanted to tear out that noisy tongue, he couldn’t act on impulse. Jacques had met Liv, and there was no way to share what he saw if Daaemon gouged out his eyes—he had to hear it from the man himself.

“Tell me everything—from the moment you met Liv Rodaise until she shot you.”

He could dispose of him after getting all the information.

 



 

Thankfully, it seemed no wanted posters had been issued yet.

Liv, checking the village’s public notice board, sighed in relief. When she hastily left Elke in a rented carriage, her mind had gone blank, and she couldn’t think straight. But now, her rationality was slowly returning.

‘To think I fired a gun…’

Liv thought of the small pistol she kept on her, one bullet missing, and sighed. She had taken it just in case but hadn’t imagined she would actually need to use it.

But if she hadn’t, she would have been in danger. Liv turned heavily.

‘Can I even use trains anymore?’

Most major stations usually had stationed police officers. There was no way Jacques, who had been shot, would stay silent—he would surely go to the police and report Liv. If that happened, wanted posters would be distributed in the cities around Elke, making her a fugitive.

“For now, we’ll have to use carriages.”

The ride wasn’t as smooth as a train, and the distance they could travel was shorter. However, avoiding inspections and changing routes flexibly was an advantage, allowing them to pass through quieter towns if needed. Whether Corida could endure the rougher journey, though, was uncertain…

‘Would it have been better to just give in once?’

If she had, would she have avoided becoming a criminal?

The thought crossed her mind for a moment, but she quickly shook her head, clearing her mind. Even though she had rolled in bed with the Marquis dozens of times, she couldn’t bear to give herself to someone as vile as Jacques Karin. No matter if what she did with the Marquis was akin to that of a courtesan, there was no reason to do the same with anyone else.

Damn Jacques Karin. Was this what people called a cursed fate?

Running into Jacques Karin in Elke had truly been an unfortunate accident for Liv.

 “Oh? I didn’t expect it, but it really is you.”

His arrogant demeanor and low-class laughter were unmistakable.

“Wow, how long has it been? What was your name… Love? No, Liv?”

Even during the short time Liv worked at the Karin estate, she had glimpsed Jacques’ irredeemable nature. In the intervening years, he had become an even worse excuse for a human being.

It wasn’t surprising to see Jacques wandering the streets of Elke, full of casinos. A man who wasted his life gambling fit right in. But Liv hadn’t expected him to remember her. She was caught completely off guard.

Jacques greeted her as though running into an old friend.

“Meeting here, of all places. What a surprise.”

“I’m in a hurry.”

They were not on friendly terms. Liv quickly turned away from Jacques—that was her first mistake.

She hadn’t imagined that he would tenaciously follow her.

She couldn’t go straight back to the inn where Corida was waiting; Jacques showed no signs of backing off. So Liv chose a more complicated path, trying to shake him off. But in the end, it was her second mistake. Wandering unfamiliar streets in an unfamiliar city was bound to go poorly.

“Come on, meeting like this is fate. Just give me a little of your time.”

When Liv found herself at a dead-end alley, Jacques approached with his sleazy smile.

Nothing had changed from before. Just like when he had pestered her at the Karin estate.

Back then, Jacques was immature and reckless, his mind always several steps behind his actions. He reached out for her without thinking about the fact that they were in broad daylight, in the middle of the mansion. His impulsive attempt to overpower Liv had been easily thwarted.

Naturally, his attempt to have his way with her had failed, but the Viscountess had still blamed Liv for it. Liv had been dismissed without delay. Moreover, the Viscountess, determined to keep her away from her son, spread rumors of Liv’s “improper behavior” throughout the neighboring areas.

As a result, Liv had to travel far from the rumors to find new work—at a time when Corida’s health was worse than ever.

“Get any closer, and you’ll regret it.”

“Ha, you’ve gotten even sassier than before!”

Jacques was perversely pleased by Liv’s cold attitude. He reminisced about their time at the Karin Viscounty, embellishing the story with faulty memories, spewing nonsense.

In short, it was an attempt to corner her.

“It’s a shame, thinking back to those days. Though it did teach me to be more careful from then on.”

His giggling was disgusting and sent a chill down her spine. The moment she realized he was closing in on her, Liv instinctively grabbed the gun hidden in her coat.

She couldn’t kill a rabbit, but at least she could scare off a rat.

Shooting this gun wouldn’t bring the Marquis to rescue her…

Liv tried to recall what she had learned at the shooting range on the Berryworth mansion. Jacques, oblivious to what Liv’s hidden hand held, continued to drive her into the corner.

 

And that was how she ended up in her current situation—wanted as a criminal.

Fortunately, the alley where she fired the shot was known for its poor security, allowing her enough time to escape.

Barely holding herself together, Liv returned to the inn and immediately left Elke with Corida. Elke, with its constant influx of travelers, had many carriages going to different regions, making it easy to leave.

‘Should I make a fake ID…’

With a fake ID, she wouldn’t be able to present her educational background—her only source of pride. This would make it harder to find a job in the future. But she couldn’t think of a better solution.

‘First things first…’

Slumping her shoulders, Liv trudged along. Since she confirmed there were no wanted posters yet, she needed to hurry to buy hair dye and other necessities.

 



 

After several meetings with someone from Eleonore and waiting for someone urgently dispatched from Malte to arrive in Buerno, there was still no trace of Liv.

After burying a bullet in Jacques’ thigh, Liv had disappeared again. Daaemon guessed she was likely traveling by carriage.

Based on her past actions, it was clear Liv was being extremely cautious. After all, she had escaped from Daaemon’ grasp, and on top of that, she’d shot someone. A timid person like her would be even more careful now.

Daaemon adjusted his approach, focusing on narrowing down the cities where Liv might settle. Knowing what had shackled Liv’s feet made it possible.

There were more cities than expected with both the newly distributed medicine and schools admitting commoners. However, it was still a more efficient approach than blindly scouring the entire country like searching for a grain of sand on a beach.

Even so, it did nothing to ease Daaemon’ fraying nerves.

Crash!

The sound of something breaking and shattering rang out from early morning once again.

“I told you, if I don’t want it, get rid of it.”

Servants scrambled to clean up the scattered food and broken dishes. The butler, Philip, stood a few steps away, swallowing his sigh.

“The air was quite cold last night. If you’re not planning to sleep, at least eat something…”

“Spare me your useless meddling, Philip.”

Daaemon cut him off with a cold, dry voice, averting his gaze as if he couldn’t bear to look at him. Philip watched Daaemon with worried eyes.

Though it was a greenhouse, the air had been rather chilly at night. When Daaemon suddenly decided to stay there, Philip assumed it would only be for a few hours, but it had already been two days.

Before coming to the greenhouse, Daaemon frequently stayed in the basement of the mansion. After Liv disappeared, he often retreated there, and every time he did, something would inevitably shatter or break.

No one could enter the basement freely, so no one knew exactly what happened there.

After spending a while doing who knew what in the basement, Daaemon suddenly started staying in the greenhouse two days ago.

They assumed he was trying to calm himself by looking at the plants.

At first, anyway.

“I’ll bring some tea.”

“Bring me alcohol.”

“My lord…”

“Who’s your master?”

Philip, with a troubled expression, gestured to the servants. A few hurriedly left the greenhouse. Daaemon watched their backs with cold eyes, then slouched into a chair, his exhaustion evident in his pale complexion.

“…We’ll find her soon.”

Daaemon twisted his lips into a smile at Philip’s words.

“Of course.”

Normally, Daaemon’ mutterings were sharp enough to leave no room for doubt, but now there was a faint hint of unease beneath the cold tone that even Philip could detect.

It resembled the symptoms of withdrawal after quitting an addictive substance like alcohol or cigarettes.

“So please take care of yourself. You must welcome her properly when she returns.”

“Properly?”

Daaemon reacted sharply to Philip’s suggestion.

“Dress up nicely and greet her with a smile? A woman who dared run away from me?”

“Of course, she is…”

“Philip, it seems you’re underestimating the insult to your master.”

“Then, are you searching for her just to exact revenge for the insult, my lord?”

Daaemon, who had been speaking in a harsh tone, paused. Philip met Daaemon’ fierce, bloodshot gaze without flinching and spoke calmly, “Should I prepare the interrogation room?”

In addition to Daaemon’ personal exhibition room, there were other facilities in the mansion’s basement. Though they hadn’t been used in a long time, they were always kept ready, including an interrogation room.

If Liv were locked up there…

Her frail, slender body wouldn’t last an hour. The memory of her bony frame standing out as he last held her made Daaemon’ brow furrow.

Choosing to run away with that fragile body—what a foolish decision. At least she had the presence of mind to take a gun.

“No.”

“Then perhaps you could post a reward and distribute wanted posters across the country.”

Daaemon said nothing, simply staring at Philip. Despite the intensity of his gaze, Philip continued speaking calmly, seemingly unbothered.

“That would be far easier and more convenient than making discreet and detailed cooperation requests, as you’re doing now. And it would make tracking her movements simpler.”

“You don’t think I know that?”

“If you know, then why don’t you do it?”

Once again, Daaemon fell silent. Philip watched him for a moment, then spoke in a low voice, “I am the butler of this mansion. No matter what happens outside, my duty is to maintain peace within these walls. However, not every situation can be resolved by blind faith.”

Philip was pointing out Daaemon’ recent behavior. He had been handling things in a manner completely unlike himself.

 Aside from pursuing Liv, Daaemon’ first order of business was dealing with Luzia.

She was now publicly humiliated. Not only had she ruined her family’s marriage plans due to her infatuation with a man, but she had also sullied the sanctity of the Peace Pilgrimage by joining with impure motives. It was revealed that the object of her obsession was none other than Marquis Daaemon Dietrion, proven by the partial disclosure of some letters she had sent him years earlier.

The revealed content mentioned her intentions of breaking off her engagement with Zighilt. Though the actual breakup happened only recently, the letters suggested that she had planned to end her family’s marriage arrangements because of Daaemon for years.

Naturally, the Malte family publicly denied this, and Luzia vehemently protested.

Then came the next rumor—that Luzia had offered herself to someone in an attempt to fulfill her unrequited love. The surprising detail was that the target was the fourth son of Eleonore.

It was shocking enough that a direct descendant of Eleonore was in Buerno, and even more so that he was masquerading as a mere art teacher under the name Camille Marcel. Furthermore, one of the young ladies known to be close to Lady Malte was also acquainted with this Lord Eleonore.

The interactions between great noble families were nothing unusual.

However, the real problem was that everyone knew the Marquis’ cherished mistress had recently suffered because of a nude painting. And Camille had been one of the individuals who had selected the artwork to be exhibited on the boulevard.

Rumors began to circulate that Camille had made advances on Liv, the Marquis’ mistress, and was rejected, prompting him to act out of spite. Many could testify to Camille’s apparent interest in Liv.

It wasn’t far-fetched to think that Lady Malte, who pined for Daaemon, and Camille, who coveted the Marquis’ mistress, might have joined forces. The names of the noble families involved created such a mess that the name of a mere mistress hardly drew any attention.

Of course, if Daaemon had intended to end it with mere rumors, he wouldn’t have started in the first place. He had discovered that Luzia was the one who had stolen the unfinished nude painting and had it completed. He had even apprehended the artist who had worked on it.

The trial to restore honor was intended to be a public spectacle in the capital. Preparations were underway to bring Lady Malte, who knew no shame, to trial.

Daaemon also possessed secret documents he had collected during his time as Stephan’s aide. These documents served as evidence of just how many different men Luzia had been involved with.

The situation was progressing so smoothly that even Daaemon’ subordinates were taken aback. They were well aware of how Daaemon had lived in Buerno up to this point, which made it all the more surprising.

“My lord, your actions are uncharacteristic.”

“I’m dealing with those who dared look down on me. What more explanation is needed?”

Indeed, Marquis Daaemon Dietrion was not one to shy away from conflict. Arrogant and self-assured, he believed he could always come out on top in every battle. He could achieve the desired outcome whenever he put his mind to it.

This time, too, it seemed he wanted to deal with all the nobles who had deeply offended him in one sweep.

But Philip, who had seen Daaemon’ private side more closely than anyone else, felt there was more to it. The way Daaemon was handling the matter was unusual. Taking the time to generate rumors, involving prominent families, and diverting attention—all these efforts were unlike him.

If anything, Philip would have expected Daaemon to shoot them and maim them in person.

“No noble would go to such lengths for a mistress’ honor.”

Daaemon’ face twisted in frustration. “Nonsense.”

“Miss Rodaise’s name is no longer heard anywhere in Buerno. Thanks to the more scandalous stories you introduced. Normally, you wouldn’t have done this. Malte and Eleonore aren’t names you would easily use as pawns.”

“They touched what was mine, and they’re paying the price.”

“If it were the usual you, you would have discarded her first.”

Daaemon clenched his jaw. Philip didn’t seem the least bit intimidated.

“You’re putting considerable effort into her.”

Just as Philip finished speaking, the servants who had gone to fetch alcohol returned cautiously. Drinks and light snacks were arranged on the outdoor table.

“I’ll bring dinner later.” Philip, speaking calmly, led the servants out of the glasshouse.

Daaemon glared at Philip’s retreating back, then irritably grabbed a bottle of alcohol. He gritted his teeth as he fiddled with the filled glass.

Discard her first?

He had never even fully had her. Look at him now—pathetic, having gained nothing in the end. How could he discard what he had never truly possessed…

Then, was she never his to begin with?

Had she never been something he could call his own?

His hand tightened around the glass. A cracking sound echoed as the surface of the glass shattered.

The shards, glistening with spilled alcohol, soaked Daaemon’ glove. Thankfully, he was wearing gloves, or his hand would have been shredded by the glass.

But now, the glove was soaked entirely.

It felt disgusting and filthy.

…Whether this feeling of loathing came from the soaked glove or not, he couldn’t tell.

 



 

She changed her appearance.

Since she had been caught wearing men’s clothes when she ran into Jacques, she figured it was no longer useful. Liv dyed her hair and dressed as an ordinary traveler. Of course, she discarded her old hood and cloak, replacing them with new ones. Now, Liv and Corida looked like siblings at a glance.

Traveling solely by carriage took twice as long compared to a train. But rather than being careless, Liv chose the safer route, even if it meant a little more hardship.

She wasn’t traveling alone—Corida was with her. No matter what, she couldn’t put Corida in danger.

“How are you feeling, Cor… Colin?”

It was unfortunate that she wasn’t yet used to their aliases, but with time, they would become second nature.

At Liv’s question, Corida smiled and nodded. “I’m okay.”

Unfortunately, Corida’s words weren’t very convincing. She looked much more haggard than when they had left Buerno, and her energy had dwindled. Liv glanced at her bag.

She had taken all the new medicine she could from Buerno, but with the journey taking longer than expected, there was a chance they would need more before reaching Adelinde.

If that happened, they would inevitably have to pass through a city. If only she could be certain that she wasn’t wanted…

Liv sighed deeply. For now, they just needed to get as far away as possible, as quickly as possible.

Far enough that neither Buerno nor Elke’s news could reach them.

 



 

The glasshouse reeked of alcohol. The door opened as Daaemon stepped out to hear Charles’ report.

“This is the information from the Dominion Medical Research Institute.”

The information included details on the merchants contracted to supply the new medicine, and the cities where the medicine was being distributed. It was all sensitive information. To obtain it, Daaemon had gathered favors from his past connections.

No—to catch Liv, Daaemon was using every resource he had. He had set things in motion that couldn’t be undone without catching her.

Even his subordinates no longer questioned Daaemon’ orders. Too much had already been put in place to stop him. In fact, everyone secretly realized that the quickest way to improve the situation was to catch Liv as soon as possible.

“Fortunately, the limited supply of the new medicine makes it relatively easy to organize a list of buyers.”

“What about the schools?”

“It’s not the start of a new term yet, so there’s nothing significant to report.”

Daaemon scanned through the documents listing the schools. Charles pulled out another sheet of paper.

“This one lists only the cities with both new medicine distribution and schools open to commoners.”

Daaemon, checking the list, shifted his gaze to the map spread out on the desk. Despite having been drunk every day recently, his eyes were sharp and intense.

“Are you planning to go in person?”

“Why wouldn’t I?”

“…I’ve heard your insomnia has returned.”

Daaemon glanced at Charles.

“Dr. Gertrude has prepared some medication. It’s the same as what you used in the military.”

“Leave it here.”

Charles carefully placed the container on the desk. The container was familiar to Daaemon. Seeing it brought back old memories.

It felt like he was regressing further into the past as time went on—relying on strong alcohol, sleepless nights, and eventually the medication, just like during the war.

At least now, he no longer watched people dying in pools of blood every day, listening to their screams and moans through the night, surrounded by the overwhelming stench of blood.

 Even after Charles left, Daaemon continued to stare at the medicine container for a long time.

He had stopped using it after he began seriously collecting nude artworks. Looking at the nude paintings to calm himself had seemed like a far more moderate approach than sleeping under the influence of the medication.

But now, they were useless. All the nude artworks he had gathered in the basement had become nothing more than worthless trash.

“My lord, the Malte family has presented another negotiation proposal.”

A sudden voice snapped Daaemon back to reality. Adolf was standing before him.

When had he come in? Adolf wasn’t the type to enter Daaemon’ office without permission, so Daaemon must have subconsciously granted him entry. But he didn’t remember doing so.

Pressing his temples, Daaemon slumped into his chair.

“The main points are…”

“It was hasty.”

“…Pardon?”

“I killed him too hastily.”

Adolf’s face showed confusion at Daaemon’ words, clearly not understanding his meaning. Daaemon, after rubbing his face dry, muttered in a dry tone, “Instead of burning the painting, I should have had it completed.”

Adolf looked at Daaemon, bewildered. After some contemplation, he asked cautiously,

“Are you referring to Brad?”

“Was that his name?”

What did the name matter? What mattered was that the man had painted Liv’s nude.

“Only three pieces—far too few.”

Two of them were from behind, and only one had half her face. Now that the living Liv was gone, even a painting of her face would have been better than nothing. It would have been far more effective than this useless medication.

If he had spared Brad, maybe he could have painted a similar likeness of Liv from memory.

Perhaps it would have been better to lock him up rather than kill him. What Daaemon needed now wasn’t an artist with artistic talent, but an artist who knew Liv’s face.

Once he caught her, he’d have plenty of portraits painted. They wouldn’t have to be formal portraits—just many, as many as possible. Enough to hang anywhere his eyes might land.

It had been a mistake not to even make a simple locket. Having her so close had made it seem unnecessary. But that wasn’t Daaemon’ fault.

 

“The model is right here in front of you, not in the painting.”

 

It was Liv who had said that. She had said it while asking him to take the paintings down.

 

“I want you to look at me, the real me, not the painting.”

 

If she wanted him to look at her and not a painting, then she should have stayed in front of him.

 

“I’m not a trophy. Not some expensive statue meant to be displayed. I’m a person.”

 

Back then, seeing her cry had made him so angry. But now, even that crying face was something he wished he could see before him. Even if it made him furious, he’d welcome it if only he could see her again.

With only the image of Liv in his mind, there was no way to resolve his emotions, whatever they were.

“We’re doing our best to find her.”

At Adolf’s low words, Daaemon only responded with a cynical laugh.

 

That night, the effect of the medication he hadn’t taken in a long time was better than expected. For once, Daaemon went to bed without drinking.

Smooth, pale arms wrapped around his neck.

The slender waist was thin enough to fit within the circle of one arm, but the curve beneath it was ample, like a perfectly sculpted porcelain figure.

When she, sitting astride his thigh, rested her head on his shoulder, her voluminous auburn hair spilled down. As he ran his hand through her cascading hair, a low chuckle came from the nape of her neck. The hand clasped around his neck trailed down his solid chest.

His abs were already taut with tension. As her long, delicate fingers traced the ridges of his scars and muscles, his thighs tensed and his breathing quickened.

He felt an overwhelming urge to merge their bodies then and there, but oddly, his limbs felt too heavy to move as he wanted. All he could do was comb his fingers through her hair and trail his fingertips down her back.

In the meantime, her wandering hand touched between his legs, making him unconsciously hold his breath.

His body was already accustomed to pleasure, ready for the sensations that would soon drown his mind in bliss. Anticipation pooled in his mouth.

But her hand never touched the hardened length, leaving him in even greater frustration as he felt abandoned. He leaned down, brushing his lips against her ear.

He wanted her to touch him more, to press their bodies together, to let him plunge into her warmth, to squeeze his swollen tip against her narrow, moist inner walls.

His tongue traced along the curve of her ear before lightly biting her earlobe. She gasped, her body jerking slightly.

Her soft, round breasts pressed against his chest, the hardened nipples brushing against his skin.

She was clearly aroused. The pink nape of her neck peeked out between her hair, her body twisting in response to rising pleasure.

The wetness soaking his thigh was her love juice, and the breathy moans escaping her lips were her heated breaths.

And yet, that was it. He couldn’t do anything beyond that.

The frustration was maddening. Unable to hold back his irritation, he bit down harder on her neck, leaving a red mark.

At that moment, his heavy limbs felt lighter, and he immediately pushed himself up.

He grabbed her frail body and pinned her beneath him. She couldn’t resist, trapped beneath his large frame.

Just as he forcefully spread her legs, faint cracks began to form on her skin. The cracks spread across her body like dry winter branches. Her white, marble-like body began to fracture.

Startled, his blue eyes instinctively looked at her face.

The face he thought would be flushed with pleasure was pale, streaked with tears he hadn’t noticed before. Her green eyes, which once looked at him as if he were her savior, were lifeless, and her lips, slightly parted, were chapped like those of a sick person.

The cracks continued from her neck to her cheeks and forehead.

As her lips moved slightly, her body shattered into white, sharp fragments in his arms.

At the same time, he felt as though something had struck him, and he opened his eyes with a start.

“Hah…!”

Taking a short, gasping breath, Daaemon opened his eyes to see the dark, cold bedroom and let out a long sigh.

Sweeping his bangs aside, he found his palm damp with sweat. His lower half was wet and aching—an unmistakable sign of arousal.

Daaemon let out a cold, mirthless laugh. It was all ridiculous and absurd.

But the most absurd of all was the pathetic feeling of longing for Liv Rodaise, who didn’t even speak in his dreams.

How laughable.

 



 

The moment she first set foot in Adelinde, Liv had a sense that she would quite like it here.

The city was charming and peaceful. The red-roofed streets were neat and orderly, with flowerbeds decorating every window, adding warmth and freshness to the city’s atmosphere.

The exhausting journey to get here had been worth it. Corida, too, seemed pleased with the view of the new city.

After quickly securing a room at an inn, Liv began exploring the city. Her first priority was finding the local apothecary and confirming the availability of the new medicine.

“The supply of the new medicine is limited, so you’ll need to make a reservation to purchase it.”

Thankfully, the apothecary in Adelinde didn’t seem to require proof of identity for reservations. It wasn’t out of kindness—more likely, it was because there were no influential upper-class families in the area.

For Liv, it was fortunate. However, when they mentioned that proof of identity was required to make a reservation, she had no choice but to hold off for now.

She still hadn’t acquired a fake ID.

Throughout their journey here, Liv had confirmed that she wasn’t wanted. She hadn’t found any wanted posters of herself anywhere, and eventually, she had even dared to travel by train. Thanks to that, they reached Adelinde faster than she had expected.

For some reason, Jacques hadn’t reported her. Even if he had, it seemed there hadn’t been a major search for her. In Adelinde, there might not even be a need to hide her identity.

‘But…’

Still, an inexplicable sense of unease weighed heavily on her heart. Something she couldn’t quite name…

No, in fact, she knew what it was. She knew exactly what was causing her anxiety.

As she walked away from the apothecary and down the street, Liv suddenly lifted her gaze. Ahead, she saw a young boy selling newspapers, shouting at the top of his lungs in front of a quaint public flowerbed.

 Perhaps the front page of that newspaper featured a grand report on the scandal between Marquis Dietrion and Lady Malte. Considering Lady Malte’s high status, the story of finding new love after her broken engagement would certainly excite everyone.

The Marquis might have grasped Lady Malte’s hand in an attempt to restore his honor, long forgetting the insolent mistress. Why wouldn’t he?

Despite these thoughts, Liv couldn’t bring herself to buy a single newspaper during her journey here. She wondered if perhaps she might find confirmation that the Marquis had lost all interest in her. And if she did, she’d also confirm that she had meant nothing to him.

She ran away without looking back, yet she couldn’t rid herself of this ridiculous lingering attachment.

“Miss, buy a newspaper!”

Seeing Liv standing there staring at the stack of newspapers, a newsboy waved the paper enthusiastically. Liv quickly came to her senses, smiled awkwardly, and shook her head. Fearing she might accidentally glimpse the newspaper, she turned away in haste.

The steps that had felt lighter since arriving in Adelinde suddenly became heavy again.

With a habitual motion, Liv bought some hair dye, deciding it was better to fill her mind with other thoughts. She chose to look around the residential areas of Adelinde, searching for a place where she and Corida could live.

The first neighborhood that caught her eye looked quite nice, but without a job, she couldn’t afford to waste money on expensive rent. Eventually, she found herself heading to a more rundown, more neglected part of town.

Buildings were crowded together like a chicken coop, and the familiar smell of waste and garbage, something she had experienced far too often, began to waft in. Liv’s face unconsciously stiffened. No matter how desperate she was for money, she couldn’t imagine living in such a dirty, grim neighborhood…

At that thought, Liv paused. She realized that this scene wasn’t exactly unfamiliar.

Pomel, who constantly hounded her for more rent, Rita, the neighbor who looked after Corida, and Betryl, the apprentice priest from the church near their home…

It wasn’t that long ago, but life back then felt like a distant past.

‘How ridiculous…’

How long had she lived eating good food, wearing nice clothes, staying in a comfortable place? She had already forgotten the past she once took for granted, now finding herself complaining.

A sense of hollow laughter appeared on Liv’s face. Back then, she only considered the price and ignored every other condition. She had to do the same now.

‘But still, this place…’

Liv’s eyes slowly scanned the neighborhood. Beyond just being dirty, smelly, and cramped, she worried about Corida’s future life here, especially since she would be attending school. She needed to find a safer place.

Biting her lip and pondering for a while, Liv finally turned around. It was better to put more thought into finding a place. For now, securing a job was the priority.

Once she had a stable income, everything else would be easier to decide.

 



 

Corida was quick to pick up on things.

She knew just how much her sister cared for her. She knew that Liv wanted her to always remain an innocent and cheerful little sister. Although she was naive in the ways of the world from being confined indoors, she prided herself on recognizing her sister’s changes more quickly than anyone else.

So it wasn’t long before Corida realized that they were struggling to settle in Adelinde.

It wasn’t even something that required deep thought. The sisters were still staying in an inn, and Liv was coming and going to an employment agency without finding a decent job. Corida guessed that they were facing difficulties across various areas because Liv hadn’t managed to obtain a fake ID.

Liv had always lived her life earnestly. She knew nothing about backstreet dealings like making fake identification cards. In a region where she had no connections, secretly obtaining a fake ID was not going to be easy.

Corida watched her sister prepare to leave early in the morning and quietly approached her.

“Sister, is there anything I can help with?”

“No. But how much medicine do you have left?”

“The medicine…”

Liv, seeing that there were only enough doses left for three or four more days, pressed her lips tightly together. She tried to keep a composed face, but her eyes revealed her deep worries.

“I’ll have to visit the apothecary first today.”

Liv forced herself to smile.

“They said that once I place a reservation, I can receive it within three days, so don’t worry too much.”

Lately, Liv repeated the phrase “don’t worry” as if it were a habit. It seemed she herself hadn’t realized that she was the one who couldn’t shake off her worries.

Liv had always been a dependable sister, but lately, she looked precarious every day. Corida had tried to bring up this issue several times, but each attempt had been cut short by Liv’s stern denial, ending the conversation before it could properly begin.

To Corida, all of this had started in Buerno. Specifically, it had started when things began to fall apart with the Marquis.

Liv claimed there were no personal feelings involved in her relationship with the Marquis, but that was pure denial. If there had been nothing, they wouldn’t have fled Buerno like this.

“Since we arrived in Adelinde, you’ve been running around non-stop. Sister, maybe you should rest a little.”

“But…”

“Sister.”

“Alright. I’ll do that. After I place the reservation for the medicine.”

Corida wasn’t in immediate danger of fainting if she didn’t take her medicine. However, without the certainty of having been cured, it was risky to stop taking it arbitrarily.

So, today as well, Corida stood at the door to see her sister off. Liv’s figure, her hair dyed a dull brown, looked smaller and more fragile than ever. Corida watched her sister’s back, lost in thought for a long time.

That day, Liv only placed the order for the medicine before coming back. She would be able to collect it in three days.

 



 

Finally, there was contact from the employment agency. They had a position in a small shop for her. The good news brought a rare brightness to Liv’s face after days of constant anxiety.

“It’s a small bookstore. They mainly handle used books, and they’re urgently looking for help. They’re searching for someone who can handle basic administrative tasks, and it seems like you’d be a perfect fit for the position.”

“Thank you. Truly.”

“I’ll give you the address, so please go there for an interview.”

With a light heart, Liv left the employment agency. The bookstore was a small shop near the girls’ school. Since she had already walked the streets around the school a few times, finding the shop wasn’t difficult.

A job near the school—what a perfect location.

It felt as though the tangled threads that had been tying her up were finally starting to unravel. She felt as though she had found her place, returning from being so far off track.

Of course, the salary offered by the bookstore was nowhere near what she had earned as a tutor. The pay wouldn’t be enough to cover both tuition fees and the cost of the medicine.

She hadn’t had high expectations, but the figure was lower than she thought, and she couldn’t help but feel a pang of disappointment.

But Liv quickly brushed aside her feelings of disappointment.

‘It can’t be helped for now.’

Who knew, maybe she’d end up liking the work. And if not, she could always find another job later.

Maybe it was actually better this way. If she was too busy with work, she wouldn’t have time to get lost in useless thoughts. Living like that, maybe she would eventually forget the luxurious comforts she had grown used to. She had to.

Then perhaps one day, she could think of the Marquis with a calm heart.

The excitement she felt earlier had settled down by the time she finished the interview and left the shop. The reality of her situation had set back in, and her sudden thoughts of the Marquis didn’t help either.

Her memories of the Marquis seemed to pop up so often, without warning. When she was talking to Corida, picking out goods at a store, even just walking down the street.

Even though she had left him, his presence seemed to loom larger than ever.

…To be honest, she couldn’t imagine herself forgetting him. Having had such a connection with him, even if briefly, would remain one of the most remarkable events of her life. Would she ever meet a man greater than him?

She thought she would be content if she could simply feel at peace when thinking of him.

Liv let out a deep sigh. She intended to return to Corida immediately, but if she went back with these feelings, she’d only cause more worry. She needed some time to sort out her emotions as she walked the streets.

So she wandered aimlessly through Adelinde’s streets, though she still kept an eye out for noticeboards. There were still no wanted posters of her.

After all, she had reserved the medicine using her real name.

‘At this point, maybe it’s really okay.’

Even the moment she wrote the name “Liv Rodaise” on the reservation list and handed over her ID, she couldn’t let her guard down. But now, two days after making the reservation, no one had come for her. Perhaps it truly was okay now.

If so, finding another job through the employment agency would be easier. Her greatest asset was, after all, her educational qualifications.

Yes, everything was finally falling into place. After picking up the medicine tomorrow, she should stop by the employment agency and ask for a second job in advance.

If she said that she graduated from Clemence, then perhaps…

Walking along a familiar path, Liv suddenly stopped. Across the street, she saw the apothecary.

And in front of the apothecary stood a black carriage.

 A black carriage wasn’t uncommon. There was no need to be startled.

…But had she ever seen such a pitch-black carriage in Adelinde since she arrived?

Liv felt like her breath was caught in her throat, as though someone was strangling her. Even as she told herself it couldn’t be, her legs moved slowly, taking steps backward.

Clutching the front of her cloak, Liv spun around. All thoughts about wages and work seemed trivial in an instant. Instead, the overwhelming thought that the Marquis might still be chasing her took over.

“Newspapers here! Newspapers!”

Liv, nearly running away from the apothecary, suddenly lifted her gaze. Seeing that no one seemed to be following her, she quickly took out a coin from her pocket.

“Give me one.”

She grabbed a thick newspaper, not looking back until she made it to the inn. Liv locked the door behind her and spread the newspaper on the table. Corida, startled, asked her something, but Liv couldn’t hear it.

Scanning the large headlines, Liv’s eyes stopped at one: “How Malte’s Pride Ended Up in a Shameful Mud Pit.”

The long article was filled with dramatic details—the story of Zighilt’s broken engagement, the sordid past, secret meetings with Eleonore, the corrupted Peace Pilgrimage, Cardinal Calliope’s fury…

It was so sensational that Liv struggled to understand it all. But one thing was clear.

Her assumption that there was a rumor of an affair between the Marquis and Lady Malte in Buerno had been completely misguided. In fact…

 

“Public humiliation is necessary to stop others from talking recklessly.”

 

He was keeping his word.

Come to think of it, he had always been that way.

The Marquis was a man who kept his word. He had the power to do so.

Which meant…

 

“I never let go of what I catch.”

 

Suddenly, she remembered his words from when he had held her in the dining room.

He said he’d never let go. As long as he wasn’t tired of her.

“Sister, sister?”

“Pack your things, Corida.”

“Huh?”

Swallowing her dry throat, Liv quietly closed the newspaper.

“We’re leaving on the first train at dawn.”

The Marquis knew how obsessively Liv prioritized Corida’s health. He would never imagine she would give up the new medicine she had already reserved.

If the Marquis had really sent someone after her, Liv assumed they’d be waiting near the apothecary. So she chose to give up the medicine and take the first train.

She briefly considered taking a carriage, but if someone was truly after them, it would be better to take the train to get as far away as possible. Once on the train, they’d be able to put some distance between them quickly.

Reacting this drastically to just seeing a black carriage and reading Lady Malte’s scandalous news might be excessive. But they could go to a distant town and return if it turned out to be an overreaction.

“Wait here for a moment. I’ll get the tickets.”

The early morning station was relatively quiet. Liv adjusted Corida’s hood once more and looked around. It was calm all around, and there wasn’t much of a line at the ticket booth.

It was easy to get tickets for the earliest train. Holding two tickets, Liv took a deep breath and turned around.

Everything would be fine.

Just think of it as taking a short trip to the nearby countryside.

“Now…!”

Forcing a smile, Liv opened her mouth but immediately closed it.

Corida was nowhere to be seen.

“Corida?”

Liv’s expression hardened. Just moments ago, Corida had been standing in the corner of the waiting room, but now she was gone.

With a panicked face, Liv looked to where Corida had been and scanned the surroundings.

It had only taken about ten minutes to buy the tickets. There was no reason for Corida to have moved away in that short time.

Moreover, it wasn’t far from the ticket booth. If someone had restrained Corida, there would have been commotion, and Liv surely would have heard it.

“Corida!”

Liv was about to take urgent steps to search for Corida when she felt a strong hand grab her arm, forcefully turning her around. The force caused her hood to come off partially.

She froze, her breath catching as she met the cold, icy eyes staring at her through her disheveled hair.

The man who stood before her was one she couldn’t forget—neither in her dreams nor in her waking hours. He was a man with a cold, beautiful face.

“In a hurry, aren’t we?”

A sarcastic voice flowed from his twisted lips. But what could she say in response? Liv found herself at a loss for words, her eyes dazed as she looked at him.

‘Why?’

She truly didn’t understand. She had hurried to escape precisely because she thought he might be chasing her…

Even so, she had assumed it would be his subordinates doing the chasing. Of course. The man could command others with a simple order.

There was no reason for him to be here in person.

Daaemon Dietrion. Why was this man here?

“No matter how urgent it is, you should at least pick up the medicine. It’s for your precious sister’s health.”

The moment he mentioned Corida, Liv, who had been frozen like ice, finally opened her mouth.

“You… you haven’t… Corida?”

“I’m not stupid enough to make the same mistake twice.”

Daaemon responded with a mocking tone, a smile tugging at his lips.

“It’s obvious whose safety to secure first in order to put a leash on you.”

It was an admission that Corida, who had vanished, was now in his grasp. Liv’s face twisted with anguish.

“She has nothing to do with this!”

“You’re in no position to raise your voice.”

His grip on her arm tightened. Daaemon pulled her closer, growling in a low, hardened voice, “You came quite far. I didn’t know you had this kind of skill, letting you wander around so freely.”

“Where’s Corida…”

“Silence.”

With a forceful tone, Daaemon cut off Liv’s words, taking a short breath before speaking each word deliberately, “Keep your mouth shut. Unless you want to show off that pretty body right here.”

Liv looked at Daaemon with a face that had gone completely pale. Standing close enough that their breaths could touch, his raw emotions were fully transmitted to her.

His blue eyes trembled, his lips were tightly pressed, and his jaw was clenched with tension. Though his face was more ruthless than ever, it wasn’t only due to anger.

More than that, there was anxiety, a sense of urgency.

His bloodshot eyes looked exhausted, as if he hadn’t slept for days. On closer inspection, his once smooth and elegant skin appeared rough, and his lips were dry, devoid of color.

But the most unusual thing was that he wasn’t hiding his emotions at all. There was none of the composure she had always known him for. It was hard to believe this was the same man who had always looked at her with either cold indifference or a mocking gaze.

While Liv was taken aback by his unexpected demeanor, Daaemon moved. She didn’t even have time to resist as she was dragged along.

A black carriage stood not far away.

Liv tried belatedly to plant her feet and resist, but Daaemon effortlessly lifted her and put her inside the carriage. She fell into it, scrambling to sit upright. Daaemon climbed in after her and pounded his fist on the small window leading to the driver’s seat. The carriage began to move immediately.

Though she knew it was dangerous to jump from a moving carriage, Liv’s eyes instinctively turned to the door. Her mind was racing.

Daaemon seemed to guess what she was thinking and pulled her arm, forcing her to sit beside him. His grip made it clear he had no intention of letting her go, and Liv glanced sideways at him.

His cold expression remained as he stared out the window silently, but at the same time, he seemed to be on edge, ready to react if she made any sudden move.

Liv opened her mouth, then closed it again, deciding against saying anything.

The carriage sped forward.

But she had no idea where they were headed.

 



 

The carriage didn’t travel far before stopping. Thankfully, it seemed they weren’t heading back to Buerno.

They had arrived at what appeared to be a mansion not far from the city of Adelinde. Once the carriage came to a stop, Daaemon opened the door and stepped out first, still holding Liv’s arm.

 Liv staggered as she stepped out of the carriage, glancing around. Among the unfamiliar faces, presumably Daaemon’ subordinates, she recognized Adolf and Roman.

Instinctively, Liv realized that these two were the ones guarding Corida. Especially Adolf—the only person with enough connection to have taken Corida from the station without causing a scene.

“Mr. Adolf!”

Adolf seemed ready to respond to Liv’s call, taking a step forward. However, there wasn’t time for a conversation. Daaemon had no hesitation in yanking Liv along, ignoring the looks from his subordinates. He kept his eyes forward, completely focused on moving.

His aura was so menacing that no one dared call out to him.

“Marquis, let go of me!”

Ignoring Liv’s protest, Daaemon spoke coldly to the staff inside the mansion.

“Leave.”

The servants who had been waiting at the entrance quickly moved outside. They moved so swiftly that the mansion emptied in an instant, and soon the main door closed with a firm bang. The only sound left echoing in the lobby was Liv’s unstable, ragged breathing.

Daaemon stood in the lobby, his back to Liv. Staring at his back, Liv slowly turned her gaze to her arm. Even though he had his back to her, his grip on her arm remained strong. If anything, it seemed even tighter, as if he were suppressing something within himself.

The air between them felt like a balloon about to burst, ready to explode at any moment.

Liv lowered her gaze. She had expected him to be angry at her runaway attempt, but she hadn’t anticipated that his anger would drive him all the way to Adelinde.

Had she underestimated his pride?

Now that she was caught, she had to face the consequences. She couldn’t even begin to imagine how his anger would manifest.

…Would he take his fury out on Corida?

A sudden fear gripped her, loosening her lips.

“The one who angered you is me, so take it out on me.”

The man, who had seemed like he would keep his back to her forever, turned slowly. Facing his furious blue eyes made Liv’s heart tremble, but she continued speaking.

“Please, leave Corida out of this…”

The moment Corida’s name escaped her lips, Daaemon’ expression twisted savagely. His already blazing gaze seemed to swallow flames whole.

His hand, which had been gripping her arm, moved to her neck in an instant. His large hand was wide enough to wrap around her throat. She could feel the leather-gloved fingers pressing against her neck.

It felt like she could be choked to death at any moment. Fear surged up her throat, and Liv tightly shut her eyes.

However, the suffocating pain she had braced for did not come. Instead, what sharply pricked her senses was the savage bite of a kiss.

“……!”

Her lips were bitten so roughly that the taste of blood filled her mouth. Daaemon’ tongue, seemingly aroused by the taste of blood, pushed into her mouth with no hesitation.

Caught off guard, Liv instinctively accepted the intrusion, but she belatedly mustered her strength to push against him. When she did, he merely shoved her backward.

She crashed into something behind her, and something fell to the floor with a clatter. She couldn’t even look down to see what it was—her back had slammed into a piece of furniture, and a sharp pain shot through her. Liv let out a pained moan, but even that was swallowed up by Daaemon.

His hot tongue delved deep into her throat, swallowing everything as though it would pierce through. The hand that had gripped her neck vanished, but Liv found herself even more breathless.

Liv turned her head this way and that, trying to break free from the kiss. Then, she bit down hard on the invading tongue. Daaemon reflexively jerked his head back.

Finally, there was a moment’s distance between their lips, and Liv gasped for breath.

But the reprieve was fleeting.

Rip!

With the sound of tearing fabric, cold air rushed against her chest. Liv tried to pull her clothes together, but more ripping sounds followed. She couldn’t even tell where the tears began, and her top quickly became a useless rag.

Her cloak had long since been cast to the floor and trampled under Daaemon’ boots.

Liv looked up at Daaemon with horror. His crimson-stained tongue licked his lips, and even with blood smeared across them, he still looked beautiful. Even in this situation, she couldn’t deny his beauty.

“What on earth…!”

“You said I should take it out on you.”

Daaemon’ hand, which had shredded her clothes, grabbed her chin, twisting her head to expose her neck. He tilted his head slightly and pressed his bloodied lips against her skin. The kisses trailed thickly from her ear down her neck.

“That’s exactly what I’m doing.”

“Ugh!”

His lips, which had feigned tenderness, quickly turned vicious. A sharp pain bloomed where he bit down.

His hand slipped under her shredded top, gripping her bare skin tightly—hard enough that Liv was sure there would be bruises.

“I’m giving you what you asked for.”

Daaemon bit her neck hard, then pushed her against the furniture once more.

Thud.

The piece of furniture shook under the impact.

“You certainly have a lot of complaints.”

Her lower garments were no better. With a flick of his hand, the button that held her waistband came undone, and her skirt fell helplessly to the floor. The presence between her legs was all too familiar.

Liv clenched her teeth and tried to push Daaemon’ chest away, but his large frame was like an immovable stone wall.

“If you did it, then you should be prepared to face the consequences.”

Daaemon found her struggling hands annoying and grabbed both of her wrists in one hand, lifting them above her head. Liv let out a weak moan, looking up at Daaemon.

When their eyes met, his red-stained lips twisted into a smirk.

“Liv.”

The name sounded as though it were drenched in blood.

If Daaemon had decided to have her, Liv had no way of stopping him.

It wasn’t just about the difference in their physical strength. More than that, the process of being with him had become ingrained in her body. His massive length pushed inside, pressing against her inner walls, easily claiming her. Her entire body heated up, flushed with arousal. Bit by bit, her sanity was eroded, replaced by an intoxicating heat that melted her mind.

She hadn’t failed to try escaping the mix of pain and pleasure. She clawed at his arms and chest, but it only seemed to spur him on more.

“Ugh, ugh!”

Every time Daaemon’ hips slammed against her, Liv let out an involuntary moan. She clung to the edge of the table, barely holding on.

The vase that had been on the table had long since shattered to pieces. With tears blurring her vision, Liv could see the floor littered with shards and fallen flowers.

There was no feeling left in her lower back. The sound of their bodies moving filled the space, punctuated by her moans. Every thrust scorched her insides as if branded by an iron rod.

“Ugh…”

The table beneath her shuddered violently, and Liv clung to the edge, gasping for air. Daaemon buried himself to the root, his thickness throbbing inside her as he released.

All she could do was lean over the table and take him, but her breath came in short, frantic bursts, as if she’d run a marathon. Leaning her sweat-drenched forehead against the table, Liv exhaled heavily. The intense pleasure lingered in her body, refusing to fade.

The time apart hadn’t mattered at all. Her body responded to him far too easily, and Daaemon, seemingly aware of her condition, continued to push her sensitive body without hesitation.

Liv blinked slowly, her eyelashes wet with tears, letting out a faint moan. The weight on her back was heavy, and she could feel Daaemon swelling once more inside her. He trailed kisses down her spine and shoulder blades before setting his teeth against her skin.

The bites were painful and stimulating at the same time. Liv tried to lift herself up, struggling against the weight on her back.

But Daaemon’ hand pressed firmly on her nape, keeping her pinned. Then, his hardness withdrew only to drive back inside with full force.

The movement was relentless, in and out, pushing to the very end each time.

If it continued, she really felt like her insides would tear.

 “Ah!”

The moan she had been trying to stifle burst out involuntarily. The pressure on her neck vanished, replaced by a rough hand grabbing her chin.

Daaemon twisted her face to the side and kissed her savagely, as if he wanted to devour her. The awkward position made it difficult to properly align their lips, but he relentlessly sucked and rubbed her skin.

Even at that moment, his lower body was repeatedly thrusting into her, unyielding. Each thrust pushed her back so much that her heels lifted off the floor, her thighs trembling. But Daaemon showed no mercy.

His lips, which had been obsessively kissing her, moved from her cheek to her ear and down the side of her neck. The sound of his breathing, audible from this close, tickled Liv’s ears.

His breathing was heavy with arousal.

In the past, Daaemon’ reactions had always made Liv’s heart pound whenever they were intimate, even making her feel a strange sense of satisfaction.

This man desired only her, losing control only before her.

It gave her a sense of superiority and hope that she could perhaps become closer to him. But how many times had she built up those feelings, only to have them shattered?

Even in her aroused state, resignation and helplessness resurfaced. Liv shook her head slightly, trying to dispel her feelings.

Did Daaemon take that as a sign of rejection?

The hand gripping her waist tightened, and his member withdrew from her, flipping her body around in an instant. When she managed to lift her heavy eyelids, she saw his face, flushed with desire.

Daaemon pulled her waist towards him as if to kiss her, but Liv turned her gaze down, struggling to avoid his lips.

“Ha.”

A cold sneer escaped Daaemon’ lips.

Their bodies were still burning, the air was thick and humid, and their breathing was unsteady. But Daaemon’ mocking laugh instantly brought a chill between them.

“Do you really think you can refuse me?”

Of course not. But her refusal carried no weight in this situation. Her reaction had no bearing on what would happen.

“No matter how I react, you’ll still take me until your anger subsides.”

Just as he had pinned her like an animal and taken her moments ago.

Daaemon’ understanding of her unspoken words was unclear. Liv couldn’t muster the courage to meet his intense gaze, so she fixed her eyes on the floor, which was strewn with broken items and resembled the state of her heart.

“No matter how you react?”

Daaemon’ murmur was barely audible, as if he were speaking to himself. Just from his tone, she could imagine his expression.

“Do you want to be treated like a whore that badly?”

Liv’s tightly pressed lips trembled.

“Despite the generosity I showed you, you stabbed me in the back so easily. Looks like this isn’t your first time acting like a whore.”

It would have been better to lose herself in pleasure, unable to think. Anything was better than being verbally torn apart. Liv bit her lower lip, trying to hold back her tears. Bowing her head deeply, Liv listened to his unfiltered insults.

“I heard that Eleonore brat helped you. Did you act the same way with him? He seemed like the type to give you his heart after one night.”

“I didn’t…”

“Looks like you found it easy. But if you’re a whore, you should at least cater to your clients’ preferences.”

Liv struggled to breathe as Daaemon’ words continued.

“Or do I need to pay extra for you to swallow that useless pride of yours?”

Her jaw trembled under the tension. She had been with him countless times, but he had never been so cruel and cold towards her. Even in the most humiliating moments, though their relationship had been hard, she had never felt this trampled.

The moment she chose to flee from Daaemon on her own, she had forfeited even the minimal respect he had once shown her.

Hopelessness pooled beneath her feet. Even the private emotions she had hidden beneath resignation and avoidance were forcibly dragged out and shattered.

“You talked so much before, but it seems you’re too guilty to speak now.”

Daaemon grabbed her chin, lifting her face. He was about to continue with his cold, frozen expression when their eyes met, and he fell silent.

Her face was flushed and wet, an utter mess. Daaemon could easily tell that it wasn’t just the aftermath of their earlier heated encounter.

Liv had no energy left to hide her emotions. The shattered fragments of her feelings tore her apart from the inside, and just enduring that pain was overwhelming.

“You…”

Daaemon’ grip slackened slightly. His thumb brushed across her damp cheek.

“I don’t understand why you defy me when you’re so scared.”

He seemed genuinely confused, as if he couldn’t fathom her actions.

“Something you can’t even handle.”

It sounded like he was reprimanding her for her foolishness. Liv let out a weary sigh.

This man had the power to completely upend and destroy her life. She was sure that, eventually, she would willingly kneel before him and offer up everything she had. She was already heading in that direction.

She couldn’t win, so she ran. Avoidance was the only option. She had to run far away and hope that time would solve everything.

Had she made the wrong choice? Should she have stayed as his mistress, content with being one of his prized possessions?

Why, even in this state, was she so unwilling to accept that life?

“Don’t put a price on me.”

Her voice came out faintly between trembling lips. Damp and weak, her words were barely audible unless one listened carefully.

“I don’t need it.”

If there was no escape, then what could she do now?

“Besides, you wouldn’t be able to pay that price.”

His blue eyes darkened. Yet he didn’t respond with another cutting remark. Instead, he leaned down again. This time, she didn’t avoid his lips.

A whore would never consider unseen emotions as something of value. They would never understand.

Even if it was foolish, Liv couldn’t bring herself to beg Daaemon for love.

 



 

She had lost track of time. Daaemon took her whenever he wanted, making it difficult to keep up with the passing days.

They were the only two in the mansion, and without hesitation, they did it anywhere they pleased. When the parlor’s floor got dirty, they moved to the next room. When that room became a mess, they moved to another. Daaemon never seemed to tire.

Eventually, Liv, unable to bear it any longer, tried to push him away irritably, but it was futile. Even when she collapsed in exhaustion and accidentally hit him in her sleep, it didn’t deter him. When he continued thrusting even after she slapped him, she thought he looked truly mad.

But he was only human, and no one could stay awake indefinitely for days on end.

Liv, who lay limp like someone who had been thoroughly beaten, blinked slowly. Daaemon, who had clung to her all day, had finally fallen asleep, his breathing even.

Liv glanced at his sleeping form before quietly sitting up.

She removed his arm from her waist and slipped off the bed, her legs trembling. After barely taking a few steps, she leaned on a nearby chair, letting out a long sigh.

At first, she had feared the unknown, not knowing what would happen after their reunion. But now, her body felt too drained to experience fear. All she had eaten for the past several days was water, and the hunger gnawed at her. If she didn’t eat soon, she was sure she would collapse.

Despite clinging to each other like animals, they hardly exchanged any meaningful conversation, as if words were unnecessary, as if they were incapable of speaking.

As if all they could do was moan and pant.

After standing by the chair for a long time, Liv finally looked around. She wasn’t sure how long they had been in this bedroom, but like the other rooms, there wasn’t a single intact item left. A mantel clock, long since stopped, lay on the floor near the door.

Liv managed to find a robe to cover herself and cautiously stepped forward.

She carefully avoided the sharp shards and opened the door, revealing the silent corridor. It was just as chaotic as the rest of the mansion.

Liv forced her creaking body to move, wandering the disordered mansion. It soon became clear that the entire mansion had been sealed off. The few windows were all tightly fastened, and the front door seemed to be in a similar state.

Wandering in search of the kitchen, she found herself in the lobby—the very spot where she and Daaemon had first intertwined.

Scattered across the thick carpet were pieces of cloth, stripped of their original form.

Among the torn clothes, Liv spotted a bulge. She struggled towards it and reached out.

It was a small handgun. She had used it only once to escape Jacques, and there were still bullets left in it.

Standing there, pale, Liv handled the handgun. Was it because she had held onto it as her only lifeline for so long? The feel of the gun in her hand was oddly familiar.

“You might as well give up on escaping.”

Liv’s head snapped up at the sound behind her.

Daaemon stood there, watching her, completely nude. His eyes traveled to the gun in her hand. Unconsciously, Liv tightened her grip.

“If you’re really looking for a way.”

Daaemon didn’t seem threatened in the least as he approached her. He even went as far as to take her hand, pulling the gun towards him.

Just like he had when he taught her how to shoot.

“Shoot.”

Liv looked into his unsteady gaze.

“There’s only one way for you to escape—kill me.”

Unlike before, the gun was loaded. Daaemon seemed well aware of that, yet he pressed the barrel firmly against his stomach without hesitation.

If anything, he prevented her from pulling away, keeping her hand tightly in place.

 The muzzle of the gun pressed hard against his scar-covered abdomen. Liv, her expression pale, parted her trembling lips.

“Why…”

His rage was strange.

Chasing after his runaway mistress all the way to distant Adelinde was already beyond her comprehension. Driving her to the point of exhaustion, denying her proper rest for days—fine, he had always desired her body, so that much made sense.

But offering his own body to the muzzle of a gun, such an extreme act, was simply beyond reason.

“What do you want?”

“You.”

The response came quickly, as if in answer to a question posed only to herself.

“You, alive.”

Liv, staring blankly at the muzzle, slowly raised her gaze. Daaemon’ face was cold and hardened, reflecting her bewilderment.

Seeing her expression, Daaemon twisted his lips. “So weak. To think you actually managed to bury a bullet in that bastard’s leg with a temperament like yours.”

“…Who?”

“Your old lover.”

The words weren’t difficult to understand, yet she couldn’t make sense of them.

Old lover?

After some time, Liv finally recalled the person she had shot recently. She had only shot a human being once, so naturally, Daaemon must have been referring to Jacques Karin.

But what puzzled her was why he was describing Jacques as her old lover.

“Someone said that Marquis Dietrion’s mistress ran away because she missed her old flame.”

“An old lover? I never had one.”

“Of course not, since you’re far too valuable for someone like me to afford. No one could ever match your standards.”

Liv’s expression hardened at his cutting sarcasm. She moistened her lips with her tongue before speaking in a weary voice, “If your anger subsides, will you let me go?”

“I’ve already told you how to escape.”

Daaemon still had a firm grip on her hand.

“Shoot.”

Liv bit her lip hard. An incomprehensible surge of anger welled up inside her.

“Do you really think I could do that?”

“Can’t you?”

Daaemon genuinely seemed confused.

“You managed to do it to Jacques Karin. You could do the same now.”

“Do you think you and he are the same?”

“How are we different? You ran away from me so easily.”

Liv could hear the resentment and accusation in his words. It was more than the anger of someone losing their possession—it was almost like the fury of someone who had been abandoned.

Abandoned. Not once while running away had Liv ever thought of it as abandoning him. He wasn’t someone she could abandon. If anything, it would have been he who abandoned her.

She was angry. It was Daaemon who had defined their relationship, wielding it however he pleased. And yet here he was, acting like he was the one who had been wronged, as if she had somehow controlled him.

“If you were anything like him, I wouldn’t have run away.”

Her voice carried resentment.

“If I’d felt nothing for you, like I did for him, I could have shot you just as easily.”

Smack!

Liv forcefully shook off his hand, tossing the gun she had been holding to the floor. Gritting her teeth, she looked up at Daaemon.

“I ran because I couldn’t handle it.”

He was the one who hurt her, so how could he resent her as if he were the one wounded?

The anger she felt rose naturally.

“You’re the one who told me to know my place, Marquis.”

That’s why she had tried to know her place and give up her desires. She had to leave him because she couldn’t do it while staying by his side.

Liv’s emotions spilled out, and her breathing quickened. Always having suppressed her feelings made expressing even this small amount of emotion difficult and overwhelming.

Trying to regain control of herself, she took a deep breath, but Daaemon caught her chin, forcing her to meet his gaze.

“I told you to get angry.”

“How could I…”

“I’ll accept it.”

She bit her trembling lip hard, but the pain did nothing to help her control her emotions. Her vision blurred, and tears rolled down her cheeks.

“Do you…”

Do you like me? Or… do you love me?

Once, those questions had come easily to her lips, but now they felt unbearably heavy, impossible to voice. Unlike before, when she had no expectations, she now longed for a particular answer.

Once again, Daaemon was by her side at the moment she needed him most.

At the moment she wanted to resent him.

 



 

How could so much water come from a person’s body?

Liv cried until she eventually fainted. Thierry, who had been waiting outside the mansion, examined her and explained that exhaustion from the journey, combined with not eating properly for days, had severely weakened her health.

“Is it serious?”

“She just needs plenty of rest and good food. It doesn’t seem like she lived well during her travels.”

“…She barely slept, and she hardly ate.”

Corida responded in a sullen voice, glancing at Liv. She looked at her sister, lying pale in bed, and then slowly turned to Daaemon.

It was practically Corida’s first time confronting Daaemon face-to-face. She had seen him from afar and read plenty of reports about him, but that was all.

Corida flinched when she met Daaemon’ cold eyes, yet she seemed to have something to say, her lips moving hesitantly. She appeared to struggle for a long time before finally looking at Daaemon with a determined expression.

“My sister is worth much more.”

She was trying to sound threatening, but Daaemon found it more pathetic than anything else.

When Daaemon didn’t respond and simply stared at her, Corida spoke again in a firm voice.

“I’m always on my sister’s side.”

“Isn’t that only natural?”

Daaemon frowned, his voice icy.

“She raised you, dedicating her entire life. It would be a shame if you didn’t recognize that.”

“I would never forget her sacrifice, but even if I did, how would that concern you, Marquis? This is between me and my sister.”

Clearly, she was Liv Rodaise’s sister.

Daaemon’ irritation flared at Corida’s insolent response. Thierry, sensing the rising tension, gently pulled Corida away.

“Let’s let the patient rest.”

At least Thierry was perceptive enough.

As Daaemon was thinking this, Corida stubbornly retorted, “Just me? What about him?”

“The Marquis will leave on his own.”

“Why should I leave and trust that he’ll leave too?”

Corida’s eyes widened. It seemed that while she had willingly surrendered when confronted by Adolf, she still didn’t trust Daaemon at all.

It made sense. Corida had been anxiously waiting outside while Daaemon and Liv stayed secluded in the mansion for days. When the doors finally opened, Liv had fainted, and the mansion was a wreck. Of course, Corida was shocked.

Not that understanding her feelings meant Daaemon intended to treat her kindly.

“I suppose your sister didn’t tell you who kept you alive?”

Daaemon asked coldly, and Corida visibly tensed. She couldn’t deny that she owed her life to his help.

With her mouth tightly shut, Corida eventually muttered in a shaky voice, “I’ll repay it.”

The distrust and wariness in her eyes had softened slightly, but her determination remained.

“I’ll succeed and repay everything, so don’t use me to threaten my sister!”

“Take her out.”

“If you make my sister suffer, I won’t stand by!”

Thierry let out a pained sigh as he pulled Corida away. Her loud voice made Daaemon’ head throb, and he clicked his tongue in annoyance. Once the door closed behind Corida and Thierry, the room finally quieted down.

Daaemon habitually reached for a cigar but then paused.

Liv lay quietly asleep on the bed. She had always moved quietly, but now even her breathing was so faint that he had to listen closely to hear it.

He used to like how she moved with almost no presence, but now the silence bothered him. He wanted her to wake up soon, to cry or shout or do anything to break the stillness.

 

“What do you want?”

 

He had answered that he wanted her, but that answer felt insufficient. This desire was different from the other items he had hoarded in the basement.

 

“You’re the one who told me to know my place, Marquis.”

 

Philip had been right. His treatment of her was already far beyond what one should show a mistress. It was even more inappropriate than how one might treat a prostitute.

Daaemon ran his fingers over Liv’s gaunt cheek and bit his tongue.

He wanted to know.

 

“If you were anything like him, I wouldn’t have run away.”

 

What made him different from Jacques Karin?

 

“If I’d felt nothing for you, like I did for him, I could have shot you just as easily.”

 

What was the name of the emotion she felt?

If he could hear that answer, maybe he could finally name his own emotions too.

 Warmth was felt. Without needing to open her eyes, she could tell someone was lying next to her.

It was a familiar scent of skin. After days of being constantly close to each other, she knew exactly who it was.

Daaemon was lying next to her.

Perhaps it was because her mind was still groggy, but instead of being overwhelmed by complicated thoughts, the first thing she felt was a sense of wonder. The last situation with him hadn’t exactly ended on a pleasant note, had it?

As Liv replayed their last conversation, she moved to get up from the bed. However, before she could fully lift her upper body, she was pulled back down by a strong arm around her waist.

“Where do you think you’re going again?”

She had thought he was asleep, but his blue eyes were wide open, staring at her without a trace of drowsiness. Had he not been sleeping, just lying beside her, keeping watch?

Liv turned her head away, unable to meet his unreadable gaze any longer.

“We can’t stay like this forever.”

“And why not?”

“You’ve held me plenty. There’s no need to lie around any longer.”

The moment Liv finished speaking, Daaemon’ arm tightened around her waist. His voice, which had been loose and indifferent, hardened immediately.

“If I’d had enough of you, you’d still be unconscious.”

“Should I thank you for your mercy, then?”

Her sarcastic response slipped out without thought. It seemed the anger she had felt just before fainting still lingered. Perhaps it was better to keep her mouth shut.

Liv had always tried to avoid resentment and anger. It was far more productive to tackle the immediate situation than to get caught up in emotions and waste time.

Even now, it was the same. Rather than venting her grievances to Daaemon yet again, it was easier to accept reality and figure out what to do next. She had already confirmed, countless times, that they had fundamentally different perspectives. Rehashing the same conversations would only be a waste of time.

“If you intend to run, you should at least take better care of your body.”

But Daaemon didn’t seem inclined to end the conversation.

“You’re in terrible shape; they said you need plenty of rest.”

“I’ve rested.”

“If you go out looking like this, your sister’s reaction should be amusing.”

At that, Liv paused. Even without seeing herself, she knew she must look a mess.

Not just from the exhausting days of running, but from the marks Daaemon had left all over her body during their days together. The blanket might cover her, but it certainly couldn’t hide her neck.

Liv glanced at herself with a grim expression and asked in a quiet voice, “Did Corida see me?”

Daaemon let out a cold laugh, as if he knew exactly what her worry was.

“You must think your sister is a fool.”

Liv suppressed a sigh and lowered her gaze. She had no idea what to say to Corida. No matter how she tried to frame it, there was no way she could pretend they had nothing to do with each other.

It was at least fortunate that Corida was close by and safe. Judging by Daaemon’ demeanor, it seemed Corida hadn’t been harmed.

Even when Daaemon had caught her again, Liv hadn’t seriously believed he would hurt Corida. Perhaps it was because he had been the one to care for Corida’s health… regardless of his reasons.

Objectively, Daaemon had always been generous, even from the beginning. Maybe it was because of his kindness that Liv had foolishly let her emotions grow.

Thinking that made her feel sad again. In the end, the only trouble in this relationship seemed to be her. If she had just been content with her role as his mistress, none of this would have happened.

Maybe, if she completely humbled herself now, she could reclaim that place. If she promised to never be presumptuous again, if she begged for the fleeting affection that could vanish tomorrow, she might be able to live as his mistress again.

But living like that… she felt like she would wither away. It wasn’t the idea of begging him that frightened her; it was the thought of trying to suppress her own growing feelings again.

“I’m not running, so let me go.”

There was no point in agonizing over a question with no answer. Liv decided to tackle the immediate problem first.

“For what?”

“If Corida is here, then Mr. Adolf must be with her.”

“Adolf?”

Daaemon raised an eyebrow. Liv nodded wearily, trying to push his arm off her waist.

“I need my medicine.”

“What medicine?”

“Birth control pills. Adolf always prepares them, doesn’t he?”

He was always thorough. Surely, when the mansion doors locked, he had an idea of what would happen inside.

Would it still be effective if she took it now? Even if it wasn’t certain, it was better than not taking it at all.

The pills she had previously received were all left behind in Buerno. She had run away determined never to see Daaemon again, thinking she wouldn’t need them. Even if she got caught, she hadn’t expected things to end up like this.

Daaemon was silent for a moment after Liv’s explanation. Then he spoke in a cold voice, “Forget it.”

“I have no strength left to run, so don’t worry…”

“I mean you won’t need it.”

Liv stiffened and looked back at Daaemon. His lips held a faint, crooked smile.

“If you get pregnant, you won’t even think about running. It’s not a bad plan.”

Liv couldn’t believe her ears.

“What are you saying…?”

“I’m saying I have no intention of giving you those pills again.”

The arm around her waist loosened slightly, but it wasn’t to let her go. His fingers moved deliberately over her skin, clearly carrying a different intention.

Liv, shocked, tried to push his hand away. Of course, it was impossible.

“Marquis!”

“I told you how to escape.”

Before she knew it, Liv found herself beneath Daaemon. He looked down at her, shadows darkening his face, but there was no trace of playfulness in his eyes.

It wasn’t even meant as an insult.

A child? Was this man out of his mind?

“And you said you couldn’t do it. So you’re staying by my side, and in that case, what’s the big deal if you end up carrying my child?”

“Why would you…! Wait!”

Liv grabbed his hand desperately. His words weren’t an empty threat. Lately, he seemed unhinged, and she felt like he would keep pursuing her until she did get pregnant.

But the hand that had moved without hesitation suddenly paused. Daaemon’ annoyed gaze trailed down her body, from her neck to her breasts, then lower to her flat stomach.

Realizing he was scanning her body, Liv’s breathing grew uneasy. Her chest rose and fell with each deep breath, her ribs jutting out beneath her skin.

“Tsk.”

Daaemon clicked his tongue and got up. The air, which had been hot and oppressive just moments earlier, cooled in an instant.

“Before anything else, we need to get that body of yours back to normal. Let’s start with a meal.”

She had no intention of getting pregnant like this, not even a sliver of desire. Her body was already in its normal state—just a bit… fatigued.

She swallowed back a retort, knowing that arguing would only provoke him further. Honestly, she was more interested in dealing with her immediate hunger than picking a fight with Daaemon.

Daaemon, who had hastily pulled on some clothes someone had left, glanced back at her. Rather than leaving the room as she expected, he stood by the door, waiting.

His gaze felt like surveillance, making Liv uncomfortable. She quietly turned away from him, grabbing her own clothing.

“You can go ahead.”

“How do I know what you’ll do if I take my eyes off you?”

“In this situation, what could I possibly do?”

“That’s exactly why I need to keep an eye on you.”

She had just woken from fainting not long ago, and Corida was still being held as leverage. Did he really think she would try to run?

If he thought rationally for even a moment, he would know she couldn’t. Did he just want to taunt her about her past escape?

Liv stared at Daaemon, wondering if that was his intention. When she stayed silent, the suspicion in his eyes only grew.

The cold, guarded expression was the same as always, yet something about him was different. He didn’t seem as confident, as if he didn’t have everything under control like he used to. He was behaving in an unexpectedly irrational way.

“You won’t get away with any tricks.”

Even his threats sounded uncharacteristically desperate.

Come to think of it, he had been this way ever since they reunited.

A strange, indescribable feeling stirred inside her. Liv hesitated, her lips parting slightly, but then she silently put on her clothes. Daaemon waited until she was fully dressed before finally leading her to the dining room, keeping her by his side the whole time.

Even on the way to the dining room, Daaemon didn’t let go of her hand.

 After the meal, Liv was finally able to see Corida again. The reunion took place in the mansion’s drawing room, right in front of Daaemon. By this point, Liv had stopped expecting that Daaemon would leave them alone for a comfortable conversation between sisters.

Even as she waited for the drawing room door to open, Liv couldn’t hide her nervousness. She wondered how Corida had fared over the past few days and struggled with how she would explain the current situation.

Finally, the door opened, and Corida appeared. As soon as Liv, who had been sitting on the sofa, jumped to her feet, Corida called out joyfully.

“Sister!”

“Corida!”

Corida looked much healthier than Liv had expected, considering their separation over the past few days.

Not that Liv had wished for her sister’s condition to be worse—she was simply surprised because Corida looked so much healthier than the last time she saw her.

Before she knew it, Corida rushed over and hugged her tightly. The arms embracing Liv’s body trembled slightly.

“Are you alright?”

It felt strange to be on the receiving end of the question she usually asked Corida.

Corida had always been the one who needed her care, the one she had to look after so carefully.

“Yes, I’m fine. But where were you?”

“I was with Uncle Adolf and Dr. Thierry. Dr. Thierry took care of my health, and I took my medicine while waiting for you. But Sister, have you eaten? Why are you so thin?”

Corida, who had her head buried in Liv’s shoulder, suddenly lifted her head and began examining Liv closely. Then, in a low voice, she muttered, “Did that man not feed you?”

The fierce look in Corida’s eyes was unmistakable. Liv, taken aback, stammered a response.

“…That man?”

“The man with the pretty face!”

Corida confidently pointed to someone. At the other end of her gesture stood Daaemon, who was watching them from a distance. Thankfully, he wasn’t close enough to hear their conversation. Not that she thought he’d be upset by Corida’s words—at this point, he hardly seemed to mind insults.

Still, calling him “that man”…

Adolf was “Uncle,” but Daaemon was “that man”?

Considering Corida’s age, she supposed it made sense for her to call both men “uncle,” but…

“You haven’t said that in front of Mr. Adolf or Dr. Gertrude, have you?”

“I’ve said it plenty of times.”

Instinctively, Liv glanced at Daaemon. Unsurprisingly, he appeared oblivious to the conversation, though he did frown slightly at the atmosphere between the sisters.

Feeling somewhat embarrassed, Liv turned away from him and wrapped her arm around Corida’s shoulders, speaking softly, “Corida, they serve the Marquis.”

“But even they agree that the pretty-faced man has a terrible personality.”

Well, that much was true…

Liv’s lips moved wordlessly as she decided not to prolong the conversation. She figured if Adolf or Thierry hadn’t warned her, then it wasn’t worth worrying about.

People spoke poorly of royals behind their backs, after all. It wasn’t surprising that even loyal subordinates would feel frustrated at times. Considering that Adolf and Thierry had followed Daaemon all the way to Adelinde to chase her down, it was no wonder they might sympathize with Corida’s grievances.

…They must have struggled to the point where even they found comfort in complaining.

“Well, as long as they didn’t treat you badly, I’m relieved.”

“But it seems like that man treated you badly, didn’t he?”

Corida murmured with a sullen voice, glaring at Daaemon. Liv couldn’t help but glance at him too. Feeling their gazes, Daaemon frowned even more deeply. If they kept it up, he might start thinking they were plotting another escape and separate them again.

Clearing her throat, Liv quickly looked away, patting Corida’s shoulder to change the subject.

“More importantly, Corida…”

It didn’t seem like Daaemon was going to let her go easily. She wasn’t sure whether it was due to the pent-up desire from the past few days, the accumulated rage from chasing her all the way here, or some other unknown emotion.

Whatever the reason, if she said she wanted to leave the mansion now, she had a feeling he’d drag her right back to the bedroom. For now, she would have to wait until those strange emotions in Daaemon subsided.

She still had no idea how to explain all this to Corida, but she couldn’t let her sister remain completely in the dark either.

‘He said if I wanted to escape, I should shoot him, but that’s impossible.’

If Daaemon truly thought Liv could shoot him, then he still didn’t understand why she had run away.

“Um… the Marquis and I have a bit of a disagreement. It might take some time for us to come to an understanding. I want to be with you soon, but…”

“Sister.”

As Liv spoke cautiously, Corida interrupted her in a firm voice.

Seeing her sister’s puzzled expression, Corida hesitated for a moment before taking a deep breath and continuing in a calm tone, “Uncle Adolf looked into enrollment at the Adelinde girls’ school.”

Liv’s face instantly changed as she listened to Corida’s words.

“That man again…!”

“I asked him.”

Liv, who had begun to raise her voice, paused at Corida’s response. Taking advantage of the moment, Corida spoke quickly.

“Dr. Thierry said that, considering how well my body endured the stressful journey, I’ve really improved a lot.”

Corida’s words were tense, but they didn’t seem impulsive. Standing with her hands clasped, Corida looked at Liv seriously.

“Sister, I’m tired of running away. I don’t want to do it anymore.”

Liv’s expression wavered. As she listened to Corida, she found herself at a loss for words.

“We’re not running away.”

“It’s not just about avoiding escape…”

Corida shook her head in frustration and added, “I don’t want to be an excuse for you, Sister.”

“Corida!”

“If you really think I’m not a burden, then you need to understand the pressure I’m feeling too.”

Liv opened her mouth to protest, but Corida quickly continued, “Take me out of your life. From now on, I want you to do what you want.”

Corida spoke without hesitation, as if she had been waiting a long time to say this.

Seeing her sister staring at her blankly, Corida smiled bitterly. It seemed she had already anticipated Liv’s reaction and wasn’t surprised.

“Don’t run away because of me, and don’t stay because of me.”

Corida glanced towards Daaemon. “Honestly, when you were unconscious, I confronted that man once. I don’t think he’s going to kill me.”

Liv frowned deeply at those words. “Don’t say something so scary!”

“Think about it. If he hurt me, you’d hate him forever, wouldn’t you? I think that’s why he won’t lay a hand on me.”

Corida lifted her calm gaze to meet Liv’s. And in that moment, Liv realized just how much her younger sister had grown.

The large cage Liv had created to protect her sister was now far too small.

“Corida…”

“So I’ll be fine, Sister.”

To soar, one must know how to flap their wings.

“Do what you want.”

What Corida needed wasn’t a comfortable cage, but the world beyond its bars, where she could fully spread her wings.

The same was true for Liv.

 



 

As it turned out, the mansion wasn’t just one building.

If the place where Liv and Daaemon were staying was the main building, there were also several annexes and staff quarters behind it. Corida, Daaemon’ subordinates, and the staff stayed in those areas.

Once the people who had been on standby nearby returned to the annex, only Daaemon and Liv were left in the main building again. Contrary to Liv’s expectations, Daaemon didn’t immediately drag her back to the bedroom after the mansion emptied. As a result, Liv had time to herself to reflect.

However, this wasn’t a welcome opportunity for Liv. She would have preferred rolling around with Daaemon in bed to getting lost in unnecessary emotions.

“It seems the conversation didn’t go well.”

Sitting idly by the window facing the annex, lost in her thoughts, Liv looked over her shoulder. She had thought Daaemon would treat her like a decorative flower for the entire day, but since he was now talking to her, it seemed that wasn’t the case.

Daaemon perched on the armrest of a nearby sofa, holding a cigar. As Liv stared at the flickering red tip of the cigar, she suddenly spoke.

“Perhaps you again…”

“I didn’t give any orders.”

As if he had expected what Liv would say, Daaemon cut her off firmly. Then, frowning, he added, “From what I saw briefly, your sister resembles you.”

 Despite the hesitant tone, there was no sign of hostility or anger directed at Corida. Daaemon, glancing briefly at Liv’s downcast face, added an explanation amid the smoke.

“It means she’s not foolish.”

At that moment, Liv recalled Corida’s words. It seemed Daaemon wasn’t harming Corida for fear of upsetting Liv.

But Liv knew Daaemon wasn’t the type to worry about others’ opinions. Especially not to the point of sparing someone’s family out of fear of resentment. It seemed more plausible that he had some other reason. So, Corida’s words seemed more like an extension of the romantic fantasies she often indulged in.

Still, it was amusing how Daaemon’ begrudging compliment sounded like proof of Corida’s assertion.

“You’re right.”

Liv nodded calmly, and Daaemon tilted his head at an angle.

“Shouldn’t you be happy?”

“I am.”

Truthfully, it was a strange feeling—not purely joyful. Realizing that her actions, which she believed were protecting Corida, had actually confined her sister was unsettling. Unlike Corida, who was already contemplating her future and making her own decisions, Liv felt lost without her sister.

Corida had told Liv to do whatever she wanted.

It was an unexpected key, handed to her suddenly. A key to the cage Liv had kept herself in for so long, just as Corida had.

Corida’s treatment, her future, the responsibility of supporting her sister…

A life without those burdens. She had vaguely thought such a day would come, but now that it had, she felt lost, as if darkness had fallen before her.

Feeling inexplicably unsettled, Liv parted her lips, changing the subject entirely.

“When are you planning to return to Buerno?”

It didn’t sound particularly unnatural, but Daaemon frowned at her question.

“Don’t get your hopes up. I’m not going alone.”

It seemed Daaemon thought Liv was ready to run away at any opportunity. In this situation, even if she tried to escape, she wouldn’t make it ten steps beyond the mansion before his men would emerge from all directions.

Imagining the scene made her smile wryly.

“If I go back to being obedient like before, would you quickly tire of me?”

“Tire of you?”

Daaemon’ expression looked bewildered, as if he couldn’t remember ever saying such a thing.

“You said you’d let me go if you got tired of me.”

“If I was going to tire of you, I wouldn’t have come all the way here,” Daaemon spoke without the slightest hint of hesitation.

Liv tilted her head, muttering, “Are you telling me to go back to pleasing you, to make sure you never tire of me?”

“Do you think you can do that?”

Daaemon, who had placed his half-burned cigar in an ashtray, sneered at her.

“Don’t bother pretending to be capable of what you can’t do.”

Just as she had tried to understand him, it seemed he had figured her out as well. Liv let out a tired smile.

He was right—she couldn’t do it. Still, a part of her wanted to put on a brave face.

“How can you be so sure? I managed to deceive you and make it all the way to Adelinde. How hard could it be to go back to the way things were?”

“If you could, you wouldn’t have run away. You said it yourself—you ran because you couldn’t handle it.”

Liv pressed her lips together tightly.

Daaemon, staring intently at her, spoke in a low voice, “…You said I was different from Jacques Karin.”

It was a sudden shift in topic. Liv’s lashes fluttered as she looked down.

“What’s different about me that you couldn’t bring yourself to shoot me?”

It was a question with an unclear motive.

Liv looked at Daaemon, feeling his intense gaze on her, as if he was trying to discern something.

But she had no idea what he wanted to know. And even if she did answer, she wasn’t sure what meaning it would have for him.

“I don’t think it matters.”

To him, it was probably just a pointless emotion.

“As I said, I don’t have the strength to run away anymore. You may not believe me, but… don’t worry.”

It seemed he needed some certainty that she wouldn’t run away again. After thinking it over, she couldn’t think of any other reason.

Liv shrugged lightly and turned her gaze back to the annex beyond the window. She still felt Daaemon’ gaze on her from behind, but he didn’t ask her anything more.

 



 

Had it been just over ten days since they reunited?

Daaemon had firmly believed that once he found Liv, most of his problems would be resolved. After all, the troubles he faced had begun when Liv deceived him and ran away. It made sense that resolving the cause would resolve the consequences.

But unfortunately, Daaemon was still plagued by insomnia. Before, he at least tried to sleep by taking medication. Now, he didn’t take anything, not even alcohol. He feared that if he fell asleep, he might wake to find Liv gone again.

It was absurd—he couldn’t sleep when she was gone, and now he couldn’t sleep even after getting her back because he feared she might run again. He knew well enough that his anxious thoughts were irrational.

The mansion was built in a secluded area far from the city, making escape impossible without using a carriage or horse, both of which were kept in the annex, guarded by his men. Reaching the annex without being spotted was out of the question.

Even if she tried to escape on foot, she wouldn’t make it beyond the mansion’s entrance. The first thing Daaemon did after buying the mansion was set up layers of guards around it. Liv wouldn’t get more than ten steps from the mansion before being caught.

More importantly, Adolf and Thierry were with Corida all day, and there was no way Liv could sneak her sister out unnoticed.

If, for some reason, she decided to run away alone because she couldn’t take it anymore… her weakened condition would also prevent her from getting far.

No matter how he analyzed it, the conclusion was always the same.

Liv wouldn’t escape.

Yet, despite coming to this conclusion dozens of times, Daaemon lay awake every night. Even if he drifted into a light sleep from exhaustion, the slightest movement from her would wake him.

Ever since Liv had once left him sleeping to go down to the lobby, his alertness had only heightened. The only improvement was that, with her in his sight, the itching anxiety that had tormented him had finally subsided.

“Isn’t it time you returned to Buerno?”

Daaemon frowned at Liv’s question. Since their reunion, she had often made remarks that seemed to irritate him.

“I thought I already answered that.”

“Mr. Adolf seems to be struggling.”

Liv had insisted on meeting Adolf to get contraceptives, and when they finally did meet, it seemed she had also discussed unnecessary topics.

From Adolf’s perspective, it must have been frustrating to have his master drop everything to stay cooped up in the mansion, but Daaemon found it all a nuisance. In his current mental state, simply keeping an eye on Liv was exhausting.

Unable to explain his state in detail, Daaemon responded indifferently, “That’s his problem.”

Daaemon thought that if he kept Liv close for a while, his anxiety would eventually subside. It was a vague hope, but he had no other solution. His body wasn’t in good condition either—it wasn’t just his mental state that had deteriorated. Ever since Liv disappeared, his health had worsened day by day, and the arduous journey from Buerno to Adelinde had only made things worse.

Even if Adolf urged him, he couldn’t return to Buerno immediately in his current state. And taking Liv back with him was also risky—bringing her to the train station could give her an opportunity to slip away, leading to yet another pursuit.

“It doesn’t seem like you’re comfortable here either.”

“Not really.”

“…You haven’t been sleeping, have you?”

Liv placed a familiar medicine bottle on the table. It was the sleeping pills he used to take.

“Mr. Adolf asked me to check if the medication had been used. But it looks untouched.”

Since there were no servants in the main building, Adolf must have asked Liv to check directly. Daaemon clicked his tongue softly.

“People are meant to sleep without medicine.”

He had tried not to show his poor health in front of Liv, suspecting that she might find hope in escaping if she knew how weakened he was.

But Liv had always been perceptive.

“We share a bed. Did you really think I wouldn’t notice?”

If Daaemon spent all day watching Liv, that also meant she spent all day watching him. After a week, she could easily notice his sleeplessness.

“You once said you couldn’t sleep without the pills.”

“They don’t work anymore.”

“Should I ask Mr. Adolf to get you stronger ones?”

Why was she so insistent on getting him to sleep? He couldn’t come up with any reassuring answer.

Unease quickly spread in Daaemon’ mind.

 “What are you planning to do once I fall asleep?”

Liv had heard similar accusations from Daaemon countless times by now, and she responded with a scoff.

“It’s surprising you haven’t tied me up yet.”

“If you run away one more time, you’ll get to experience it.”

“That’s not really my taste.”

Liv grimaced as if she truly hated the idea and then gave a bitter smile.

“Well, I suppose there isn’t much need to tie me up anyway. I can’t leave the mansion as it is.”

On that matter… there really was no other way. Daaemon now felt that even when Liv turned her back on him, it meant she was naturally trying to leave him. The mere thought of letting her out of the mansion made him anxious. He knew he’d catch her again if she ran, but he didn’t want to go through the process of searching for her again.

What kind of behavior was this? Even when he questioned himself, there was no answer. He knew how foolish and inefficient his lifestyle had become, yet he saw no way to improve it.

“If you’re really that suspicious, why don’t you tie me up before taking the pills?”

“I thought you weren’t into that.”

“I just fear what people will say if you collapse. After all, I’d be the one by your side.”

“There won’t be anyone to blame you.”

Even if Daaemon collapsed here in this mansion, it wouldn’t reach the outside world. Thierry, who was on standby nearby, would handle it promptly, preventing any major problems from arising. If anyone among his subordinates bore a grudge against Liv, they certainly wouldn’t dare express it.

“They’ve all seen what happens to those who lay a hand on you. Who would dare try it again?”

Daaemon’ men had witnessed his wrath up close. They knew well enough how dangerous it was to cross Liv, and they’d steer clear.

Daaemon picked up the medicine bottle from the table and casually tossed it into a drawer.

“What happened?”

Daaemon paused, his hand on the drawer. Liv was watching him with a calm expression.

“I have no idea what happened in Buerno after I fled.”

Daaemon hesitated briefly before closing the drawer fully. Then, in a flat tone, he began to explain.

“We found out it was Lady Malte who ordered the unfinished nude painting to be stolen, so we took her to court.”

Dragging a foreigner like Luzia to Beren’s court had been a humiliation for Malte. They had tried to settle things quietly, but now they were scrambling to relocate the trial to their own country to gain the upper hand.

As Daaemon thought of their futile struggle, he let out a mocking laugh. Liv’s uncertain voice interrupted his thoughts.

“Why would she…”

“I rejected her marriage proposal.”

Liv’s eyes widened in surprise. Daaemon studied her closely, wondering if there were other emotions behind her shock, but there was nothing else that stood out.

He hadn’t expected a specific reaction from her, but he still felt oddly disappointed. Pushing aside the incomprehensible feeling, Daaemon continued his explanation.

“The artist who painted the grotesque piece had to testify in court about who ordered him, so I didn’t kill him—I just cut off his hand.”

Cutting off the artist’s hand was enough to effectively end his life. Lady Malte, busy dealing with her own troubles, wouldn’t bother protecting the painter, who would likely be killed for revenge once the trial concluded.

“The subordinates who followed Lady Malte’s orders are already buried. No one will ever visit their graves.”

No one would know where they were buried; they’d remain missing forever.

“Are you also curious about the fools who spread baseless rumors?”

As Daaemon pondered whether to mention the small fry who had contributed to spreading the rumors, Liv abruptly asked another question.

“What about Teacher Marcel?”

Daaemon frowned, having purposely ignored mentioning Camille.

“The last I heard, he was dragged back to Eleonore’s main residence.”

Daaemon didn’t want to talk about Camille, but if he had to, it would be to emphasize that Liv would never meet him again.

Of course, Daaemon didn’t believe Liv had any romantic feelings for Camille. It seemed more likely that she had taken advantage of Camille’s feelings for her.

And that was the problem—that Liv had knowingly exploited Camille’s affection.

Knowing Liv’s character, she probably felt guilty just for that.

“Are you worried about him?”

“He only helped me because I asked. It’s my fault he’s involved, so of course I’m worried.”

As expected, Liv’s face darkened.

Seeing her expression, Daaemon felt a surge of irritation. Naturally, his words came out just as harsh.

“Help you? He probably planned to demand a hefty reward once things calmed down.”

Camille had played a crucial role in helping Liv leave Buerno and had the ability to track her down once the chaos settled.

Daaemon would’ve loved to spill Camille’s blood. If he’d decided to take Camille to court like Luzia, he could’ve easily done so.

There was more than enough to charge him with—he had clearly pursued Liv, who was known to be Daaemon’ woman, and had even tried to gather information on Daaemon behind his back. Eleonore had probably taken Camille without a fuss because of these very reasons.

“If it wasn’t for me, he wouldn’t have been caught up in this mess. If he hadn’t helped me escape, he wouldn’t be tainted by scandal.”

The reason Daaemon had returned Camille to Eleonore without harsher retribution was exactly this—he knew Liv would blame herself if Camille suffered greatly.

Daaemon disliked the idea of Camille garnering Liv’s sympathy. He wanted her to forget Camille entirely, even his name.

“You’re worried about his scandal, but…”

Aren’t you worried about the rumors I faced after you ran away? Is that why you haven’t even asked?

Daaemon stopped himself, realizing how pitiful such a question would sound. Instead, an unspoken doubt crossed his mind.

If Liv claimed she knew nothing of what happened in Buerno, how was she aware of Camille’s scandal?

Daaemon had been certain she had no feelings for Camille, but that certainty was now shaken. Could it be that her brief encounter with Camille had sparked something?

A seed of doubt began to take root. Now that he thought about it, Camille was the first person Liv had inquired about since their reunion.

Could they have planned to meet again after she had shaken off his pursuit…?

Despite knowing there had been no private correspondence between Liv and Camille, Daaemon’ suspicions spiraled out of control. His expression hardened.

Liv, who had grown accustomed to the ups and downs of Daaemon’ moods, seemed unfazed by his sudden change. Having seen his temper fluctuate dozens of times a day since their reunion, she appeared to have adjusted to the abrupt shifts.

Seeing her turn her attention away as if there was nothing more to ask, Daaemon quickly spoke up, “Is that really all you’re curious about?”

“What else should I ask?”

Liv looked at him quizzically. Daaemon was silent for a moment before speaking in a blunt tone.

“Don’t you want to know why I went up against the likes of Malte and Eleonore, how I could defy them, why they still can’t openly oppose me, even after all this, or whether there will be any repercussions in the future? Aren’t there plenty of things you should ask?”

Everyone else who had witnessed the situation had those questions. Of course, they did.

Malte and Eleonore were well-known noble families, and Daaemon had openly fought them. The name of Marquis Dietrion, once known only in Buerno, had spread across two nations due to his disputes with those families.

The sudden emergence of Daaemon had piqued everyone’s curiosity, and they all delved into the history and background of the Dietrion family.

But Liv hadn’t asked a single question about those matters. In fact, until Daaemon brought it up, it seemed she hadn’t even considered it.

“Why would I ask about that?”

Her casual response showed no hint of interest.

She wasn’t curious at all. If anything, she seemed bewildered as to why Daaemon was even bringing it up.

 “You used to ask me all sorts of questions before.”

“That was because I was curious.”

“And now you’re not curious anymore?”

“No.”

“You said you were greedy for me.”

Daaemon hadn’t intended for it to sound accusatory, but it came out that way. Liv furrowed her brow in response to his questioning. She averted her eyes from him, not out of fear but more from a sense of weariness at the conversation itself.

Liv no longer desired Daaemon. She no longer yearned desperately for the lush rose, nor did she reach out for it, willing to endure its thorns. Realizing this left her feeling cold.

“How can you abandon your god so easily?”

Liv rubbed her eyes with her hand, her action reminiscent of someone exhausted by an unpleasant conversation. It reminded Daaemon of the time she had spoken wistfully about connections.

“It seems I didn’t need a god after all.”

Liv’s reply, laced with a sigh, was calm. She added softly, “So there’s no need for you to be my god, Marquis.”

What did she mean by that? Wasn’t it true she couldn’t shoot him because he was irreplaceable to her? Wasn’t it her insatiable greed that had made her flee? How could she suddenly be indifferent?

Surely, it was an impulsive statement—just a fleeting sentiment.

Daaemon felt that if he opened his mouth even slightly, he would spill out a barrage of incoherent accusations. And so, he said nothing.

As Daaemon remained silent, Liv spoke again, as if to soothe him, “I’m not curious about what you mentioned. I won’t overstep, so there’s no need to test me.”

Daaemon took a deep breath. A cold chill settled in his chest. Though he didn’t want to admit it, he could no longer deny the truth he faced.

There was no need to worry about whether Liv might sympathize with Camille. Daaemon realized something.

He was the one who had to rely on her sympathy.

 



 

Liv had boldly claimed that she wasn’t curious about anything, but that wasn’t entirely true.

She had already learned from Camille that Daaemon was somehow connected to Cardinal Calliope. Having heard the name once, she couldn’t erase it from her memory, and her mind had naturally begun spinning a plausible story.

She also wanted to know more about Daaemon’ current conflict with Malte and Eleonore. After all, Daaemon was facing not just one but two great noble families, and the conflict had begun because of her. It was impossible not to feel concerned. She also felt an obligation to understand the situation better since she wasn’t entirely uninvolved.

Part of her was worried—just a little—that Daaemon might have entered into an unreasonable conflict because of her.

‘Even though I know he’s not one to get into something he can’t handle.’

Liv knew her worries about Daaemon were foolish. But since their reunion, Daaemon had been showing her sides of himself that were completely unexpected, making it difficult for her to feel at ease.

After all, the man couldn’t even sleep properly at the moment.

Daaemon tried to maintain his usual demeanor, but he couldn’t hide the pallor of his face or the roughness of his features. It was hard to believe that a man in such a state could make sound decisions.

What if, out of anger at her fleeing, he had carelessly provoked Malte and Eleonore? Not that she particularly cared for Daaemon, but since she was the catalyst for the conflict…

Liv, trying to rationalize her sudden bouts of concern, let out a self-deprecating laugh.

‘A foolish concern.’

Just because someone looked a bit worn down, she softened. How could she worry about Daaemon? Not long ago, she had been desperate to escape from him.

‘…But that man isn’t in his right mind right now, is he?’

Unlike Daaemon, Liv was someone filled with human emotions. Having cared for her sickly younger sister for so long, she couldn’t just turn a blind eye to someone who seemed unwell.

So it was only natural that she would care, even if just a little, for a man who was clearly weakened, who lingered constantly in her sight.

Regardless of her personal feelings, as one human to another.

Thinking along those lines, Liv ground her teeth and rubbed her face. She was softening again just because he was in front of her. Even a moment’s lapse could tip her heart’s balance in an instant.

This was the reason she had tried to run away.

‘If this continues, it’ll end up the same way as before.’

Liv’s feelings fluctuated dozens of times a day like this.

Meanwhile, Daaemon seemed prepared to answer any question Liv had for him. In fact, he even complained when she didn’t ask.

But Liv acted indifferent and ended the conversation. Partly because she feared he’d rebuke her for prying, partly because she didn’t want to seem overly eager to ask questions.

Instead, she went to the library. It was the place where Daaemon’ subordinates gathered the daily newspapers.

Just by glancing at the front page, she could get a sense of what was going on. Names like Malte and Eleonore were bound to be on the front page, after all.

“Are you that worried about that Eleonore brat?”

Noticing that Liv was looking at the newspaper, Daaemon misinterpreted her intentions. It wasn’t an assumption that needed correcting.

Ignoring Daaemon’ taunt, Liv picked up the latest newspaper. There was nothing new about Malte or Eleonore today. Instead, she saw Cardinal Calliope’s name.

The article said that, despite some minor disturbances, the cardinal had safely completed the final pilgrimage schedule. After that, it went on at length about the upcoming Gratia selection. The intent behind mentioning the cardinal’s pilgrimage and the Gratia selection in the same breath was obvious.

Though Liv didn’t know all the details, it was clear that the article aimed to highlight Cardinal Calliope, who was a candidate for Gratia. The cardinal’s influence was undeniable, but what was the connection to Daaemon?

“That brat isn’t someone you need to pity.”

Whether Liv ignored him or not, Daaemon continued with his mean-spirited remarks.

“You can tell just by how he idly spends his family’s money, wandering around without a care.”

“This is the library. Wouldn’t it be better if you read a book instead?”

Liv suggested he read something, neatly wrapping her words in politeness, and Daaemon frowned.

“If there’s something I want to see, I’ll look at it.”

“Very well, then.”

After closing the newspaper, Liv turned to leave the library. As she moved to exit, Daaemon immediately stood to follow her.

“Where are you going?”

“I thought I’d leave so you could concentrate on your reading. I’m not planning to leave the mansion, of course.”

Liv took a step outside the library and looked back. Naturally, Daaemon was following her.

Seeing Liv look at him, Daaemon hesitated, then spoke in a cold tone, “I don’t feel like reading right now.”

He wore his usual arrogant and cold expression, but the excuse was flimsy, lacking any real authority. Even a duckling imprinting late on its parent wouldn’t be this persistent.

She was starting to doubt whether his behavior was all just about watching her.

“May I speak frankly?”

“As if you haven’t been already.”

It sounded as if he was scolding her for being insolent, but in truth, it was more like a grumble. If it were the past, Liv would have taken it as a rebuke. But deciding she no longer needed to try to please him, she found herself understanding his emotions better, which was oddly amusing.

“I’m starting to feel a bit stifled.”

Liv spoke in a detached voice, setting aside her feelings.

“Don’t you feel the same, Marquis? All you do in this mansion is watch me all day.”

“Then stop thinking about running away.”

“If I say I won’t run, will you believe me?”

Daaemon didn’t bother to pretend he would. Liv let out a sigh as she noticed his displeased expression.

“At the very least, I want to walk in the garden.”

“The garden is…”

“Is that not allowed either? Because I might run?”

Daaemon’ expression remained rigid. However, Liv noticed a hint of unease behind it. He averted his gaze, as if caught off guard.

“The garden isn’t well-kept, so there’s not much to see.”

Liv tilted her head, narrowing her eyes at Daaemon. The fleeting emotion she had seen vanished quickly, replaced by the familiar cold face of Marquis Dietrion.

It still didn’t feel imposing. If anything, his overly composed demeanor seemed out of place.

Surely, the esteemed Marquis Dietrion wouldn’t be embarrassed to show her an unkempt garden.

“Then take me somewhere worth seeing.”

Liv’s words were impulsive, and Daaemon raised an eyebrow in response.

“Take you?”

“You won’t let me go alone, will you?”

The reaction was different from when she had simply said she wanted to leave. Having carefully observed his reactions numerous times, Liv easily noticed the subtle change in his stern expression.

It was so obvious that she wondered if she was mistaken. But no matter how she looked at him…

“…I’ll have them prepared.”

Daaemon spoke, and for just a moment, he looked pleased.

 When the intention of the two to go out was conveyed, the staff from the annex rushed over. Among them was an unexpected face.

“It’s been a long time, Miss Rodaise.”

“Mr. Philemond.”

“As the butler, it is my duty to guard the mansion, but since there has been no word from the master, I thought you might be relocating, so I came to confirm.”

Philip still had his kind expression. It was as if he had no idea that Liv had tried to run away, his demeanor casual and composed.

“By the way, you mentioned going out? In that case, of course, snacks must be prepared!”

“No, there’s no need for that…”

“Master, what shall we prepare?”

Philip ignored Liv’s desperate attempt to wave him off and suddenly asked Daaemon. Daaemon, who had been watching Philip’s somewhat over-the-top behavior with reluctance, reluctantly responded.

“Just prepare whatever.”

Unfortunately, Daaemon’ answer didn’t seem to satisfy Philip.

“Master.”

Philip’s expression turned serious, and he asked in an extremely respectful tone.

“Is Miss Rodaise’ favorite snack ‘whatever you deem appropriate’?”

“What?”

“I know your tastes well, but I still do not know Miss Rodaise’s preferences precisely. That is why I am asking you, Master.”

Liv, who had been listening to Philip from the side, interjected with a bewildered face.

“Wouldn’t it be quicker to ask me directly…?”

Everyone present thought so. However, it seemed that only Philip did not share this view. Still smiling, Philip turned to Liv and explained.

“I heard from Adolf. The master hasn’t taken a single step outside and has stayed by your side all this time. Surely, then, the master must also know your tastes well. Miss Rodaise, please do not worry and prepare for your outing. The maids will assist you.”

At Philip’s signal, the staff he had brought swiftly approached Liv. Somehow, they were already prepared, carrying a variety of items, including an outfit for going out.

Caught off guard, Liv was whisked away by the staff and disappeared inside. Philip maintained his smile until Liv was completely out of sight. Once she was gone, Philip turned back to Daaemon, his smile vanishing.

Daaemon frowned at Philip’s behavior, which bordered on overstepping his bounds, even in front of his master.

“What exactly are you trying to do…?”

“Master…”

Philip’s expression showed that he had much to say. After a brief pause to choose his words, he spoke calmly, “I genuinely wish for you to regain your former strength, Master. I apologize to Miss Rodaise, but to me, you are the more important person.”

It was a statement lacking much explanation. Daaemon, who looked like he was about to lose his temper, attempted to say something but closed his mouth.

Philip was Daaemon’ loyal servant, one of the few people who truly understood him.

Philip knew long ago that offering subtle hints instead of a lengthy lecture was often the quickest way to improve the situation.

“I will take care of the snacks.”

After a moment of silence, Daaemon spoke up.

“Philip.”

“Yes, Master.”

“…The situation is not favorable.”

Daaemon hesitated before speaking, his voice uncharacteristically devoid of energy.

His tone sounded no different from that of a defeated commander who had lost all his men and barely escaped to a rear base. He seemed to be in a state where, amidst being surrounded on all sides, he could only sit still, unable to find a breakthrough.

Watching the despondent Daaemon, Philip carefully spoke, “You have always either served someone or been served, Master.”

Philip knew how rigid and unilateral Daaemon’ relationships with others had been.

He had been hired during Daaemon’ cadet school years. Philip was the first employee brought on to help Daaemon maintain a minimum level of decorum as a cadet.

Given their history, it was only natural that Philip had been with Daaemon for a very long time. Among Daaemon’ long-serving aides, Philip was one of the most trusted, so when he spoke, Daaemon did not completely dismiss his words.

And sometimes, Philip’s occasional advice turned out to be quite reasonable in hindsight.

“Where you place Miss Rodaise is your choice, Master. However… in my life experience, there are rare times when the conclusion is already set.”

Perhaps this time, it would be the same.

“You already know, Master, that some problems can only be resolved by accepting them, even if they are difficult to admit.”

Daaemon no longer wore a purely grim expression.

Philip, watching him, smiled faintly and concluded, “I will also look into more places for you to visit. Seeing new locations can often help foster a shift in perspective.”

 



 

Life in Adelinde changed.

It seemed to have started after Philip’s appearance. The staff, who had previously been unable to even enter the main building due to Daaemon’ intimidating presence, now began coming in and out, with Philip leading the way. Some seemed to be stationed there permanently, following Philip’s orders.

The mansion, which had been cold and empty with only two residents, became somewhat livelier. While Daaemon still insisted on keeping Liv within his sight, the atmosphere of confinement and constant surveillance had lessened considerably. Philip’s good-natured laughter also contributed to softening the mood.

Liv didn’t know what Philip had said to Daaemon, but now even Corida could come and go comfortably from the mansion. Corida was busy preparing for the entrance exam to the Adelinde girls’ school, which was held twice a year. Since it was too soon to take the first exam, she seemed to be preparing for the second one.

“…Are you sure you don’t need me to help?”

“Oh, Sister. Uncle Adolf knows much better than you do.”

Corida’s teasing caused Liv to look embarrassed. At that moment, Adolf, who was carrying a pile of books, spotted Liv and came to a hesitant stop.

Since learning that his lie had been exposed, Adolf had been uncomfortable around Liv. Despite that, his relationship with Corida remained as amicable as ever.

It was true that Adolf had tried to send Corida far away to Mazurkan… but recently, Liv found herself considering that perhaps his intentions had been sincere.

Seeing Adolf hesitate to approach, Liv spoke first, “Thank you for helping Corida with her studies.”

“Ah, well, it’s better than wasting my time doing nothing.”

It seemed Adolf had given up on the hope of returning to Buerno soon. Having arrived in Adelinde empty-handed, there wasn’t much he could do, and helping Corida study provided him with a more meaningful way to pass the time.

“Thanks to Miss Rodaise accompanying the Marquis, I’ve been able to breathe a little easier,” Adolf added, expressing his gratitude.

However, Liv, hearing his thanks, simply gave a vague smile and let it fade.

It was more like “dragging him around” than “accompanying” him.

While people had started coming in and out of the main building, Liv herself began going out more frequently. Philip had gone so far as to organize a complete list of tourist attractions in Adelinde. When she merely mentioned wanting some fresh air, before she knew it, she had begun touring Adelinde.

Daaemon, as if it were the most natural thing, accompanied her on all these outings. She had half expected him to trail after her suspiciously, glaring and sneering, but he didn’t do that.

Of course, there were times when he couldn’t contain his irritation and had his moments. However, the frequency had noticeably decreased, and instead, he spent more time quietly observing Liv.

At first glance, it was similar to the time she worked extra hours while he watched her, his gaze unwavering as she stood naked before him. But Liv knew that things were entirely different now.

“Where are we going today?”

“It’s peak bloom season by the riverside these days. The weather is good today, so Mr. Philemond insisted we go.”

Hardly had she finished speaking when a maid’s voice came from outside, announcing that the carriage was ready.

Daaemon was waiting for Liv by the door. The maid beside him, looking quite miserable, was clearly hoping Liv would hurry. Even though Daaemon’ attitude toward Liv had somehow changed, toward everyone else, he remained irritable and cynical. Judging by the reactions of the staff, it seemed they were more afraid of him these days.

Hearing the pitiful maid’s plea, Liv sighed and left the library.

 Honestly, seeing Daaemon’ face now, Liv understood why the maid was so terrified. Due to his sleepless nights, Daaemon was carrying all the adjectives of ‘handsome,’ ‘pale,’ and ‘fierce.’

Once, his beauty had been almost unreal, enough to make people lose themselves in admiration. Now, though, he looked pretty but a bit… ghostly, perhaps even eerie.

“Have a safe trip.”

Listening to Adolf’s farewell, Liv thought to herself. What a strange routine this was.

How could she define this? It was neither here nor there. It felt like a lingering issue, something left unfinished, covered up just enough to seem peaceful, but ultimately wasting time.

Yet again, she wasn’t sure if it was right to bring up the problem and shatter this strange day-to-day life.

On the way to the riverside, Liv stared silently out of the carriage window. As always, Daaemon quietly watched her. Unable to endure his gaze, Liv finally spoke, still looking out the window.

“Why not get some sleep, even for a short while, on the way?”

“I’m fine.”

“If you’re going to say you’re fine, then at least have a face that matches it.”

Daaemon frowned at her remark. It was clear from his expression that he had no intention of accepting her criticism. Liv glanced at him briefly before turning her gaze back to the window.

“Anyone can see you’re not in good health, Marquis.”

“If you’re saying that because you want to get away from me…”

“I gave up on that hope long ago.”

“So you did hope for it at some point.”

Liv was at a loss for words. As if he’d hit the mark, she fell silent, and Daaemon let out a mocking laugh. Still, he didn’t make any more sneering remarks, instead returning to silently watching her.

After a moment, Liv broke the silence between them once again.

“Do you realize how strange you’re acting right now, Marquis?”

Her voice carried a trace of irritation, though she couldn’t fully explain its cause even to herself.

The one thing she knew for sure was that they couldn’t continue living like this forever. For Liv, honestly, this prolonged situation wasn’t necessarily harmful, but for Daaemon, it was different.

Being by his side, she couldn’t ignore how his hollow face revealed just how badly insomnia was tormenting him and how much his health was deteriorating. Moreover, from Adolf’s occasional frustrated complaints, she could guess that even his aide Charles was struggling to handle all the work in his absence.

If Daaemon was truly staying here only because of her…

If that were the case, it made no sense that he hadn’t already declared his intention to take her back to Buerno. It was understandable that, right after their reunion, he might have lost his head and not considered anything else, but now, enough time had passed for him to regain his senses.

“Do you remember what you once told me?”

Liv, lost in thought as she vaguely gazed out the window, turned to look at Daaemon reflexively.

“A broken rose branch eventually withers.”

Her eyelashes trembled. Daaemon, recognizing that she remembered their past conversation, crookedly lifted the corners of his mouth.

“You were right.”

“What do you mean by that?”

“I mean I understand your words now.”

“The words I spoke then…”

What Liv had said back then was a bold declaration that perhaps she could have some influence over him. That if she dared to reach out, even at the risk of being hurt, he too wouldn’t remain untouched—a naive challenge.

So Liv couldn’t help but doubt whether Daaemon truly understood what she had meant.

“If I had known it would come to this, I should have told you to put it in a vase.”

With that cryptic remark, Daaemon turned his gaze away from her. Now, he was looking out the window, while Liv found herself staring at him.

Her lips moved, struggling to form words, until she finally spoke in a subdued voice, “You said that reckless courage is just foolhardiness.”

Once, when Liv had been curious about Daaemon, when she wanted to reach out to him, to learn more about him—he had been the one to draw the line, dismissing her desires as absurd.

“You said that recklessly displaying courage is mere folly.”

Once, when Liv had been curious about Daaemon, when she wanted to reach out to him, to learn more about him—he had been the one to draw the line, dismissing her desires as absurd.

“When I was greedy for the rose, that’s what you told me.”

When her eyes met Daaemon’ piercing blue ones, memories of their past encounters flashed vividly through her mind.

The indifferent words he had said to her, the distances that had never been permitted to close, all the moments when she had anxiously hesitated alone.

“Then why say such things now?”

Unable to help herself, Liv felt a pang of resentment. Her voice was sharp because of it. But instead of getting angry, Daaemon’ eyes seemed to soften.

“It’s better this way.”

“What is?”

“Resentment is better than indifference.”

Liv opened her mouth in disbelief, her expression incredulous.

Daaemon, seeing her reaction, spoke in an even tone, “I know better than anyone that there’s something wrong with me…”

He trailed off, his blue eyes shifting away from hers, as if to avoid her gaze.

“I’m in the process of accepting defeat.”

That was the last thing Daaemon said. Liv, too, had nothing more to say.

 



 

As Philip had suggested, the riverside was truly beautiful.

The entire area was covered in yellow flowers of unknown name, and the sunlight shimmering on the water’s surface made the ripples sparkle magically, creating a breathtaking sight.

Even Liv, who had been feeling weighed down by their conversation in the carriage, couldn’t help but be captivated by the brilliance of nature. She let out an unintentional gasp of awe and found herself wandering, almost entranced, through the flower field.

And Daaemon watched her from a distance amidst the scene.

This was how it had been for him lately. Quietly reflecting on his defeat as he watched Liv go about her day in the mansion and as she wandered through all these beautiful places.

 

“You already know, Master, that some problems can only be resolved by accepting them, even if they are difficult to admit.”

 

The greatest defeat Daaemon had ever felt in his life was when he had been betrayed by Stephan, whom he had thought of as a fool. That defeat had brought about intense humiliation and anger, bruising his pride and causing him to shut himself away for a while.

But how was this defeat?

Now, he found himself at a loss for what to do as he was swayed by a woman he had believed he could control at his whim. A woman who didn’t even seem to realize she had won.

He had never experienced a defeat quite like this before.

From the start, he hadn’t even considered it a fair fight. He had seen it as a one-sided relationship—so he had let his guard down and never taken it seriously.

While staying in the Adelinde mansion, Daaemon began to retrace every moment since he had first met Liv. From the moment he had been captivated by that terrible nude painting to finally sitting the model herself in front of him.

At that time, he had believed everything was going according to his plan. Liv had moved exactly as he had anticipated, and she had needed what he had expected.

But had it been wrong from the very beginning?

Even the thought of that hurt his pride. Nevertheless, the defeat he now felt led him to repeatedly doubt the confidence he had once had. Surely, at some point, he had made a wrong judgment—some mistake that had led to this outcome.

 

“Where you place Miss Rodaise is your choice, Master. However… in my life experience, there are rare times when the conclusion is already set.”

 

A predetermined conclusion.

Perhaps, in this relationship, his defeat was inevitable from the start?

While Daaemon was lost in these thoughts, he suddenly saw Liv’s body sway among the flowers. Without a second thought, he rushed to her.

“Ah!”

Daaemon caught her arm just as she lost her balance. He checked her footing.

They were closer to the riverside than he realized, and the ground was soft. Her leg had sunk into the squishy mud. It was obvious that her shin was quite deeply stuck.

Liv, having narrowly avoided falling thanks to Daaemon, looked embarrassed as she tried to brace her leg. But the ground was far from solid, making it difficult for her to free her leg on her own.

Without any hesitation, Daaemon bent down, supporting her back and the crook of her knees, and easily lifted her into his arms.

 ---

Continue in Part 3!!
